Gulf Western Inc's GW> Paramount Pictures Corp division movie "Beverly Hills Cop II" topped 100 mln dlr mark box office 29th North American release. Paramount movie fast movie hit 100 mln dlr mark "R" rating mean anyone 17 accompany parents. Reuter 

Qtly div 44 ct v 44 ct Pay July 31 Record July 3 Reuter 

The House support call Japan boost defense spending share burden protect Western interest sensitive area include Gulf. House member approve measure require Secretary State George Shultz enter talk Japan increase Japanese defense spending 3 pct gross product. The measure pass consideration 1988-89 State Department funding bill require increase legislator call Japan spend defense. The Senate approve measure becomes law. "We don't bash Japanese. We show share burden defense free world" Rep. Robert Dornan California Republican. The amendment call Shultz enter talk Japan aim reach agreement alternatives: either Japan spend 3 pct GNP defense equivalent amount money United States security fee. Reuter 

Australia's economy manage modest growth sharp slowdown unemployment edge upwards Organisation Economic Cooperation Development (OECD) said. The organisation's late half-yearly report say Gross Domestic Product grow 2.5 pct 2.75 pct 1988 compare 1.4 pct 1986. The growth help high stockbuilding strong domestic demand follow tax cut high real wage added. The report forecast decline inflation consumer price increase 8.5 pct 6.25 pct 1988. The current account deficit show sign ease slightly narrow 12 billion dlrs 1988. While predict slightly strong growth report revise downwards OECD's earlier growth forecast 1987 3.75 pct. The OECD predicts similar combination modest economic growth rise unemployment New Zealand struggle recover major economic crisis. The country's GDP contract 0.6 pct show growth rise 0.25 pct substantial 2.75 pct 1988. Reuter 

Robert Fildes president chief executive Cetus Corp CTUS.O> told Reuters Squibb Corp interested buying Cetus. Earlier company Squibb buy Cetus five pct equity postion Cetus 40 mln dlrs. "This attempt Squibb major majority holder Cetus" Fildes told Reuters interview. "Squibb approach indication acquire wouldn't interested arrangement" Fildes. Squibb reach comment late comment Fildes. Squibb Cetus' pharmaceutical partner equity position Cetus. Eastman Kodak Co EK> W.R. Grace WR> joint venture Cetus neither own equity position company Fildes. Cetus venture Kodak develp diagnostic product Grace develop agricultural products. Earlier Squibb Cetus announce joint statement agreement principle form joint venture develop biotechnology product fields. As deal Squibb license Cetus' anticancer agent include interleukin-2 development. Squibb sell drug Japan market North American Western Europe. "We wouldn't deal understood Cetus want build fully integrate North America Europe" Fildes. He Squibb partner Squibb major joint venture Japan sale capability market. Fildes Cetus shun licensing arrangement pharmaceutical company want build business. Many corporation invest biotech firms. But Squibb's investment Cetus biotechnology. Fildes attractive Cetus want partner didn't relationship biotechnology companies." Fildes strategy partner non drug area diagnostics agriculture "keep big development anticancer drug ourselves." Fildes partnership Squibb broaden company's reach money make area cardiovascular anti-infective anti-inflammatory markets. Squibb investming 75 mln dlrs Cetus' research five years. "Squibb put 75 mln dlrs research development happen equity position package simply demonstrate seriousness partnership" Fildes. Reuter 

The National Broadcasting Co unit General Electric Co GE> intend implement June 29 labor contract reject union represenatives. A spokesman National Association Broadcast Employees Technicians represening 2800 worker negotiate committee adopt formal resolution state inform NBC strike implementation. "The union decide action think appropriate" Day Krolik NBC's vice president labor relations. A union spokesman NBC implemetation peacefully negotiate contract. Reuter 

Mark Stahl 45 former senior vice president Shearson Lehman Brothers suspension April 16 admit U.S. District court embezzle 19 mln dlrs firm past year. He enter guilty plea United States District Court Judge Vincent Broderick specific charge total 1031000 dlrs wire fraud. Stahl senior vice president finance told judge total embezzlement amount "a little than" 19 mln dlrs. Through attorney Stahl agree restitution Shearson Lehman embezzle fund possible. However guilty plea count cover criminal liability embezzlement occur April 1986 April. Judge Broderick schedule sentence December nine. Stahl face maximum sentence 20 jail mln dlrs fine both. Reuter 

Shr ct v ct Net 1180000 v 902000 Revs 146.9 mln v 37.0 mln Avg shrs 33 mln v 23.9 mln NOTE: Company change fiscal December 31 February result operation year-ago period restate reflect change. Current quarter include result operation Loews Theatre Management Corp Tri-Star acquire December 31. Reuter 

Canada increase corporate tax revenue five billion dlrs five broadening tax base allow few exemption finance minister Michael Wilson said. As Wilson previously promise corporation bear increase tax burden despite measure low overall tax rates. Increased corporate revenue result broadening tax base eliminate special tax exemptions. "The job Canadians depend corporate income tax competitive country particularly United States" Wilson prepared speech House Commons. "And (tax reform) ensure profitable corporation carry big share total tax burden" added. Federal tax revenue corporation increase 470 mln dlrs fiscal end March 31 1988 410 mln dlrs fiscal 1989 1.19 billion dlrs fiscal 1990 accord document table Wilson's speech. Reuter 

The average tax rate Canadian financial insitutions increase 21.3 pct 14.5 pct tax reform package federal finance department said. The amount financial institutions' income taxed increase 74.0 pct 48.7 pct document table finance minister Michael Wilson's prepared speech House Commons. Under Wilson's plan federal government collect 1.36 billion dlrs five financial insitutions include bank trust mortgage insurance company accord finance department documents. Financial institution "are complain believe change appropriate affordable" finance department official identified. Ottawa collect revenue financial institution reduce amount reserve deduct tax "will broaden tax base low tax pay sector" finance department said. Among change charter bank longer able five-year average formula calculate loan loss deduct tax purposes. Effective June 17 1987 bank deduct bad doubtful loan incurred. The finance department impact provision cushion period five years. The change need ensure financial company taxed fairly deregulation financial service industry. "It inconsistent tax continue provide reserve tax purpose institution compete marketplace" finance department said. Reuter 

Canada broaden federal sale tax levy manufacturer scrap favor broad base multi-staged sale tax finance minister Michael Wilson said. As expect Wilson include sale tax wide-ranging tax reform table House Commons today. Instead federal government interim change exist sale tax fair low middle income Canadians. "The (sales) tax fundamentally flawed. It hidden arbitrary capricious tax" Wilson told House Commons. The exist federal sale tax hurt Canadian economy put tax Canadian produce good import good add hidden tax Canadian export make competitive Wilson said. Interim change effective January 1 1988 include: -- apply federal sale tax marketing company related manufacturer -- levy tax wholesale level instead manufacturer select range product -- apply 10 pct sale tax telecommunication service except residential telephone line -- quicker collection federal sale taxes. To offset change low income Canadians refundable tax credit increase 70 dlrs 50 dlrs adult 35 dlrs 25 dlrs child finance department said. Ottawa consider alternative form sale tax include good service tax value add tax sale tax combine exist federal provincial levy Wilson told House Commons. He federal government explore possibility sale tax Canada's 10 provincial governments. All province except Albeta levy provincial sale tax vary amounts. Wilson joint simpler taxpayer maximize economic benefit tax reform. If Ottawa province can't agree sale tax Wilson federal government consider either good service tax value-added tax. A good service tax apply rate virtually good service Canada include far increase refundable tax credit low middle income Canadians finance department document accompany Wilson's speech. A federal value-added tax similar European tax system broad base allow flexibility exempt select good service department said. The finance deparment main drawback value add tax complex costly implement proposals. Reuter 

Finance Minister Michael Wilson tax reform affect determination reign expenditure forecast show slow decline budget deficit late 1980s. "Responsible tax reform fiscally responsible" Wilson speech prepared House Commons. Wilson estimate deficit fall 29.3 billion dlrs end March 31 1988 level forecast February budget. And end past March deficit expect billion dlrs low 32 billion dlr shortfall originally forecast Wilson said. Wilson current 1988 fiscal higher-than-anticipated spending particularly farm income support program offset higher-than-anticipated revenues. But finance department document show pace deficit reduction expect slow temporarily fiscal 1989 1990 result low oil grain price transition reform taxation system. The deficit expect total 28.9 billion dlrs fiscal 1989 28.6 billion dlrs 1989 fall 26.1 billion dlrs 1991. Wilson optimistic outlook Canadian economy forcasting gross domestic product expand 2.8 pct 3.0 pct 1988. In 1986 economy grow actual 3.1 pct. Inflation meanwhile expect stabilize current pct level years. Reuter 

Finance Minister Michael Wilson table way mean motion immediately impose special tax prefer share dividend eliminate significant loss corporate tax revenue. Under motion introduce financial tax change dividend prefer share issue June 18 taxable. The issue corporation able choose form tax imposes 25 pct tax dividend subsequent additional 10 pct tax paid shareholder imposes flat 40 pct tax dividends. "Measures reduce tax advantage after-tax financing arrangement use prefer share critical step achieve broaden corporate tax base require fund personal income tax reductions" Wilson explained. The minister profitable corporation use various deduction built pay tax position pay dividend profits. Reuter 

Finance Minister Michael Wilson unveiled wide-ranging reform personal tax include limit capital gain exemption sharp cut dividend tax credit. With change effective Wilson announce cut tax bracket 10 three. He change cut personal tax revenue billion dlrs 1988 11 billion dlrs five years. "Most Canadians pay low tax far-reaching changes. A structure federal income tax rate conversion exemption deduction tax credits" Wilson told House Commons. The tax bracket 17 pct 27500 dlrs taxable income 26 pct 27500 dlrs 29 pct taxable income excess 55000 dlrs. The maximum tax rate 34 pct current system. In major reversal initiative Wilson controversial 500000 dlrs capital gain exemption reduce 100000 dlrs investors' lifetime. Wilson introduce exemption shortly take office 1984 stimulate investment sharply criticize opposition over-generous wealthy investors. The 500000 dlr lifetime exemption kept sale farm land businesess however. Also taxable portion capital gain increase 50 pct currently 66-2/3 pct 1988 75 pct 1990. The dividend tax credit reduce 33-1/3 pct 25 pct deduction 1000 dlrs dividend income eliminate 1988. Wilson tax treatment register retirement saving plan contribution maintain phase increase maximum limit 15500 dlrs delayed 1994. Reuter 

The Australia New Zealand Banking Group Ltd ANZA.S> cut prime rate 16.00 pct 16.50 effective June 22. The cut take ANZ's prime low range prime rate offer Australian trading banks. The high rate 17.50 pct. The cut follow announcement cut yesterday Citibank Ltd> 16.00 pct 16.5 effective Commonwealth Bank Australia> 15.75 pct 16.25 effective June 24. REUTER 

The Finance Ministry ask financial institution limit speculative dollar dealing Finance Minister Kiichi Miyazawa told reporters. He respond rumour New York currency market overnight Ministry reduce pressure institution refrain excessively speculative dollar dealings. REUTER 

Prime Minister Rajiv Gandhi's Congress (I) party swept northern Haryana opposition landslide. The loss major personal setback Gandhi whose vote-winning ability trial political scandal Delhi string electoral loss command party 1984. With 53 result Haryana's 90-seat assembly Congress won seat 63 previously. Before poll Congress politician Delhi privately loss Haryana party leadership debate. REUTER 

The government emergency measure wave violent protest demonstration continue radio said. The radio specify measure decision take meeting top minister security official attend Prime Minister Lee Han-key. It special statement shortly. Thousands demonstrator street Seoul city yesterday battling riot police demand resignation President Chun Doo Hwan. It ninth successive violent protests. REUTER 

A Circuit Court judge order company insured solvency International Medical Centres Inc show cause honour contract International accord Florida's Department Insurance file petition matter. As previously report International large health maintenance organisation Florida declare insolvent May 14. Federal regulator told company Medicare contract terminate July 31 company's financial management problems. Michelle McLawhorn Florida Department spokeswoman International's insurer State Mutual Life Assurance Co America clear fight activation policy International provide accurate financial records. State Mutual reach comment. McLawhorn yet know creditor International debt was. The court give State Mutual 20 day show oblige pay claim solvency policy. REUTER 

The ruling Brazilian Democratic Movement Party (PMDB) hold convention July 18 19 discus length Presidential term PMDB spokesman said. Although country's constitution allows six-year term Sarney remain five 1984. The Constituent Assembly draw constitution severe economic problem increase pressure call elections. A faction PMDB favour poll November year. REUTER 

New U.S. Banking data suggest Federal Reserve guide monetary policy steady path signal imminent change course economist said. But money supply growth remains weak week's unexpected eight billion dlr M-1 decline suggests influence Fed loosen credit rein move accommodative monetary policy. A Reuter survey 17 money market economist produce forecast 600 mln dlr M-1 decline week end June 8 estimate range gain billion dlrs decline billion. Instead M-1 fell eight billion dlrs 745.7 billion dlrs seasonally adjust annual rate. Coming heel 4.3 billion decrease M-1 week end June 1 mean nation's money supply fall 12 billion dlrs past week economist said. "M-1 hit air pocket weakness" Bill Sullivan Dean Witter Reynolds Inc. While M-1 lose significance indicator economic growth Sullivan Fed official concerned late drop M-1 mean month sluggish growth broader monetary aggregate M-2 M-3 see gauge economic growth. Latest monthly M-2 M-3 data show May measure grow rate below bottom Fed's 5-1/2 8-1/2 pct target ranges. If money growth accelerate Fed official concerned indicates economic growth flag turn easy monetary policy economist said. "Does mean Fed abandon current market position? No" Sullivan said. "But mean tighten being? Definitely yes." Economists average adjust discount window borrowing 385 mln dlrs late two-week bank statement period low expected. Most believe Fed targetted two-week borrowing average 500 mln dlrs. But one-day net miss Fed's reserve projection high borrowing target probably reached. A drop May U.S. Housing start continued weakness auto sale show key sector U.S. Economy lag recent modest 0.3 pct gain May producer price help dispel inflation fear Slifer said. "If continue entertain notion Fed ease point" said. Other economist Fed probably pay little attention weak money supply growth. "It M-1 sign what's economy" said. "I don't M-1 show economy fall apart Fed ease." Economists agree stable dollar continue prerequisite move Fed easy monetary policy. They Fed reluctant low short-term rate fear spur expectation weaker dollar high inflation push long-term yield choke econmomic growth. But Sullivan dollar steady late April. "The Fed determine represent fundamental change dollar. If give ease" said. REUTER 

Shr profit six cent v loss 10 Net profit 8.1 mln dlrs v loss 7.1 mln Sales 511.9 mln v 397.8 mln Avg shrs 97.0 mln v 90.5 mln YEAR Shr loss 38 cent v loss 1.10 dlrs Net loss 24.6 mln dlrs v loss 91.5 mln Sales 1.87 billion v 1.48 billion Avg shrs 91.7 mln v 89.8 mln NOTE - Current figure include previously announce 15 mln dlr restructuring charge. Figures include extraordinary credit tax benefit 4.2 mln dlrs quarter v 2.3 mln earlier 4.2 mln v 5.6 mln earlier. The 1986 net reflect 51.2 mln dlr gain cumulative effect accounting change. REUTER 

National SemiConductor Corp earlier report profitable fiscal fourth quarter ago loss expect improve financial performance fiscal year. The company report profit 8.1 mln dlrs quarter end May 31 loss 7.1 mln dlrs ago period. The company order core business improve add "Our strong balance sheet improve environment enable improve financial performance fiscal year." The company fourth quarter semiconductor information system high sale improve operating performance prior quarter year-earlier quarter. REUTER 

The Federal Home Loan Bank Board (FHLBB) place Investors Federal Bank> El Reno Oklahoma receivership transfer 97.8 mln dlrs asset Investors Savings Loan Association>. An FHLBB statement thrift insolvent "had substantially dissipate assets" mainly participate commercial real estate developments. It violate federal law regulation loan documentation loan director conflict interest. The sucessor organisation federal saving loan manage contract Sunwood Management Corp Parker Colorado. REUTER 

Mitsubishi Electric Corp MIET.T> plan assemble personal computer U.S. To counteract imposition 100 pct import tax April drop profit due yen's appreciation dollar company spokesman told Reuters. It assemble 16-bit MP-286 32-bit MP-386 desk-top computer wholly-owned computer computer-related equipment sale unit Mitsubishi Electronics America Inc> Torrance California rate 10000 month said. This include 2000 TO 3000 sell U.S. Under Mitsubishi name give details. REUTER 

U.S. Secretary State George Shultz warn Association Southeast Asian Nations (ASEAN) longer rely increase export U.S. For growth. "Given importance export particularly export manufacture country hard diversify markets" said. "While able maintain current market share U.S. You clearly able look U.S. To major increase exports" added. Shultz told foreign minister Brunei Indonesia Malaysia Philippines Singapore Thailand U.S. Would cut huge foreign trade deficit rapidly believed. He ASEAN's loom trade problem necessarily stem protectionist legislation contemplate Congress "but simply adjustment U.S. Economy service grow external debt." Shultz U.S. Deficit result fall export high import fuel growth. REUTER 

The conservative opposition already fight uphill election battle face controversy rank error major tax cut economist said. Professor Michael Porter architect tax plan decline refute Treasurer Paul Keating's charge opposition miscalculate tax expenditure cut billion dollars. Economists opposition trail behind Labour opinion poll chance far diminish tax policy miscalculation. The tax plan unveiled opposition leader John Howard week cornerstone Liberal Party's economic strategy oust Labour Party July 11 poll. Keating Howard tax plan sharply increase budget deficit nine billion dlrs severely damage Australia's economy already overburden balance payment foreign debt problems. In mini-budget May 13 Keating budget deficit end June 1988 billion dlrs. Porter key member opposition economic tank played lead role formulate tax plan Howard's propose expenditure saving Keating claimed distort double counting. Some opposition appear error Liberal Party spokesman refuse comment say package reexamined. "The deceitful" Prime Minister Bob Hawke radio interview. "Howard mess it. If can't govern themselves expect govern country?" Hawke seek third term opposition election easy him. "I've physically mentally relaxed (during election). We've problem all" said. The late opinion poll publish Melbourne Sun newspaper show Labour lead opposition 12 point indicate 66-seat majority Hawke parliament. The Election Commission announce 613 candidate contest 148-seat House Representatives 255 candidate fight 76 Senate seats. REUTER 

Fujitsu Ltd ITSU.T> sign joint venture agreement Post Telecommunication Administration Bureau Fujian Province (PTABF) China develop sell software Fujitsu-designed digital telephone switch machine FETEX-150. It statement joint company Fujian Fujitsu Communications Software Ltd> locate Fuzhou city capitalise 10 mln yuan own 51 pct PTABF 49 pct Fujitsu. It create 20 local job target annual software sale 330 mln yen 1992 Fujitsu said. REUTER 

Mitsui Investment Management Co Ltd> (MIMCL) Alliance Capital Management International Inc> (ACMII) sign agreement late month cooperate international fund management ACMII spokesman said. MIMCL 55-pct control affiliate company Mitsui Bank Ltd MIBT.T> reconsign foreign security investment order ACMII told Reuters. ACMII London-based 100 pct-owned subsidiary Alliance Capital Management Corp> New York reconsign foreign order MIMCL instruct MIMCL international fund management technique spokesman said. Both firm 56 investment advisory company grant Japanese government approval discretionary fund management June 10 Mitsui spokesman said. Alliance Capital Management Corp world's big firm devote exclusively fund management 35 billion dlrs fund said. Mitsui Investment Co Ltd establish ago control 800 mln dlrs 80 pct invest Japanese equities. REUTER 

Indonesia increase share 434-billion-yen aluminium smelter joint venture Japan 25 37 pct Asahan Project Authority director A.R. Suhud said. The Japanese Export-Import Bank Indonesia raise share (P.T. Indonesia Asahan Aluminium) company capitalise 1975 91 billion swap 32 billion yen government loan company equity stake. The Japanese shareholder Overseas Economic Cooperation Fund 12 company invest 24 billion yen raise capitalisation 147 billion yen. Asahan report total loss 97.6 billion rupiah 1982 1985. Suhud company's 320 billion yen debt cause fall tin price appreciation yen U.S. Dollar. Aluminium sell dollars. Prices improve 1150 dlrs tonne six month ago 1450 dlrs today. The plant suppose break price stay 1500 dlrs tonne. Sahud plant capacity 220000 tonne probably lose money 1987. The plant situate North Sumatra produce mostly Japan. REUTER 

Investors Philippine stock market shrug grow communist activity city push share price all-time high record turnover broker said. Regularly heavy trading billion share sent Manila exchange's composite index soar 775.9 577.2 point weeks. Brokers described recent trading "frantic" "hectic" trading record smash day. A total 2.6 billion share worth 259.4 million peso change hand main Manila Makati exchange yesterday activity centavo price stock broker said. The turnover double record 1.1 billion share worth 118.1 million peso Wednesday. Brokers rise gold price cause mining share shoot week ago sector followed. Share price continued rise gold price fell 450 dlrs ounce due rise confidence President Corazon Aquino's handle economy said. Brokers Aquino's handle 18-year-old communist insurgency maintenance relatively low rate contribute rise. Blue chip stock San Miguel Corp Philippine Long Distance Telephone Co (PLDT) risen 25 pct week trend upward medium term temporary correction overdue said. Since surge May 26 Manila's Mining index risen 5700.4 point 4042.4 commercial industrial index shot 881.0 694.9 point oil indicator increase 4.1 2.9 points. Market activity rise spurt Ferdinand Marcos replace Aquino 16 month ago. One broker Philippine stock market "may age." Wilson Sy president Prudential Securities local stockbroking firm Hong Kong affiliation told Reuters "Barring unforeseen political event bet Philippine market. It shrug communist inroad Manila." Assassins kill 52 policeman soldier security guard capital year. Communist hitman know sparrow claimed kill 22 them. Sy Philippine stock undervalue term price-earnings ratio half Hong Kong one-sixth Japan. He PLDT U.S. Listed price-earnings ratio nine. Sy predict Manila's composite index rise beyond 1000 point current 775.9 mark year-end. Other broker cautious say Aquino improve peace investor treat Philippines Hong Kong Tokyo. One broker believe 30 pct money stock foreign fund manager agent base Hong Kong New York. Manila Stock Exchange chairman Robert Coyuito told Reuters "If peace situation really improve market move beyond price-earnings ratio 20 times." "But depends Congress performs local election go" said. A two-chamber legislature elect month due sit July 27. Local election schedule November. PLDT share close 630 peso share yesterday 30 peso above Wednesday's record close. PLDT share price risen nine-fold 18 months. San Miguel share close 190 peso historic broker said. REUTER 

Canada's sweep tax reform package announce step towards fairer bold revamp tax structure expect economist leader said. "It's big step towards tax reform we've take years" Merrill Lynch Canada Inc chief economist Michael Manford told Reuters. "But lot change oppose brand system" added. (See spotlight index page ECRA) Manford change introduce Finance Minister Michael Wilson simplify federal tax system. They represent evolutionary revolutionary reform. "Overall I timid step lead believe" said. Wilson's move increase money collect corporation cut individual tax "is probably acceptable shift" Bill James president Falconbridge Ltd international mining company. Wilson spread corporate tax increase fairly evenly across corporate sector James said. "So it's hit anyone hard remain competitive." Wilson speech House Commons Canada's tax need change compete sweep reform United States year. "The critical corporate Wilson move tax closer U.S. System" Manford said. The federal government increase tax paid corporation five billion dlrs five lower personal tax 11 billion dlrs period. Despite collect corporate tax Wilson able low tax rate individual company remove special tax exemption broadening tax base. Wilson's plan reduce capital cost allowance company write major investment spokesman hurt run. "That affect investment decision negatively" Laurent Thiebeault Canadian Manufacturers Association president. Tax analyst industry day ass impact capital cost allowance reduction years. As anticipate Canada's opposition party signal intend fight tax measure introduce Parliament months. "It's tax reform it's tax grab" Liberal leader John Turner. Turner label change federal sale tax "a money machine minister finance." Wilson broaden federal sale tax include additional product promise introduce broad-based multi-staged sale tax. "It's fair package Canadians quickly" New Democratic Party leader Ed Broadbent said. However economist Manford Wilson act wisely protect low income Canadians provide tax credit cut 850000 tax rolls. REUTER 

Recent government move curb capital inflow temporarily help slow rise Taiwan's foreign exchange reserve stabilise local dollar U.S. Currency official banker said. Central bank governor Chang Chi-Cheng told reporter reserve rise 500 mln U.S. Dlrs past week local dollar appreciate slowly U.S. Dollar. Chang "The pace increase reserve slow currency get stable." He reserve mainly result trade surplus U.S. Rose rate billion U.S. Dlrs month January May. The reserve world's third large Japan West Germany total 60 billion U.S. Dlrs. On June 2 central bank froze overseas borrowing local foreign bank cut limit central bank purchase forward U.S. Dollars bank 40 pct 90 pct value contract. Local foreign banker June 2 measure drastically limited ability lend foreign exchange importer exporters. They overseas borrowing forward dollar transaction show drastic decline bank register fall 30 pct. Bank dealer Taiwan dollar stabilise U.S. Currency week rise five Taiwanese cent June 2 13 compare rise five eight cent May. The bank dealer central bank previously bought U.S. Dollars heavily sell 1.1 billion U.S. Dlrs past week meet commercial demand. They expect government keep local dollar stable near term breathing space business experience slow export rise 23 pct value Taiwan dollar September 1985. The Taiwan dollar open 31.09 U.S. Dollar unchanged yesterday. Keh Fei-Lo vice president First Commercial Bank "It appear central bank's move curb capital inflow quite successful." Vice economic minister Wang Chien-Shien slow rise foreign exchange reserve ease pressure Washington U.S. Trade deficit Taiwan. Over past Taiwanese businessmen delayed import machinery production equipment exchange rate uncertainty said. The stable exchange rate boost import particularly United States. REUTER 

Japan's cabinet approve plan financially-troubled aluminium venture Indonesia Brazil official Ministry International Trade Industry (MITI) said. Japan invest 24 billion yen PT Indonesia Asahan Aluminium> addition 68.3 billion yen already invest company. The government private interest equally share additional investment said. They provide equal share 6.3 billion yen investment Albras Amazon aluminium project Brazil addition 45.7 billion yen already invested. The Japan Export-Import Bank cut rate loan Asahan Albras five pct seven pct official said. Interest rate loan Japan's private bank project expect reduce five pct current seven eight pct agreement yet reach industry source said. Under rescue scheme Asahan 91.1 billion yen invest Indonesia extend 32 billion yen company. This raise Indonesia's investment ratio 40 pct current 25 pct. The Brazilian government already agree invest additional 6.5 billion yen Albras investment total 93.2 billion yen stake change 51 pct official said. The source rescue program project large earlier expect reflect Japan's desire develop economy Indonesia Brazil stabilise source aluminium. Japan depends import 90 pct aluminium demand total 1.8 mln tonne said. REUTER 

Mitsui Co Ltd MITS.T> paid 1.5 mln dlrs May five pct stake Zoran Corp> California-based maker scale integrate circuit (LSI) computer graphic communication medical application Mitsui spokesman told Reuters. He firm form marketing company Japan detail joint venture yet fixed. Mitsui expect year's 10 billion yen Japanese LSI market grow quickly. Zoran found 1981 100 employee said. REUTER 

Faulty repair inadequate inspection cause 1985 crash Japan Airlines Co Ltd JAPN.T> (JAL) Boeing 747 kill 520 Japanese government final official report. The clear cause crash faulty repair Boeing Co BA> Shun Takeda ministry transport official lead accident investigation committee. But report criticise ministry's inspector fail carry full check repair signing clearance sheet. The aircraft hit Mount Osutaka north Tokyo August 12 1985 bulkhead separate pressurise cabin unpressurised tail suddenly burst fracture key navigation systems. Only survived. A Japan Air Lines spokesman decline comment report. Boeing expect release statement today. The report clear JAL crew responsibility. In separate recommendation investigator aircraft operating Japan fail-safe system done. A press statement lawyer represent victim crash criticise report deal great depth fail-safe aspect. The lawyer Boeing show believe crash due design defect specify design modification prevent recurrence memorandum file King County Washington Superior Court March 24. They similar official recommendation fail-safe system follow air disaster involve DC-10 aircraft near Paris 1974 Chicago 1979 reject objection aircraft manufacturers. The government investigator ministry formulate concrete guideline inspectors. An internal ministry memo earlier complain inspector left make aircraft checks. A Boeing team repair aircraft's aft bulkhead JAL supervision Transport Ministry inspector approve repair actually see today's report said. The inspector unable check Boeing's repair cover seal report said. Over cabin pressurisation speed process metal fatigue repair bulkhead. Boeing issue official statement September 6 1985 say 1978 repair carry faulty. It link crash. REUTER 

Japan's custom-cleared trade surplus narrow 1.61 billion dlrs 10 day June 1.97 billion earlier Finance Ministry said. The June interim surplus compare 1.76 billion dlr surplus May period. FOB export 10 day June rise 17.6 pct earlier 6.05 billion dlrs CIF import rise 39.6 pct 4.44 billion. The average yen/dollar rate figure 141.04 yen 169.03 earlier. REUTER 

Year end March 31 Group shr 18.83 yen v 18.73 Net 20.07 billion v 18.47 billion Pretax 22.14 billion v 25.36 billion Operating 37.57 billion v 51.57 billion Sales 14762 billion v 15900 billion REUTER 

Japan's private sector machinery order exclude shipbuilding fell 10.4 pct April March seasonally adjust 663.8 billion yen rise 17.6 pct March government's Economic Planning Agency said. April order rise 2.0 pct earlier 22.6 pct year-on-year rise March agency spokesman told Reuters. Seasonally adjust private sector order exclude shipbuilding electric firm fell 7.5 pct April March 517.4 billion yen 5.7 pct rise March February. April order fell 1.3 pct earlier unchanged March. The April drop due mainly 12.9 pct decrease order machine tool industry 15.3 pct drop order car maker spokesman said. REUTER 

Senior U.S. Officials look Japan buttressing economy event American recession Japanese government source said. During visit U.S. Earlier month Economic Planning Minister Tetsuo Kondo U.S. Federal Reserve chairman Paul Volcker Council Economic Advisers chairman Beryl Sprinkel Japan U.S. Enters recession year. Although Sprinkel indicate personally expect recession Volcker acknowledge economic downturn possibility source said. Faced huge budget deficit U.S. Has little manoeuvre fiscal policy counteract downturn occur 1988. It hamstrung monetary policy concerned U.S. Inflation already show sign pick source said. But Japan limited action counteract U.S. Recession run risk overstimulating domestic economy push inflation source said. Money supply growth accelerate rate record low levels. In May M-2 money supply plus certificate deposit grow year-on-year rate 10.2 pct above nominal GNP growth five pct. Some government source worried recently announce 6000 billion yen emergency economic package push land price construction sector's inflation. Public investment spending grow year-on-year rate 10 pct April accelerate 20 pct impact emergency package source said. The 6000 billion yen package generally receive U.S. Although U.S. Congressmen businessmen told Kondo want measure implement quickly source said. The Japanese minister explain acceleration work spending package take immediately said. U.S. Congressmen particularly interested impact package reduce bilateral trade imbalance question Kondo unable answer clearly economic uncertainty involve source said. While recognize Japan's trade surplus fall term volume Congressmen express concern fall fast enough. But source press Kondo far rise yen solution correct bilateral trade imbalance. REUTER 

Japan lend 27.17 billion yen Indonesia share equally World Bank 7.25 billion yen loan Bolivia effort Third World country Foreign Ministry spokesman said. The lending line Japan's plan contribute 20 billion dlrs develop countries. Both loan development spokesman told Reuters. He decline name terms. REUTER 

J Sainsbury PlcSNB.L> agree control U.S. Shaw's Supermarkets Inc combination share purchase tender offer 30 dlrs share. Sainsbury bought 21 pct stock 1983. It U.S. Subsidiary Chene Investments Inc bought 2.55 mln common share control Davis yesterday 30 dlrs share 76.5 mln dlrs lift stake 49.4 pct. A tender offer outstanding share launch 30 dlrs share maximum far cost 184.4 mln. The Shaw's Board Davis agree accept offer assure Sainsbury's total hold 74.0 pct. The company allot 20.18 mln ordinary share Warburg Securities Ltd> sufficient finance 188 mln dlrs maximum 261 mln dlrs payable. Shaw's operates chain 49 supermarket Massachusetts Maine New Hampshire 1986 produce sale 1.1 billiob dlrs pretax profit 31.1 mln. At 1986 net asset 88 mln dlrs. Last September Sainsbury's increase stake Shaw's 28.5 pct. In March 21 report rise pretax profit 246.9 mln stg 192.7 mln sale increase 4.04 billion 3.58 billion. Sainsbury share fall five penny announcement 590p night's close unmoved news deal. REUTER 

C. Itoh Co Ltd CITT.T> net profit end March 31 1988 expect unchanged earlier. The prediction assumes yen/dollar rate 140 yen crude oil price 18 dlrs barrel company spokesman told Reuters. Sales 1987/88 estimate 15100 billion yen 2.3 pct earlier. The company earlier report net profit 20.07 billion yen end March 31 1987 8.6 pct earlier help drop sale administration cost reduce charges. REUTER 

Union Bank Switzerland (Securities) Ltd lead manage sale 25000 bearer share Sandoz Ltd. The share close Zurich yesterday 12100 Swiss franc each. Final term June 25. The sell concession pct management underwriting pay 3/4 pct. REUTER 

Parent shr loss 15.85 yen v profit 2.02 Interim div nil v nil Net loss 12.92 billion v profit 1.65 billion Current loss 12.52 billion v profit 4.44 billion Operating loss 8.76 billion v profit 6.52 billion Sales 443.90 billion v 528.03 billion Outstanding shrs 815.10 mln v 814.97 mln REUTER 

Isuzu Motors Ltd ISUM.T> plan import car General Motors Corp GM.N> Japan Isuzu spokesman told Reuters. The Japanese daily Yomiuri Shimbun report Isuzu decide import car directly GM. Each month Isuzu's domestic distributor sell five 10 car GM's Buick Chevrolet Oldsmobile range. The car supply Yanase Co Ltd Japanese importer distributor. Isuzu own 38.6 pct GM. REUTER 

The navy unload foodgrains Chittagong port follow strike nearly 1000 dockworker Bangladesh Shipping Corp official said. The navy unload 74000 tonne foodgrains ship vessel laden 90000 tonne grain wait outer anchorage port official said. A spokesman worker continue strike authority agree demand high pay benefits. The strike June 11. "Unloading grain essential commodity start normally call navy personnel help" port official told Reuters. "The strike cause serious dislocation" said. The government meanwhile declare port job "essential service" striker dismiss unless strike soon. REUTER 

Fujitsu Ltd ITSU.T> developed simulation processor operate faster computer speed development generation computer spokesman told Reuters. The simulation processor halve need fault test million basic logic circuit incorporate late computer said. It simulate operation 530 mln logic element maximum 64 processor interconnected. The simulation processor develop market said. REUTER 

The joint committee Taiwan's soybean importer award contract Cargill Inc Minneapolis Minnesota supply 32000 tonne cargo U.S. Soybeans committee spokesman told Reuters. The cargo price 249.10 U.S. Dlrs tonne c f Taiwan delivery July 7 said. The committee cancel tender cargo price offer U.S. Suppliers added. REUTER 

The chairman Life Insurers Association told press conference insurance company increasingly diversify investment U.S. Bonds protect themselves currency swing association spokesman said. Terumichi Tsuchida Japanese investment U.S. Bonds decrease drastically Life insurer increasingly place fund currency include bond Canadian dlrs European currency told conference. REUTER 

The government cut consumer rice price official producer price reduce month Tetsuo Kondo director government's Economic Planning Agency (EPA) told reporters. Kondo cabinet meeting consumer receive benefit fall cost rice farm due strong yen low oil prices. Agriculture Ministry source producer rice price paid rice farmer cut discussion Rice Price Council advisory body ministry July 1 2. The consumer rice price usually December. REUTER 

Boeing Co BA> statement yet official Japanese government report crash Japan Air Lines (JAL) Boeing 747 520 died. However agree earlier draft report accident cause incorrect repair remain undetected schedule inspections. The final report release faulty repair plane 1978 Boeing inadequate inspection Transport Ministry inspector cause 1985 crash bad single air disaster aviation history. Boeing believe similar accident occur foreseeable operating condition test provide equipment plane plane already service ensure happen again. REUTER 

Japan avoid sharp rise value yen dollar Japan U.S. And nation succeed restructuring economy advisory panel government's Economic Planning Agency (EPA) said. The advisory body report yen soar dollar structural adjustment global basis delayed. An EPA official told Reuters dollar fall slightly below 100 yen 1993 Japan U.S. Failed restructure economies. The dollar's fall structural adjustment cut Japan's current account surplus pct gross product (GNP) 1993 report said. It change slow real GNP growth average pct annually seven-year period 1993. If nation restructure economy dollar remain stable real term reduce Japan's current-account surplus 2.1 pct GNP 1993. This scenario Japan's GNP growth 3.5 pct year. It forecast real growth pct economy pct Japan 2000 adjustment made. REUTER 

Japan try harder reduce trade surplus yen renew upward pressure Economic Planning Minister Tetsuo Kondo. He told press luncheon hop Japan cut current account surplus 10 billion dlrs reduce 50 60 billion dlrs. In fiscal end March 31 surplus total 93.76 billion dlrs 4.5 pct GNP. The 6000 billion yen economic stimulation package government unveiled late month slash Japan's current account surplus five six billion dlrs said. REUTER 

The loophole Swiss banking supervision close step-by-step manner Swiss National Bank Vice-President Markus Lusser said. The integration financial market blur distinction bank bank-like finance company vary degree regulation sector destablizing effect told Association Foreign Banks. "It market participant institute (finance companies) brought soon banking supervision" remark prepared delivery association's annual meeting. It bring finance company banking law undermine Switzerland financial marketplace Lusser said. "It decisive future succeed attract hold wide variety bank financial intermediary financial experts" said. Lusser urge great harmonization regulatory practice country view integration market internationalization banking business. REUTER 

The Tokyo stock market probably significant gain week suffer temporary correction broker said. Dashed hope far cut Japan's 2.5 pct discount rate cut grow conviction dollar remain firm yen near-term create measure uncertainty market's future broker said. "Everybody try exactly on" broker Sanyo Securities Co Ltd. "There lot confusion" added. This uncertainty spotlight violent swing stock price days. Today 225-share average end 462.43 point low 25288.12. "People expect correction week. They don't care market fall 24000" Sanyo broker said. "There money wait market fill correction." Tokyo stock price owe major two-year bull run repeat cut discount rate diverts money bank deposit stock market cut cost borrowing boost domestic demand imports. "Fund manager restructuring investment portfolio sell domestic-related issue include exporters" Prudential Bache Securities' Hank Sawa. Tokyo-based foreign exchange dealer predict dollar unlikely fall sharply near term convincing stock market investor buy electronics precision instrument machinery export-oriented manufacturing share broker said. "Some await result propose protectionist U.S. Trade legislation July clue currency direction" broker Daiwa Securities Co Ltd said. REUTER 

Thailand's major tin exporter producer Thailand Smelting Refining Co> (Thaisarco) unable meet overseas order insufficient supply tin concentrate Thai mines. Local mine cut combine daily tin concentrate sale Thaisarco Royal Dutch/Shell Group RD.AS> unit 20 tonne earlier month previous 40 45 tonne average commercial manager Yoot Eamsa-ard told Reuters. He cut result government decision temporary municipal tax reduction export tin lapse June 3. The tax levy tin mine rise 4.4 pct month 1.1 pct ad valorem past year. The low level introduce temporary move aid tin industry price collapse late 1985. Yoot Thaisarco dig stock meet portion overseas order average 100 tonne day. As result Thailand fail fill 3000 tonne 19000 tonne tin export quota allocate Association Tin Producing Countries (ATPC) end February 1988. Reduced tin export cause ATPC allocate low quota Yoot said. The supply shortage prove temporary Thai cabinet expect review Mineral Resources Department proposal reinstate low tax late month Yoot said. The department Thailand export 7715 tonne tin January/May compare 8462 tonne ago. REUTER 

Olympus Optical Co Ltd OOPT.T> predict parent company current profit 5.50 billion yen end October 31 1987 12 pct earlier assume yen/dollar rate 147 yen half company spokesman told Reuters. Sales 1986/87 estimate 122 billion yen 0.9 pct earlier. But net profit fall 71.7 pct billion yen 1986/87 earlier company 10.59 billion net profit due sale real estate asset worth seven billion yen spokesman said. The precision instrument maker retain 13 yen dividend 1986/87 spokesman said. It earlier report parent company net profit 1.34 billion yen six month end April 30 85.5 pct earlier sale 60.92 billion 0.1 pct. The poor net mainly due fall 45 mln yen extraordinary profit half 7.70 billion profit earlier due mainly sale assets. The drop half sale due yen's rise dollar cut sale 4.30 billion yen. The dollar average 157 yen 192 earlier. REUTER 

Isuzu Motors Ltd ISUM.T> forecast parent company net loss 15 billion yen end October 31 1987 3.98 billion loss earlier assume yen/dollar rate 140 yen spokesman said. Sales 1986/87 estimate 910 billion yen 10.2 pct earlier. The automaker earlier report parent company net loss 12.92 billion six month end April 30 1987 1.65 billion yen profit earlier sale 443.90 billion 15.9 pct earlier. The poor half performance due yen's rise dollar cut 84.27 billion yen sale spokesman said. The average yen/dollar rate rise 158 yen half 207 earlier. First half car export fell 68445 82093 earlier mainly due drop export U.S. While domestic sale rise 30643 29836. Truck export fell 108782 127903 two-year contract sell total 40000 truck China end domestic sale fell 55925 61954. The company estimate sale 207000 car 1986/87 5.2 pct earlier 339000 truck 9.8 pct spokesman said. He give estimate exports. REUTER 

French electronics La Telemecanique Electric TLMF.PA> expect 1987 consolidated profit remain steady 1986 level allow company pay high dividend chairman Jacques Valla told company's meeting. Valla outlook 1987 order increase seven pct. Telemecanique post consolidated net profit 236.8 mln franc 1986 compare 215.1 mln 1985 turnover 6.28 billion franc compare 6.10 billion. The paid dividend 57 franc compare 52.50 francs. REUTER 

Ceylon Petroleum Corp (CPC) decide renew one-year contract Abu Dhabi 480000 tonne Upper Zakum crude oil CPC official told Reuters. They CPC recommendation cabinet await approval. CPC's one-year contract Abu Dhabi expire May 31 want renew contract begin June 1 government sell price. Delivery determine course year. Last shipment parcel 120000 tonne 30000 tonne each. CPC official company agree Egyptian government supply 240000 tonne Gulf Suez crude delivery shipment government sell price. Last CPC bought 120000 tonne Gulf Suez C.Itoh. Officials plan buy 240000 tonne Basra Light Iraq finalise yet constraints. CPC accept 120000 tonne parcel propose lift 30000 tonne eight shipments. Iraq National Oil Co (INOC) told CPC Red Sea port lift accept ships. INOC propose deliver eight shipment 30000 tonne each. CPC INOC plan ship oil Indian port delivery Indian requirement Colombo offload CPC's need CPC consider unsuitable. CPC receive reply INOC December. Sri Lanka import annual need 1.7 mln tonnes. This plan buy 400000 tonne spot market compare 1.3 mln tonne year. REUTER 

Spain's private bank staff start half strike wage demand impact yet clear. Spokesmen main bank striker Madrid headquarters appear minority. They yet receive report branches. Unions call 160000 employee press cut work hour eight pct wage rise. Banks implement 4.75 pct wage increase month. REUTER 

The Norwegian company Konsgberg Vaapenfabrikk> (KV) sell technology defence equipment original deal 1982 senior justice official said. State prosecutor Tor-Aksel Busch told Reuters start fresh investigation state-owned arm firm deliver computer Soviet Union 1982 1983 near-silent submarine propellers. "There delivery equipment then" said. Reuter 

Japanese commercial creditor bank confirm earlier commitment extend 360 mln dlrs loan Argentina banking source said. The commitment represent 1.95 billion dlrs loan Argentina agree 350 bank worldwide April 24 source said. The 350 bank suppose confirm Argentina loan commitment June 17. About 91 pct already confirm intention source added. REUTER 

Liner shipping specialist Evergreen Marine Corp> Taiwan's large private company apply Security Exchange Commission month company spokeswoman told Reuters. She Evergreen double capital eight billion Taiwan dlrs August. "The capital increase boost operations" said. She Evergreen fund raise stock market buy ship step global services. The spokeswoman company post after-tax profit billion dlrs total revenue 20.46 billion compare after-tax profit 1.18 billion revenue 17.99 billion 1985. Evergreen place newbuilding order 3428-teu (twenty-foot equivalent unit) fully cellular container ship state-owned China Shipbuilding Corp> delivery late 1988. Evergreen fleet 66 container vessel total mln dwt spokeswoman said. REUTER 

Ciba-Geigy AG CIGZ.Z> acquire minority stake British cereal breeding company New Farm Crops Ltd>. It statement British company's skill apply plant breeding assist Ciba-Geigy apply result biotechnology research enable extend activity seed crop wheat barley. New Farm Crops Horncastle Lincolnshire access Ciba-Geigy's agricultural research resource especially biotechnology. REUTER 

South Africa record annualised real growth GDP 3.25 pct quarter economy achieve government's target pct growth 1987 Reserve Bank said. The South African central bank quarterly bulletin confidence economy improve January May 31 high gold price rise nation's gold foreign currency reserve improvement rand's exchange rate 50 U.S. Cents. It note growth rate slow 4.5 pct third fourth quarter year. It cite debt recheduling agreement reach international creditor March evidence improve foreign perception South African economy. The accord effectively extends moratorium repayment 13 billion dlrs South Africa's short term foreign debt. Total foreign debt 23 billion dlrs. South Africa record seasonally adjust annualised surplus current account balance payment 7.43 billion rand quarter compare surplus 7.24 billion rand 1986. The bank ninth consecutive current account surplus start 1985. REUTER 

The World Bank issue 100 mln Australian dlr bond due July 20 1992 pay 13-3/8 pct price 101-7/8 pct lead manager Hambros Bank Ltd said. The non-callable bond available denomination 1000 10000 Australian dlrs list Luxembourg. The sell concession 1-1/4 pct management underwriting combine pay 5/8 pct. The payment date July 20. REUTER 

Dutch seasonally adjust industrial production fell 6.4 pct April compare previous month 5.5 pct period figure official Statistics Bureau CBS show. The April index base 1980 stood 103. In March industrial production rise 2.8 pct February. The unadjusted April index figure fell 14 pct March 104 compare 10 pct rise March February. REUTER 

Net receipt U.K. Building society May fell 521 mln stg 727 mln April compare 500 mln May 1986 figure Building Societies Association show. Association director-general Mark Boleat statement satisfied May figure view call investor funds' generate privatisation Rolls-Royce Plc approach call partly-paid British Gas Plc shares. Boleat recently announce cut mortgage rate suggests continuation buoyant demand. He note building society net receipt usually decline seasonally summer approaches. The British Gas call fell June 9 affect building society inflow May June. Gross retail receipt May unadjusted withdrawal 7.46 billion stg 6.63 mln April 5.60 billion May year. The net inflow fund wholesale market May 317 mln stg 188 mln April 249 mln May 1986. REUTER 

Compagnie Industriali Riunite (CIR) Citicorp Investment Bank Ltd arrange 200 mln dlr syndicate loan facility final maturity seven Citicorp said. Continental Illinois Ltd Dai-Ichi Kangyo Bank Ltd coordinator facility name CIR International S.A. Luxembourg guaranteeed Compagnie Industriali Riunite SpA. Banks able terminate participation five six subject prior notice. There availability period 12 month commitment fee 0.0625 pct annum payable undrawn amounts. Interest drawn loan 0.15 pct London Interbank Offered Rate. The borrower hold company Carlo di Benedetti's various company include Ing C. Olivetti EC SpA. REUTER 

Canada's consumer price index rise 0.6 pct May 137.8 base 1981 follow 0.4 pct rise April 0.5 pct rise May 1986 Statistics Canada said. The May year-on-year rise 4.6 pct compare 4.5 pct rise April. Reuter 

West German producer price rise 0.1 pct May compare April stand 2.9 pct low May Federal Statistics Office said. In April producer price fell 0.3 pct March drop 3.6 pct level earlier. The Statistics Office producer price liquefy gas fell 10 pct May April heavy heating oil price decline 5.3 pct lead price rise 23 pct silver price increase 13 pct. REUTER 

Japanese oil company start campaign market 100 octane gasoline meet grow domestic demand high quality motor fuel oil source said. Ten company plan offer unleaded gasoline summer start Idemitsu Kosan Co Ltd> June 20. Showa Shell Sekiyu KK SHOL.T> introduce Formula Shell 98 octane gasoline Japanese market January year. Formula Shell achieve strong sale Japan despite high price regular octane gasoline prompt oil firm offer rival product source said. "We receive response consumer Formula Shell term smoother ride effective fuel consumption" Showa Shell said. Shell's product sell 145 yen litre 15 yen high regular gasoline already achieve 38 pct share Japan's octane gasoline market said. High octane gasoline account 25 pct Shell's total gasoline sale Japan added. Idemitsu hope raise octane sale 20 pct total gasoline sale seven pct immediately launch Idemitsu 100. Nippon Oil Co Ltd NPOL.T> launch 100 octane gasoline July 1 aim increase octane sale 20 pct six pct total gasoline sales. The rush compete octane gasoline market share spur expectation government lift gasoline production quota restriction gasoline station construction years. "Major oil company try boost gasoline sale network ahead propose lift gasoline production quotas" official major oil company said. An advisory panel Ministry International Trade Industry (MITI) recommend week government press ahead deregulation oil industry include lift gasoline production quota oil company increase international competitiveness. Japan's big gasoline marketer Nippon Oil Idemitsu Showa Shell suffer supply shortage production quota guideline fiscal 1986 end March. Domestic gasoline demand 2.5 pct previous accord MITI report. REUTER 

Standard Poor's Corp yesterday affirm AAA senior debt A-1-plus commercial paper National Westminster Bank Plc NWBL.L>. The AA long-term A-1-plus short-term certificate deposit National Westminster Bank USA affirmed. S P cite bank's decision increase provision sovereign debt exposure 466 mln stg. The action raise total provision 35 country payment difficulty 29.8 pct 13 pct S P said. S P put bank's debt coverage line international peers. REUTER 

Standard Poor's Corp affirm AAA senior debt A-1-plus commercial paper National Westminster Bank Plc NWBL.L>. The AA long-term A-1-plus short-term certificate deposit National Westminster Bank USA affirmed. S P cite bank's decision increase provision sovereign debt exposure 466 mln stg. The action raise total provision 35 country payment difficulty 29.8 pct 13 pct S P said. S P put bank's debt coverage line international peers. REUTER 

The propose 500 mln Hong Kong dlr transferable loan facility South China Morning Post Co Ltd> unit News Corp Ltd NCPA.S> raise 888 mln dlrs lead manager Manufacturers Hanover Asia Ltd said. The loan time oversubscribed syndication 1.2 billion dlrs raised. Manufacturers Hanover Asia lead manager Amsterdam-Rotterdam Bank Bank Tokyo Westpac Banking Corp contribute 36 mln dlrs. There 33 manager seven co-managers. Allotments manager invite contribute 40 mln dlrs cut 20 mln dlrs co-managers invite contribute 25 mln dlrs reduce 12 mln dlrs. The five-year loan facility 3-1/2 grace period borrow name South China Morning Post Finance Ltd guaranteed News Corp. Interest 1/2 percentage Hong Kong interbank offer rate rise 5/8 thereafter. REUTER 

The British Printing Communication Corp PlcBPL.L> consider sell specialist packaging label operation spokeswoman said. She give date price transaction unit sell negotiation. She decline turnover profit figure packaging label operation beyond say profitable. They form self-contained overall said. Analysts packaging label division sell 150 mln stg. Earlier week chairman Robert Maxwell expect float Mirror newspaper subsidiary bought Reed International Plc REED.L> 100 mln stg 1984. The spokeswoman BPCC intend keep majority share newspaper floated. BPCC currently lock legal battle result attempt U.S. Publisher Harcourt Brace Jovanovich Inc HBJ>. Earlier week BPCC launch two-for-three right issue raise 640 mln stg money raise enable renew assault Harcourt. It express Dutch publisher Kluwer NV KLUW.AS>. REUTER 

The Indian State Trading Corp (STC) report take parcel 5000 tonne palm olein yesterday's weekly vegetable oil tender trader said. All August shipment 364 dlrs tonne cif. India pass material added. REUTER 

Philippines' Board Investments (BOI) approve guideline make car await rule tax component programme trade industry secretary Jose Concepcion said. He authority decide tax levy locally-assembled cars. The car development programme replaces earlier scheme design limit car manufacturer local market. The scheme unveiled month. The accredit local car manufacturer Pilipinas Nissan Inc> get car kit Nissan Motor Company Ltd NSAN.T> Philippine Automotive Manufacturing Corp> get supply Mitsubishi Corp MITT.T>. Three company pull due poor market condition Ford Philippines subsidiary Ford Motor Co F> General Motors Pilipinas subsidiary General Motors Corp GM> Delta Motors Corp>. Toyota Motor Corp TOYO.T> foreign partner Delta Motors apply programme negotiate purchase Delta's assembly plant. Concepcion decline car assembler allow operate require finance 75 pct foreign exchange need import completely-knocked-down kits. The balance provide central bank said. The trade minister chairman BOI programme intend develop car part industry require car firm locally-made spare parts. He plan keep car price "reasonable levels." Tax currently account 40 pct total cost car. REUTER 

The propose 250 mln U.S. Dlr syndicate loan National Aluminium Co Ltd> Nalco India increase 300 mln dlrs due over-subscription lead manager Chemical Asia Ltd said. The 10 loan six grace period tranches. Tranche A 279 mln dlrs carry 1/4 percentage London interbank offer rate (Libor) six rise 3/8 thereafter. A total 124 mln dlrs raise syndication tranche A originally 229 mln dlrs. The remainder provide lead managers. There 15 lead manager six manager eight co-managers 14 participant conventional tranche. The 21 mln dlr Belgian tax-spared tranche carry basis Libor throughout life. Funds provide Bank Yokohama Credit Lyonnais Mitsui Trust Banking Co Ltd Saitama Bank. REUTER 

A meeting European Community (EC) farm minister unlikely held week follow ministers' failure agree 1987/88 farm price package yesterday EC Commission spokesman said. However rule meeting altogether note decision Belgium currently hold presidency EC council ministers. The farm minister meet parallel meeting EC head government Brussels June 29 30 diplomat noted. The minister end three-day meeting Luxembourg split question oil fat tax West Germany say veto key aspect EC Commission proposal actual common price change revision "green money" system. The Commission spokesman announcement likely appear EC's Official Journal day give notice Commission's intention emergency measure July 1 minister fail reach accord. However Commission source notice detail measure take consider Commission regular weekly meeting Wednesday. The Commission publish declaration EC Farm Commissioner Frans Andriessen Luxembourg yesterday agriculture ministers' meeting. In Andriessen serious threat function Common Agricultural Policy. Andriessen add "The Commission...Will measure necessary temporary management market healthy finance policy." "This mean protective measure apply necessarily context power dynamic character" said. REUTER 

A 24-hour strike Belgian employee protest government pay offer disrupt transport hit ferry service shipping port union official said. Some cross-Channel ferry service Ostend cancel local news agency Belga said. An Antwerp port authority spokesman electrician support reduce ship movement trickle. Unions Ghent major Belgian port hit. Few train run morning flight Sabena Belgian's airline cancelled. Reuter 

De Laurentiis Film Partners LP pay initial quarterly dividend 37.3 ct unit holder record June 30 payable 90 day date. The partnership De Laurentiis Entertainment Group Inc DEG> own third share defer share payout maximize fund available partnership future film investments. Reuter 

Qtly div 24 ct v 23 ct prior Pay July 28 Record June 30 Reuter 

Augat Inc retain investment banker Wertheim Schroeder Co Inc explore mean company maximize shareholder value. The company pressure take action specific situation opportunity. Reuter 

De Laurentiis Film Partners LP DFP> De Laurentiis Entertainment Group Inc DEG> charge five mln 6500000 dlrs repsectively film "Million Dollar Mystery" due disappoint box office results. Reuter 

China resume repair Soviet ship 23 break cause ideological split countries. The New China News Agency agreement resume sign side Wednesday Shanghai Soviet commercial vessel repaired. The China Daily Soviet ship repair China 1964 left port Dalian Xingang month. Bi Yueran manage director China State Shipbuilding Corp's ship repair department told newspaper Soviet Union lack adequate repair facility 600 ship deployed east. Bi China's yard offer competitive price guaranteed quality prompt delivery. Reuter 

Volkswagen AG VOWG.F> negotiation Toyota Motor Corp TOYO.T> joint production accord reach "an advanced stage." An announcement agreement assemble Toyota Hi Lux truck VW's Hanover plant expect week industry source close VW said. The Financial Times newspaper quote VW manage board chairman Carl Hahn say company agree produce tonne pick-up truck 1988. Reuter 

King World Productions Inc start tender offer 4100000 common share 28 dlrs each. In newspaper advertisement company offer proration period withdrawal right expire July 17 unless extended. The offer condition receipt minimum shares. King World King officer director together 46 pct stock agree tender share offer sell 3465085 share King January 1988 28 dlrs each. King World 30.8 mln share outstanding. The company tender shareholder elect receive payment share January immediately tax purposes. King pay offer price interest. Reuter 

Cablevision Systems Corp agreement buy CBS Inc CBS> Washington Post Co partnership interest regional sport service value 56.2 mln dlrs. It sport service manage Rainbow Program Enterprises expect close year. The service include SportsChanel Associates (New York) SportsChannel PRISM Associates (Philadelphia) SportsChannel Chicago Associates SportsChannel New England Limited Partnership. Reuter 

U.S. Exports edible groundnut fall 185000 tonne September 1987 248000 1986 period trading company Tracomin SA said. It revise December 1986 forecast export total 205000 tonne cite low demand loss U.S. Market share main import country Britain Netherlands sale nut intend export premium U.S. Domestic market. Tracomin estimate export availability 1986 crop 215000 tonne compare 264000 previous year. Tracomin expect 1987 U.S. Groundnut crop forecast resurgence U.S. Exports year. "Barring market manipulation U.S. Harvest 1987 lead attractive price active trading reappearance U.S.A world's lead producer peanuts" said. Overall export China lead exporter remain exceptionally level despite quality complaint difficulty implement earlier high-priced contracts. It China retain current market share 1988 Tracomin said. REUTER 

U.S. Budget Director James Miller President Reagan veto Democrat-controlled Congress' budget plan -- offer compromise raise revenues. "If budget come vetoed I tell that" Miller morning television show. He Reagan accept 19 bln dlr tax increase Congress' proposal "keep president propose revenue budget. "They're taxes" Miller said. "They user charge asset sales. I sit talk Democrats about." Miller believe compromise work administration assurance whatever compromise accepted indeed pass Congress. Miller interview believe U.S. protection 11 Kuwaiti tanker ship Persian Gulf require supplemental request Congress defense money. Reuter 

Divi Hotels N.V. board recommend shareholder approve payment initial dividend 12-1/2 ct share semi-annually. It dividend paid August February. Reuter 

Major Video Corp file registration statement cover propose offering 1.4 mln share common stock sell company. It Rauscher Pierce Refsnes Inc manage underwriter offering expect July proceeds finance development acquisition additional Major Video Superstores work capital. Reuter 

French domestic appliance maker Moulinex MOUP.PA> share continued fall Paris Bourse reach year's low amid controversy auditor's report 1987 profit forecast dealer said. A Moulinex spokesman "mutilated" copy report Paris auditor Syndex give poor impression company's prospect cause stock fall sharply. Meanwhile Moulinex communique stood April forecast 1987 parent company net loss 41.7 mln franc v 226 mln loss 1986. The spokesman 50 page 200-page report commission Moulinex's staff/management committee circulate Parisian stockbrokers. The Syndex report company's 1987 target difficult achieve thereby cause Moulinex stock drop 13 franc day 75.10 franc share. A Syndex spokesman yesterday auditor "shocked" leak confidential document attribute "malicious intentions." Several Paris broker likely corporate "raiders" interested takeover bid Syndex report bring share price. Moulinex share fluctuate considerably begin takeover rumour reach 122 francs. Group president Jean Mantelet 87 February intend transfer 42 pct stake Moulinex company's employees. However company statement issue management buy-out options. The rest group's equity held private investor March Scovill Inc> U.S. Sold 20 pct hold company. REUTER 

Swissair SWSZ.Z> revenue pct April compare earlier cost depreciation cut six pct. Traffic rise seven pct April compare earlier overall load factor increase percentage 61 pct. Passenger load factor rise 60 pct 59 pct. REUTER 

Chancellor Exchequer Nigel Lawson current low unit wage cost help British export wage rise "faster comfortable." He hop yesterday's Organisation Economic Cooperation Development (OECD) forecast increase wage rise wrong say OECD prediction "are somewhat unreliable." "Productivity rise fast therefore wage faster comfortable actual unit cost labour...Is fast all" Lawson answer question BBC radio. "That reason we're do export market example unemployment faster moderate rate growth wage increases" Lawson added. His remark follow yesterday's news underlie average earnings rise 7.75 pct annually April March's 7.5 pct increase sent U.K. Government bond market low help trigger inflation worries. Lawson update economic forecast U.K. Until traditional Autumn Statement economy. Lawson drawn whether cut basic rate tax current 27 pct 25 pct budget due March 1988. "We certainly achieve sooner later" said. The late official data release yesterday show unit wage cost manufacturing industry rise 0.9 pct annually month period end April 1.2 pct rise quarter sharply below year's quarter growth rate 7.8 pct. However analyst figure likely deteriorate somewhat productivity growth slows year. REUTER 

quantum corp charge 3500000 dlrs due decision discontinue Q160 160 megabyte disk drive cause loss quarter end June 28. The company expect high revenue period however. Quantum earn 22.2 mln dlrs revenue 121.2 mln dlrs year's quarter. Quantum eliminate 29 staff position result cancellation Q160 redirection product development efforts. The company modify plan project concentrate core disk drive development high performance low-cost small drive particularly 3-1/2 inch drives. Reuter 

Merrill Lynch Co Inc initial offering six mln limited partnership preference unit Fine Homes International L.P. price 18 dlrs unit. In addition offering Fine Homes 1.5 mln preference unit employees. Merrill Lynch continue 21 mln subordinate units. Fine Homes involve residential real estate relocation management related mortgage banking. Reuter 

Proven oil gas deposit Saudi Arabia increase 1986 despite high oil output accord kingdom's main produce company Aramco. Recoverable oil reserve Aramco field rise 167 billion barrel 166.5 billion 1985 gas reserve jumped 7.7 pct 135.8 trillion cu ft 126.1 trillion company's annual report said. Aramco responsible Saudi production except 200000 barrel (bpd) Neutral Zone Saudi Arabia Kuwait increase production 4.69 mln barrel 1986 3.04 mln barrel earlier. Most 1986 virtual free-for-all production OPEC abandon restraint effort recapture share market. In process price collapse 28 dlrs barrel below nine dlrs organisation decide cut production September onwards. Saudi output 1985 low 1960s. Production natural gas liquid 1986 decline slightly 304178 bpd 316310 report carry official Saudi Press Agency. The increase reserve despite sharp cut well Aramco drill 33 1986 103 1985. Aramco's refinery Ras Tannurah process 142.44 mln barrel (390246 bpd) crude year. The plant upgraded capacity 530000 bpd enable supply 50 pct local demand oil product report said. The country's five small refinery -- own state-owned oil organisation Petromin -- produce 750000 bpd year. Sulphur production rise 1.23 mln tonne 1986 998707 tonne 1985. During company operating sulphur granule plant capacity 4000 tonne report said. Aramco award 1303 contract worth 1.4 billion riyal -- 370 mln dlrs. REUTER 

Bear Stearns Cos Inc BSC> offering mln currency exchange warrant Ford Motor Co's Ford Motor Credit unit underway 4.375 dlrs each. Each warrant allows holder receive Ford Credit cash value U.S. dollar purchase 50 dlrs price 7610 yen. Bear Stearns spot exchange rate yen dollar determine whether warrant cash value day. It warrant cash settlement value dollar worth 152.20 yen. The company warrant exercise expiration value dollar 152.20 yen warrant expire cash settlement value. It warrant exercisable immediately expire five warrant exercise automatically exercise July 1 1992. Bear Stearns currency warrant issue sell U.S. mln warrant issue General Electric Co's GE> General Electric Credit Corp unit June 10. Reuter 

Tri-Star Pictures Inc won permanent relief various provision 1952 Consent Judgment 1980 Order apply Loews' Theatre Circuit Tri-Star acquire December. It U.S. District Court Southern District New York agree permit exhibition Tri-Star motion picture loews theater allow Tri-Star conduct Loews free restructions court's earlier orders. Reuter 

Fidelcor Inc acquire substantial portion asset Bank New England Corp's Lazere Financial Corp subsidiary undisclosed terms. The company transaction include Lazere's loan portfolio asset include Lazere's Miami office. Reuter 

The South Korean government shortly issue statement warn unspecified emergency measure widespread protest demonstration continue radio said. Yesterday ten thousand demonstrator street Seoul city battling riot police demand resignation President Chun Doo Hwan. Reuter 

Budget Director James Miller President Reagan veto Democrat-controlled Congress' budget -- offer compromise raise revenues. "If budget come vetoed I tell that" Miller NBC's "Today" program. He Reagan accept 19 billion dlr tax increase Congress' proposal "keep president propose revenue budget. "They're taxes" Miller said. "They user charge asset sales. I sit talk Democrats about." Reuter 

A Circuit Court judge order company insured solvency International Medical Centres Inc show cause honour contract International accord Florida's Department Insurance file petition matter. As previously report International large health maintenance organization Florida declare insolvent May 14. Federal regulator told company Medicare contract terminate July 31 company's financial management problems. Michelle McLawhorn Florida Insurance Department spokeswoman International's insurer State Mutual Life Assurance Co America clear fight activation policy International provide accurate financial records. State Mutual reach comment. McLawhorn yet know creditor International debt was. The court give State Mutual 20 day show oblige pay claim solvency policy. Reuter 

Financial Benefit Group Inc agree sell mln share Class A common stock investment banker Fox-Pitt Kelton NV placement institutional private investor Britain Europe elsewhere. It offering expect fully subscribed proceeds mainly increase capital surplus wholly-owned Financial Benefit Life Insurance Co corporate purposes. Reuter 

DAF Finance Company NV plan 100 mln guilder commercial paper begin June 22. Amro bank arrange denomination mln guilder maturity range week years. Clearing Dutch central bank. DAF Finance subsidiary DAF BV newly establish hold company joint venture DAF Beheer NV U.K. Rover Group Plc. The finance lease activity term rent contract dealership financing. REUTER 

Philippine Long Distance Telephone Co call special shareholder meeting approve propose two-for-one stock split 20 pct stock dividend. The company meeting held July 15 shareholder record April 27 eligible vote. The company ask shareholder approve increase authorize common share 134 mln serial prefer stock 383 mln authorize sale billion peso debentures. Reuter 

Cargo handle company hire twice usual docker offset intermittent strike Spanish ports. Spanish docker nine-day strike Wednesday alternate hour protest government plan partially privatize port services. Reuter 

PNC Financial corp's Provident National Bank subsidiary increase weight bond investment portfolio due recent soften fixed-income markets. The bank shift debt equity mix balance portfolio 45 pct bonds/55 pct stock 40/60 reduce equity segment's cash reserve 25 pct 30 pct. It "Based continued valuation level stock market couple recent temporary weakness bond price relative attractiveness bond market high level 18 months." Reuter 

The Federal Home Loan Bank Board (FHLBB) place Investors Federal Bank El Reno Okla. receivership transfer 97.8 mln dlrs n asset Investors Savings Loan Association. An FHLBB statement fail thrift insolvent "had substantially dissipate assets" largely participate commercial real estate developments. It thrift violate federal law regulation loan documentation loan director apparent conflict interest. The sucessor organization federal saving loan association manage contract Sunwood Management Corp. Parker Colo. REUTER 

Mthly div nine ct v nine ct prior Pay Aug 14 Record July One Reuter 

Canada Post present strike letter carrier contract offer side little indication offer increasingly violent three-day-old walkout. The strike especially bitter Quebec federally regulate postal service brought replacement worker contravention provincial law prohibit hire strikebreakers. Canada Post letter carrier Chicoutimi Jonquiere Quebec damage mail sort room ripped telephone line letter rack overturn furniture threw mail floor walk join carrier city picket line. The rotate strike spread Atlantic province Vancouver. Carriers remain job Edmonton Vancouver postal employee Montreal Calgary Cornwall Ontario. About 20 arrest Eastern Canada striker scuffle police call escort replacement worker across picket lines. Letter Carriers Union Canada President Robert McGarry offer union's 20000 contain minor change soften agency's demand concessions. Canada Post official agency limited federal guidlines agency eliminate 160 mln dlrs deficit year. Reuter 

Chrysler Corp Electrospace Systems Inc agree acquire merger agreement Chrysler tender 27 dlrs share 100 pct Richardson Texas-based defense electronics contractor. It total cost Chrysler buy outstanding stock 367 mln dlrs. Electrospace Systems design develops installs communication electronic system equipment specialized need military commercial customer worldwide. Chrysler Electrospace Gulfstream operation grow military commercial aircraft sales. But plan merge Gulfstream Electrospace. Rather operate "sister companies" said. Chrysler tender offer expect begin June 25 manage First Boston Corp. For fiscal end April 3 1987 Electrospace Systems earnings 10 mln dlrs sale 191 mln dlrs. The company employ 2500 people. About 92 pct sale military. Reuter 

OPEC conference president Rilwanu Lukman expect week's ministerial meeting Vienna brief calm OPEC's current price production agreement slight review. "I expect meeting Vienna short calm" Lukman Nigerian oil minister told reporter ahead departure Sunday conference start June 25. "We already agreement slight review" Lukman said. The agreement reach session OPEC minister December pegged group's crude oil output 15.8 mln bpd half 1987 fix price 18 dlrs barrel. Since price risen 15 dlrs December above official OPEC level oil industry analyst firmly convince organisation maintain agreement keep market stable. "I myself believe OPEC tend position strengthen gain far" Lukman said. He decline current ceiling maintain raise 16.6 mln bpd third quarter 18.3 mln fourth provisionally agree December. "Whatever decision arrive guide collective keep market strong" said. He non-OPEC member Norway visit week ago pledge far cooperation significant members. Lukman heavy destocking consumer OPEC's fix price regime effect restock winter responsible current market strength. Reuter 

Qtly div 21 ct v 21 ct prior Pay Aug 14 Record July One Reuter 

Central Fund Canada Ltd file registration statement U.S. Securities Exchange Commission U.S. offering 3250000 unit consist class A share warrant. Central Fund specialized investment hold company net proceeds mainly buy gold silver bullion. The issue underwritten Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc Wood Gundy Inc. Reuter 

First Federal Savings Bank 274000 dlr 25 ct share writeoff secondary reserve Federal Savings Loan Insurance Corp third quartger end June 30. Reuter 

Qtly div five ct v five ct prior Pay July 10 Record June 30 Reuter 

Metropolitan Life Insurance Co> receive license operate health maintenance organization Rhode Island call MetLife HealthCare Network Rhode Island. Reuter 

The West German government stick agree timetable introduce tax cut worth 44 billion mark 1990 Chancellor Helmut Kohl said. Kohl told news conference "The tax reform realise agree coalition (last general) election" January. He leadership Christian Democratic party repeat support tax reform timetable meeting week. CDU vice-chairman Lothar Spaeth reiterate doubt whether reform feasible plan receive support party added. Kohl government intend decide autumn raise 19 billion mark need finance tax reform. Subsidies paid ail industry main target trim pay tax reform. But politician inside outside government express doubt make politically painful cut subsidies. REUTER 

Qtly div 30-1/2 ct v 30-1/2 ct prior Pay Aug 15 Record June 30 Reuter 

Becor Western Inc Davis Mining Manufacturing Inc> amend offer company. Becor cash portion offer remains unchanged 10.45 dlrs share principal amount debenture increase 3.50 dlrs 3.00 dlrs Becor share. The amend offer include 1.50 dlrs value survive corporation's 12.5 pct nonvoting cumulative prefer include previous offer reduces amount survive corporation's common held shareholder 55 pct 60 pct. Becor Western amend Davis Mining offer suject confirmation due diligence information. Becor discussion continue bidder identified. Again company expect discussion investor conclude shortly. At board evaluate exist offer Becor added. Reuter 

MTech Corp receive 33467 share Commercial Resources Corp response 10.25 dlr share tender offer 150000 shares. The company extend offer July 2. It expire yesterday. Reuter 

Deposit Guaranty National Bank add 8.1 mln dlrs loan loss reserve quarter cover potential foreign debt exposure Latin America. It action reduce quarter earnings Deposit Guaranty Corp bank's parent 60 ct share. It corporation profitable quarter strong earnings 1987. Following increase Deposit Guaranty loan loss reserve total 37 mln dlrs 1.9 pct total outstanding loans. Reuter 

An organization Tennessee Valley Authority industrial customer join TVA ask court prevent U.S. Department Energy witholding contract payment TVA. The Tennessee Valley Industrial Committee seek permission intervene TVA's federal district court lawsuit request DOE enjoin witholding payment due "minimum demand" provision TVA's contract supply electricity uranium enrichment facility Oak Ridge Tenn. Paducah Ky. Such provision obligate TVA available amount customer -- DOE -- agrees pay fix cost associate amount whether not. The committee represent 27 energy-intensive industry operation TVA service area. These industry DOE serve directly TVA oppose local distributors. The TVA DOE's intention announce week withhold increase percentage electric bill result revenue shortfall 250 mln dlrs force six pct rate increase customers. Reuter 

Xiox Corp change incorporation Delaware California. Reuter 

Qmax Technology Corp reorganize operating groups: Pharmaceutical Technology Group Cosmetic Technology Group Thermometry Technology Ltd. Reuter 

Shr loss 14 ct v loss 35 ct Net loss 3718908 v loss 6714372 Revs 22.8 mln v 14.4 mln Avg shrs 25.7 mln v 19.2 mln Nine mths Shr loss 1.02 dlrs v loss 1.46 dlrs Net loss 24.4 mln v loss 28.1 mln Revs 61.7 mln v 28.9 mln Avg shrs 23.8 mln v 19.2 mln Reuter 

C.O.M.B. Co Cable Value Network (CVN) unit reach agreement principle Tele-Communications Inc TCOM.O> extend current affiliation agreement seven-year term. C.O.M.B. direct mail video marketing company. Reuter 

OSHAP Technologies Ltd form joint venture Regional Investment Co Wallon Region Belgian government-controlled investment company. It agreement subject approval Israeli Controller Foreign Exchange. Under agreement OSHAP establish corporation OSHAP's operation Europe include manufacturing facility Antwerp Belgium distribution right OSHAP's product Europe. The newly form company acquire Regional Investment Co Walloon Region (SPIW) 88 pct Pegard Productics S.A. SPIW entitle receive Pegard 37 pct outstanding share company. In addition National Investment Co Belgium Belgium government control investment company chooses participate transaction entitle receive 4.7 pct stake company 12 pct Pegard. Reuter 

Chicago Mercantile Exchange floor trader commission representative guesstimate today's hog slaughter 265000 270000 versus 275000 week ago 248000 ago. Saturday's hog slaughter guesstimate 30000 45000 head. Cattle slaughter guesstimate 127000 130000 versus 132000 week ago 132000 ago. Saturday's cattle slaughter guesstimate 25000 40000 head. Reuter 

Investment banker Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc privately place 180 mln dlrs multi-class real estate mortgage investment conduit REMIC's Integrated Resources Inc's Capitol Life Insurance Co subsidiary. The company REMIC's place series 300 season multifamily commercial loan each. Reuter 

Senate majority leader Robert Byrd urge President Reagan negotiate Democratic-led Congress budget matters. He told reporter Reagan Republicans fail write budget expect final congressional approval week. He Reagan move "hobby horse" negotiation tax defence matter issue divide Reagan Democrats. Reagan veto bill implement suggest 19 billion dlrs 1988 tax budget. Reuter 

Digital Optronics Corp file initial offering 850000 common share expect price six 6.50 dlrs share underwriter lead Yorke McCarter Owen Bartels Inc Norris Hirshberg Inc. The company Acme-Cleveland Corp AMT> Digital Signal Corp investor Digital Optronics. make artifical vision sensor laser radar. Reuter 

The propose 500 mln Hong Kong dlr transferable loan facility South China Morning Post Co Ltd> unit News Corp Ltd NCPA.S> raise 888 mln dlrs lead manager Manufacturers Hanover Asia Ltd said. The loan time oversubscribed syndication 1.2 billion dlrs raised. Manufacturers Hanover Asia lead manager Amsterdam-Rotterdam Bank Bank Tokyo Westpac Banking Corp contribute 36 mln dlrs. There 33 manager seven co-managers. Allotments manager invite contribute 40 mln dlrs cut 20 mln dlrs co-managers invite contribute 25 mln dlrs reduce 12 mln dlrs. The five-year loan facility 3-1/2 grace period borrow name South China Morning Post Finance Ltd guaranteed News Corp. Interest 1/2 percentage Hong Kong interbank offer rate rise 5/8 thereafter. REUTER 

Qtly div 22 ct v 22 ct prior Pay July 10 Record June 29 Reuter 

Nippon Oil Fats Co Ltd issue 70 mln dlr equity warrant eurobond due July 15 1992 indicate coupon 1-3/8 pct par pricing lead manager Yamaichi International (Europe) Ltd said. The issue guaranteed Fuji Bank Ltd final term fix June 25. The sell concession 1-1/2 pct management underwriting combine pay 3/4 pct. The issue available denomination 5000 dlrs list Luxembourg. The payment date July 15 warrant exercisable July 29 1987 June 30 1992. REUTER 

Total Erickson Resources Ltd Consolidated Silver Standard Mines Ltd CDS.V> Total Erickson purchase Consolidated's interest Dome Mountain property 60000 Total Erickson share 70000 dlrs cash. The company property gold-bearing vein considerable exploration potential. Reuter 

Southern National Corp board approve increase dividend rate 78 ct 76 ct effective quarterly dividend declare July payable August One. Reuter 

Beta Phase Inc negotiate major sale SMArtClamp electronic intravenous infusion device. The company Sharp Memorial Hospital participate clinical test device order 100 SMArtClamps. Reuter 

National Computer Systems Inc agree acquire Deluxe Check Printers Inc's DLX> 38 pct stake Data Card Corp. National Computer plan issue 45 mln dlrs five subordinate convertible debenture purchase 3749401 share Data Card Deluxe. Completion propose transaction subject regulatory approval expect mid-July said. The debenture bear increase rate term 7.3 pct weight average rate convertible National Computer common stock 20 dlrs share said. Separately Deluxe Data Card investment longer fit strategy. Deluxe held Data Card 1975 provide fund Data Card buy Troy Computer Products Corp. In November 1986 Data Card plan sell Troy division. Reuter 

Canada's sweep tax reform package announce step towards fairer bold revamp tax structure expect economist leader said. "It's big step towards tax reform we've take years" Merrill Lynch Canada Inc chief economist Michael Manford told Reuters. "But lot change oppose brand system" added. Manford change introduce Finance Minister Michael Wilson simplify federal tax system. They represent evolutionary revolutionary reform. "Overall I timid step lead believe" said. Wilson's move increase money collect corporation cut individual tax "is probably acceptable shift" Bill James president Falconbridge Ltd international mining company. Wilson spread corporate tax increase fairly evenly across corporate sector James said. "So it's hit anyone hard remain competitive." Wilson speech House Commons Canada's tax need change compete sweep reform United States year. "The critical corporate Wilson move tax closer U.S. System" Manford said. The federal government increase tax paid corporation five billion dlrs five lower personal tax 11 billion dlrs period. Despite collect corporate tax Wilson able low tax rate individual company remove special tax exemption broadening tax base. Wilson's plan reduce capital cost allowance company write major investment spokesman hurt run. "That affect investment decision negatively" Laurent Thiebeault Canadian Manufacturers Association president. Tax analyst industry day ass impact capital cost allowance reduction years. As anticipate Canada's opposition party signal intend fight tax measure introduce Parliament months. "It's tax reform it's tax grab" Liberal leader John Turner. Turner label change federal sale tax "a money machine minister finance." Wilson broaden federal sale tax include additional product promise introduce broad-based multi-staged sale tax. "It's fair package Canadians quickly" New Democratic Party leader Ed Broadbent said. However economist Manford Wilson act wisely protect low income Canadians provide tax credit cut 850000 tax rolls. Reuter 

The wet cold weather shroud northern Europe recently real farmer yet spokeswoman France's large farm union FNSEA said. The bad weather affected northern France Mediterranean region need moisture. Sugar beet producer climatic condition cause difficulty yet problem lack sun weeks. The real fruit producer north consume fresh fruit excessive rain rot crop said. Reuter 

Microsemi Corp supplier semiconductor product assembly acquire operating asset Hybrid Components Inc> 2.2 mln dlrs cash. Microsemi purchase include fix asset software inventory technology intellectual property operation HCI. The company HCI continue operate Beverly plant subsidiary Microsemi. Reuter 

A target date mid-September signing package reschedule Nigeria's medium term sector debt outstanding letter credit claim Nigeria Barclays Bank Plc joint statement. The statement issue meeting sides. Barclays co-chairman commercial bank steer committee. The statement "Further progress 1986/87 reschedule medium term sector debt outstanding letter credit claims." REUTER 

Qtly div 15 ct v 15 ct previously Pay August One Record July 22 Reuter 

Theragenics Corp receive U.S. patent TheraSeed localize radiation therapy treatment prostate cancer effective June 23. It obtain product liability insurance Theraseed expect commercial sale distribution start July 15. Reuter 

President Reagan veto House-passed trade bill require mandatory retaliation "unfair trade" reach desk form. In statement White House meeting Senate Republicans legislation said: "I choice veto bill form." He measure "would move exactly wrong direction" towards tariff trade barrier trade distort subsidy slow growth crimped market destroy jobs. Reuter 

Sudan aside 781.6 mln dlrs service foreign debt 1987/88 accord budget plan present parliament. This compare 200 mln dlrs earmark debt repayment end June 30. Sudan foreign debt total 10.6 billion dlrs. Finance Minister Beshir Omar present plan parliament budget deficit 2.88 billion pound 2.85 billion 1986/87. He budget four-year economic recovery plan announce December. Of total aside debt service Omar 574.6 mln dlrs principal 207 mln payments. Sudan annual debt liability 900 mln dlrs Khartoum-based Western expert say. Omar March difficult "if impossible" Sudan meet schedule debt repayment 4.17 billion dlrs five years. He Sudan 2.6 billion dlrs arrears debt repayment half year. The expert Sudan owes 23 pct foreign debt Western government creditor 32 pct government Eastern bloc Arab country 21 pct commercial bank rest owe multilateral sources. Sudan unable fully service debt 1985 declare ineligible International Monetary Fund fresh loan service creditor ban extend fresh loan recipient arrears. Omar government revenue 1987/88 total 3.9 billion pounds. Expenditure 6.79 billion pounds. He budget deficit fully cover loan government deposit sources. Omar 375 mln pound spent subsidise sugar wheat flour price 1987/88. He Sudan's Western backer witholding aid agreement IMF reached. Sudan owes IMF 450 500 mln dlrs arrears schedule hold fresh talk Fund late July August reform economy clearing arrears. REUTER 

Ghana lift ban rice maize import due crop problem cause unusually dry weather official Ghana News Agency (GNA) report today. Secretary Finance Economic Planning Kwesi Botchwey announcement accept 7891 tonne rice worth mln dlrs Japanese food aid programme. The lift ban impose earlier follow government concern "lower average rainfall southern Ghana implication major harvest." Botchwey rain lack major cereal grow area throughout south year. The Ministry Agriculture predict fall 25 pct major staple crop include maize rice cassava. GNA quote Botchwey say consequence current reduce rainfall nowhere near drought experience 1982/83 government take step alleviate anticipate food production shortfalls. The failure seasonal rain already seriously affected drinking supply farm fishing part Central Volta region Ghana river dry up. Reuter 

Microtel fiber optic distance company plan low rate interstate plus dial 4.8 pct LaserPLUS WATS service 7.4 pct effective July 15. Reuter 

Bank England governor Robin Leigh-Pemberton lower rate fast jeopardise recent economic achievement U.K. In remark prepared delivery businessmen Birmingham prospective return real investment favourable relative financial asset years. "It surely foolish favourable conjuncture risk lower rate prematurely excessively" said. "We enjoy short-term boost activity risk damage return uncertainty acrimony inflation" added. Leigh-Pemberton recognise argue rate deter investment industry. "But forget ago intervene support sterling temporary difficulty persuade market pct increase base rate 11 pct sufficient tighten policy time" added. Base rate currently nine pct. REUTER 

There serious bid European Community market tender wheat barley EC farm minister agree 1987/88 farm price package trade source said. The failure farm minister week agreement result bid week's tender export subsidy trader bid unlikely uncertainty remains. One trader permanent damage export prospect avoid agreemend reach soon situation serious passes. However trader seem buyer lessen disruptive impact delay. Poland South Korea market feed wheat offer intervention grain special tender trader said. Reuter 

Period end May 31 Shr 42 ct v 53 ct Net 13600000 v 17100000 Revs 263.3 mln v 243.8 mln Reuter 

Period end May 31 Shr 42 ct v 53 ct Net 13600000 v 17100000 Revs 263.3 mln v 243.8 mln Reuter 

Qtly div 18 ct v 16.6 ct prior Pay July 20 Record June 30 NOTE: Prior payment adjust three-for-one stock split. In April company announce intention raise dividend. Reuter 

Healthcare Services America Inc chairman chief executive officer Charles Speir resign president chief operating officer Thomas Rodgaers Jr relieve duties. Michael Cronin chairman Michael Murphy act president chief executive officer company said. Cronin director company 1983 Murphy consultant compay Healthcare Services said. Reuter 

Shr 4.61 dlrs v 4.28 dlrs Net 663.3 mln v 590.8 mln Rev 4.03 billion v 4.06 billion Avg share 143.9 mln v 138.2 mln Reuter 

Qtrly 57 ct v 30 ct Pay July 15 Record June 30 NOTE: recent dividend base two-for-one stock split effect Wednesday June 17. Based pre-split share dividend 60 cts. Reuter 

GTE Corp Fiber Optic Products division award 250000 dlr minimum contract NYNEX Corp's NYN> Enterprise Co. The bulk agreement applies GTE's elastomeric glass tube splice product company fiber optic component include GTE's recently-introduced cleave tool installation kit. Reuter 

Alaska Micro Systems> Kaypro dealer Anchorage School District chose provide 116000 dlrs computer equipment Chugiak High School computer type classes. Reuter 

Period end April 30 Shr profit nil v loss eight ct Net profit 4000 v loss 213000 Sales 3668000 v 2602000 Year Shr loss 18 ct v loss 23 ct Net loss 482000 v loss 614000 Sales 12.5 mln v 13.6 mln NOTE: 1987 earnings period include provision unrealized loss marketable security 176000 dlrs Reuter 

Qtly div 8.5 ct v 8.5 ct prior Pay Aug Five Record July 20 NOTE: Federated Financial Savings Loan Association. Reuter 

Colonial Bancgroup agree buy First National Bank Destin> undisclosed sum. The company approve sale mark move acquire Florida bank. It sign letter intent buy Liberty Bank Pensacola April. Reuter 

Chrysler Corp intention increase offer Electrospace Systems Inc ELE>. Chrysler agree purchase Texas-based defense electronics contractor tender offer 27 dlrs share total value 367 mln dlrs. Eletrospace share close yesterday NYSE 30-1/8. "We intention increase offer" company spokeswoman said. "We believe adequate accepted." She propose transaction unanimously recommend board director principal shareholder Electrospace. Further note 27 dlrs tender offer price 50 pct above price Electrospace's share April 30 sale. Reuter 

Armco Northern Automatic Electric Foundry Co unit form joint venture company Stelco Inc STE.TO> unit Stelco Erie Corp. The company firm call M.E. International represent investment 15 mln dlrs company involved. They venture produce cast grind medium mill liner mining industry. The company venture include asset Evans Duluth Steel Castings Co bought Evans Asset Holding Co undisclosed sum. Reuter 

Computer Products Inc raise 35 mln dlrs offering convertible subordinate debenture due 1997 9-1/2 pct coupon par pricing sole manager Robinson-Humphrey Co Inc. The debenture convertible company's common stock 4.625 dlrs share represent premium 23.33 pct stock price term debt set. Non-callable issue rat B-3 Moody's CCC-minus Standard Poor's. The gross spread 38.75 dlrs sell concession 20 dlrs reallowance 10 dlrs. Reuter 

Federated Financial Savings Loan Association write FSLIC secondary reserve balance previously carry asset require Federal Home Loan Bank Board. The reduction income estimate 16 ct share company record profit third quarter end June 30. Federated elimination reserve affect ability pay dividend stockholder minimal impact annual profit fiscal end Sept 30 1987. Federated secondary reserve consists previous contribution FSLIC fund excess insurance premium accumulate earnings contributions. Reuter 

Northeast Savings board declare initial quarterly dividend 15 ct share payable August One record July 17. Reuter 

Network Security Corp major shareholder execute definitive agreement sell share Inspectorate International INSZ.Z> SA. The company previously-announced merger Inspectorate subject approval Network shareholders. Reuter 

Melamine Chemicals Inc> file initial offering 2800000 common share underwriter lead PaineWebber Group Inc PWJ>. The company sell 1400000 share rest sell Ashland Oil Inc ASH> First Mississippi Corp FRM> Melamine's shareholders. Proceeds build melamine plant buy exist plant Ashland First Mississippi special dividend Ashland First Mississippi. In Ashland Ky. Ashland Oil sell 700000 share First Mississippi 700000 Melamine. Reuter 

Qtly div 75 ct v 75 ct prior Pay July 14 Record June 30 Note:the company's full name American Federal Savings Loans Association Colorado Reuter 

More U.K. Lenders offering homebuyers fix rate mortgage borrower make monthly payment matter happens rates. And mortgage rate low level loan snap eager buyer try lock cheap money. The decision offer fix rate loan industry official reflect increasingly competitive nature mortgage business. While fix rate mortgage uncommon U.K. They mainstay U.S. Up ago. But 1980s rate soared. U.S. Lenders mostly saving loan association earn rate low pct 30 fix rate mortgage held portfolio pay depositor rate 15 pct induce retain accounts. As result hundred institution collapse force merge. The survivor decide offer mortgage whose rate move line cost funds. "We example U.S. Thrifts mind" spokesman Abbey National Building Society explain institution offering variable rate mortgages. The rash advertising solicit help homebuyers choosier loan lender concede force undercut more. Sharp cut variable rate mortgage announce earlier week nation's large building society National Westminster Bank Plc reflect grow competition official institution said. The fix rate mortgage offer carry rate below variable rate loans. "Of course profitable (variable rate) mortgages" spokesman Midland Bank Plc earlier earmark 500 mln dlrs fix rate mortgage loans. But bank willing offer profitable loan "It attract mortgage product." Trustee Savings Bank Plc (TSB) offering five fix rate mortgage 9.9 pct earlier year. The 100 mln stg TSB aside loan exhaust day accord spokeswoman. "Everybody love 10 pct mortgage" note five day bank loan equivalent 25 pct 1986 volume. In short appeal fix rate mortgage offer opportunity gamble direction rates. If rate fall mortgage lender earn above average return assets. But rate rise homebuyer won benefit cheap money. Household Mortgage Co plan offer 25 fix rate mortgage June 11 election assumption Conservative Party victory money market rate fall far accord Duncan Young manage director. Young explain company plan protect chance rise rate buying complicate hedge instrument. But money market rate risen contrary expectation company shelve plan being. He money market rate arrange mortgage hedge profitably. However Household Mortgage Co fix rate mortgage likely securitise them. This mean bundling mortgage together resemble bond sell investor. For technical reason securitisation simpler efficient fix rate float rate mortgages. In U.S. Where fix rate mortgage popular securitisation provide bulk mortgage money past years. REUTER 

Qtly div 8.5 ct v 8.5 ct Pay August five Record July 20 NOTE: Full company name Federated Financial Savings Loan Association. Reuter 

Texaco Inc's Texaco Canada raise posting Edmonton/Swann Hills crude 24 canadian ct barrel effective June 20. The company post Edmonton/Swann Hills 25.60 dlrs barrel. The price hike follow round crude oil price increase start late June 17 Sun Co. The major canadian crude supplier raise price June 18. Reuter 

Qtly div 25 ct v 22 ct prior qtr Pay 20 July Record 30 June Reuter 

Activision release version Paintworks Plus creativity self-expression call Version 1.01. The version Apple Computer Inc AAPL.O> Apple IIGS include variety feature function incorporate original Activision said. The company add register owner Paintworks Plus Version 1.01 free submit front cover manual proof-of-purchase. For sell 79.95 dlrs Activision said. Reuter 

Qtly div 10 ct v 10 ct prior qtr Pay 1 September Record 6 August Reuter 

Qtly div five ct v five ct prior Pay July 15 Record June 30 Reuter 

Norway's central bank reserve total 73.71 billion crown May 76.06 billion April 95.02 billion May 1986 Central Bank monthly report. Foreign exchange reserve total 70.3 billion crown compare 68.4 billion April 88.0 billion ago. Gold reserve unchanged April's 284.8 mln crown unchanged year-ago figure. Central Bank special draw holding 3.16 billion crown compare 3.06 billion April 2.51 billion May 1986. REUTER 

Rising level Rhine cause heavy rain delay operation near Karlsruhe raise sunken boat block river's main navigation channel week Karlsruhe authority spokesman said. He float crane unable begin lift sunken tug Orinoko lighter level reach 815 centimetre forecast rise 820-830 cm tomorrow. He unable operation begin. Meanwhile Cologne force vessel travel reduce speed authority spokesman Cologne said. But authority spokesman Duisburg 60 km north Cologne vessel move normally. Reuter 

Dutch authority course meet 1987 sector deficit target 7.9 pct net income (NNI) despite excess spending central government accord leak official report. The so-called Spring Report give late revenue expenditure figure discuss Dutch cabinet leak advance Dutch press. The Dutch Finance Ministry decline comment press reports. Newspapers quote report draft Finance Minister Onno Ruding say unexpected rise revenue compensate excess spending 3.1 billion guilders. Ruding put year's sector borrowing requirement 0.1 percentage below September's target 7.8 pct criticise excess spending seek additional spending cut 1987 surprise boost revenue report quote saying. Excess spending central government 2.8 billion guilder market factor account 300 mln unbudgetted expenditure. But 1987 revenue boost unexpected 3.55 billion include 1.9 billion tax revenue 500 mln guilder income natural gas sales. Ruding 1987 excess spending burden 1988 budget additional 1.9 billion cabinet already pledge 1.2 billion cut narrow gap. The cabinet discus come month far austerity measure need keep government target 1990 aim sector borrowing requirement 5.25 pct NNI. Ruding already met opposition Liberal Christian-Democrat faction carry government majority parliament call spending cut 1988 budget counter slow-down economic growth. REUTER 

The Federal Reserve likely add temporary reserve banking morning execute repurchase agreement economist said. The Fed face add volume reserve statement period offset drain cause rise Treasury balance Fed June 15 tax date. Most economist predict over-the-weekend repurchases. But small add requirement forecasting aggressive combination three- six-day repos. Fed fund trading 6-3/4 pct close yesterday's 6.81 pct average. Reuter 

Ford Motor Land Development Corp wholly own real estate subsidiary Ford Motor Co build 48000 square foot facility (Tokico America Inc) return long-term lease. Terms disclosed. Tokico automotive part robotics supplier subsidiary (Tokico Ltd) Japan. Ford Tokico's principal customer U.S. Reuter 

Standard Poor's Corp withdrew rating Caesars World Inc unit Caesars World Finance Corp. The action affect 230.8 mln dlrs debt. Withdrawn Caesars World's BB senior debt B-plus subordinate debt unit's B-plus subordinate debt. S P issue expect refinance Caesars World implement recapitalization plan. The agency assign B-plus rating Caesars World's propose 330 mln dlr issue seven-year senior note B-minus grade 330 mln dlrs subordinate debenture due 1999. Standard Poor's note recapitalization plan Caesars World call payment 26.25 dlr share dividend total 929.3 mln dlrs. The recapitalization plan finance seven-year note 12-year debenture issue 300 mln dlrs bank debt cash S P noted. The agency Caesars World's debt rise 1.1 billion dlrs 319.2 mln April 30 firm stockholders' deficit 508.8 mln dlrs. S P expect meaningful reduction debt years. Reuter 

Mthly div 3.9543 ct v 3.4261 ct month Payable July 15 Record June 30 Reuter 

The New York Stock Exchange Tesoro Petroleum reply comment unusual market activity rumor NYSE company's stock rise. The NYSE company issue statement indicate whether corporate development explain unusual activity. Tesoro's share rise 7/8 14-1/2 morning trading. Reuter 

Greyhound Lines> agree acquire route Trailways Corp>. Greyhound petition Interstate Commerce Commission authority acquire operate Trailways' route 450 1200 bus terminal garages. Trailways abandon service seven past half sevice company said. "Without intervention collaspe Trailways imminent" Fred Currey chairman president Greyhound. Reuter 

Mthly div 3.8784 ct v v 4.3742 ct prior Pay July 15 Record June 30 Reuter 

The American Stock Exchange start trading common stock Sherwood Group Inc today. Reuter 

Spain's socialist government aim restore confidence foreign bank generation sector push complete reform industry's tariff structure senior government official said. Most foreign bank refuse extend fresh loan mainly privately-owned sector Fuerzas Electricas de Catalunya S.A. (FECSA) major utility default billion dlrs foreign currency debt earlier year. Secretary State Economy Guillermo De la Dehesa told Reuters interview government-inspired tariff mechanism provide automatic increase guarantee term viability industry. He bill sent Spanish Cortes (parliament) summer enable tariff increase system. De la Dehesa decline technical detail scheme know "Marco Estable" (stable framework) future tariff increase failure past adjustment cover rise costs. "The utility company captive market assure satisfactory tariff structure world in" De la Dehesa said. FECSA's debt crisis cause concern foreign Spanish banker express fear utility company default lack fresh fund unless confidence industry's future restored. Spain's 14 lead utility massive debt short medium term exposure 4377 billion peseta year. A significant proportion foreign currency banker say. The tariff plan currently discuss representative utility industry Spanish banker shortly present foreign creditor De la Dehesa said. FECSA's problem precipitate February stock exchange suspend trading company's stock ground meet debts. "FECSA special case" De la Dehesa "but bank fright extend crisis rest utility sector. We really expect this." Much foreign bank lending utility sector strength government commitment international banker presentation London 1983 support industry. "I foreign bank lending basis declaration energy authority London reason tariff pass law" De la Dehesa said. "This palpable declaration" added. De la Dehesa believe confidence restore sector FECSA's debt problem quickly solved. A recently form steer committee represent FECSA's foreign creditor due meet FECSA manager Barcelona Tuesday round talk reschedule ail utility's debt. FECSA's General Manager Jose Zaforteza told Reuters climate talk greatly improve tariff proposals. "You cannot wrong manage electrical utility provide tariff charge sufficient cover costs" Zaforteza said. The General Manager Madrid branch U.S. Bank lent money FECSA little significant progress reschedule talk detail tariff proposal known. "We cannot projection FECSA's ability pay debt unless tariff be" said. "If annual increase period five six pct it's completely ball game" said. REUTER 

Standard Poor's Corp affirm rating 500 mln dlrs debt PNC Funding Corp unit PNC Financial Corp. Affirmed PNC Funding's AA-plus senior debt A-1-plus commercial paper. Also affirm parent's AA prefer stock AA-plus/A-1-plus certificate deposit Pittsburgh National Bank Provident National Bank Citizens Fidelity Bank Trust Co. S/P PNC's 110 mln dlr provision reduce quarter earnings 66 mln dlrs. The reserve develop country 35 pct loan countries. Reuter 

Tunisia bought 150000 tonne French soft wheat August December shipment 76.70 dlrs tonne fob COFACE export credit trade source said. This French soft wheat export sale 1987/88 season start July 1 follow Brazilian purchase 150000 tonnes. France sell 300000 tonne soft wheat Tunisia 1986/87 season. Reuter 

Medford Savings Bank> receive Federal Reserve Board approval form bank hold company. It hold company know Regional Bancorp Inc acquire outstanding common share Medford Savings share Medford Savings convert share Regional. Medford Savings total asset 408 mln dlrs. Reuter 

Virtusonics Corp extend July 31 period exercise outstanding warrant 1.5 ct share. The company June 18 reduce exercise price warrant 2.5 ct common share period June 22 July 22. Reuter 

Qtly div 50 ct v 50 ct prior Pay Aug 14 Record July Eight NOTE: Partnership expect none common preference dividend taxable. Reuter 

Spectramed Inc initial offering 3640000 common share underway 11 dlrs share underwriter lead Alex. Brown Sons Inc ABSB.O> PaineWebber Group inc PWJ>. Reuter 

Banque Arabe et Internationale d'Investissement (BAII) issue billion franc non-callable pre-placed bond tranche July 8 lead manager Banque Nationale de Paris (BNP) said. Banque Indosuez manage 200 mln franc "A" tranche issue par nine pay base annualised money market rate (TAM) plus 0.10 pct. The 250 mln-franc "B" tranche manage Banque d'Arbitrage et de Credit (BAC) issue par 10 pay TAM plus 0.15 pct. The 550 mln-franc "C" tranche manage BNP Banque Demachy et Associes issue par 11 pay TAM plus 0.20 pct. REUTER 

Federated Financial Savings Loan Association share earnings fiscal 1987 end September 30 reduce 16 cent share due write-off secondary reserve Federal Savings Loan Insurance Corp. The company specify amount write current year. Reuter 

Finance Minister Mark Eyskens propose package personal income tax cut worth 102.1 billion franc apply 1989 finance ministry spokesman said. The package 11 tax reform scenario drawn government official expect discuss minister come week government draft present parliament October. The proposal greatly simplify country's tax include cut withholding tax investment income earn Belgium 20 pct current 25 pct. The reduction apply income risk capital spokesman likely define include share bonds. The package chosen Eyskens favourable family child regime treat spouses' income separately instead combine practice widely see discourage marriage. The tax reform encompass corporate taxation. The spokesman 75 pct cost package finance change 258 tax allowance currently grant diverse groups. A far 14 pct met high tax revenue result overall macro-economic benefit package. This leave shortfall 20 billion franc government decide cover either raise indirect tax make far budgetary cuts. The package favour Eyskens described Belgium "fiscal Himalaya" costly 11 scenario prepared. It envisages marginal rate tax threshold 30 pct 40 pct 50 pct. This compare 13 currently high 71.6 pct. REUTER 

International Design Group inc holder record June 26 receive right purchase unit 10 ct common share held. Each unit consists common share five-year warrant buy common share 15.625 dlrs. Reuter 

Qtly div 20 ct v 21 ct prior Pay July 31 Record July 1 NOTE: Partnership pay regular rate. Reuter 

The U.S. Court Appeals Second Circuit upheld low court decision dismiss suit Apex Oil Co New York Mercantile Exchange oil companies. The Court rule Apex Oil pursue anititrust commodity market manipulation allegation Belcher Oil Co unit Coastal Corp CGP>. Apex Oil primarily trading company charge company include Belcher NYMEX conspire force deliver heating oil sell mercantile exchange know Apex full delivery. The NYMEX order Apex deliver mln barrel heating oil sell via February 1982 heating oil contract. Apex eventually fulfil obligation claimed damages. Richard Wiener attorney Apex Cadwalader Wickersham Taft company yet decide whether pursue Belcher Oil. The NYMEX meanwhile counterclaim pending Apex Oil seek unspecified amount attorney's fee 15 mln dlrs punitive damage accord NYMEX spokeswoman. Reuter 

Canadian letter carrier reject contract offer Canada Post strike spread Toronto half nation's mail sorted. The Letter Carriers Union offer present June 18 contain demand concession union already refused. The union walk Ontario city return Atlantic Canada part Quebec Edmonton Victoria. Negotiators schedule resume bargaining expect reach agreement four-day-old strike. Reuter 

Most private bank central Madrid Barcelona close Spanish bank staff strike pay union official employer said. Union official partial response strike call rest Spain. But spokesman employers' Banks Association bank town work normally. Unions call strike tomorrow morning press shorter work hour eight pct pay increase. Employers offer 4.75 pct wage increase month. REUTER 

American Federal Savings Loans Association Colorado earnings continue pressure due weakness Colorado economy. The company declare regular quarterly dividend pressure level non-earning asset holds. The company pressure offset extent increase revenue out-of-state operation strong capital position. Reuter 

Daxor Corp receive offer Federal Express Corp establish frozen blood bank Federal's Memphis Tenn. headquarters. The company blood ship anywhere U.S. six hour Memphis via Federal Express' delivery system. Reuter 

Canon Inc Japan Canon Virginia Inc open 26 mln dlr 289000 square foot plant Newport News Va. The company plant initially 700 1000 Canon dual-color copier month equipment line include laser beam printer electronic typewriter phase later. Reuter 

Digicon Inc start offer exchange package security 55019000 dlrs outstanding subordinate debentures. The exchange include 12-7/8 pct senior subordinate note 10-1/2 pct convertible subordinate debenture 8-1/2 pct convertible subordinate debenture Digicon Finance N.V. It security issue exchange offer include 8574000 dlrs Digicon's 12 pct senior subordinate note due 1994 23580000 dlrs Digicon 9.35 pct convertible subordinate debenture due 1997 16506000 share Digicon common. Digicon addition note debenture common stock issue exchange holder 22865000 dlrs contingently extinguishable debt certificates. It exchange offer prospectus. Reuter 

GTE Corp scientist discoverd simpler method produce transistor create entirely electronic material. The method consists simultaneously "growing" metal connection silicon crystal together form dimensional device connection penetrate entire device. Conventional transistor require step connection surface. GTE Laboratories create "an entirely electronic material device form spectrum us cannot imagine time" David Decker vice president director research GTE Laboratories. "Although research obviously excite found significantly simpler believe cheaper produce electronic device" said. Researchers GTE create transistor combine heating silicon conductive metal tantalum disilicide grow together. The result device microscopic metal rod extend througout chip create dimensional transistor superior standard devics application scientist said. They connection extend vertically througout device great volume active material conventional surface-mounted connections. Decker scientist stage research device prototype device compare favorably conventionaly transistor show promise superior performance. He prototype device prove particularly efficient detect possibility solar energy conversion development electronic camera great efficiency optical communication systems. REUTER 

Daxor Corp receive offer Federal Express Corp establish frozen blood bank Federal's Memphis Tenn. Headquarters. The company blood ship anywhere U.S. Within six hour Memphis via Federal Express' delivery system. REUTER 

Allergan Inc subsidiary Smithkline Beckman Corp U.S. District Court New York order Bausch Lomb Inc immediately recall retail shelf soft contact lens solution sell "HYPO-CARE" name cease far distribution. The company court found HYPO-CARE close Allergan's trademark "HYDROCARE" prevent confusion. Reuter 

The Hydraulic Co file propose offering 500000 share common stock underwriting co-managed Salomon Brothers Inc Edward D. Jones Co. The company proceeds repay short-term debt. Reuter 

The Federal Reserve enter government security market arrange six-day repurchase agreement account spokeswoman New York Fed said. Fed fund trading 6-3/4 pct direct injection temporary reserve dealer said. Economists expect three- six-day repurchase Fed need add volume reserve statement period. Reuter 

Dutch salvage firm Smit-Tak week lift Swiss tug Orinoko lighter Pavo sank 10 day ago Karlsruhe West Germany block Rhine river. Smit-Tak West German subsidiary Harms Bergung GmbH commission local authority raise vessel lift fleet position diver inspection. Smit prepare final salvage plan begin Sunday. Reuter 

Tribune Co offer 100 mln dlrs medium-term notes. The note offer continue basis Salomon Brothers Inc Merrill Lynch Capital Markets. The note maturity nine month 15 years. Specific term transaction establish sale company said. Proceeds corporate purposes. Reuter 

Harcourt Brace Jovanovich Inc official available comment market rumor interested acquire Reed International plc REED.L>. Officials First Boston Inc Harcourt's financial adviser decline comment. A Wall Street arbitrageur own Harcourt share rumor Harcourt announce recapitalization plan ward takeover attempt British publisher Robert Maxwell."It's completely inconsistent recapitalization drop recapitalization" said. Calls Harcourt seek comment returned. Harcourt's recapitalization scrutiny U.S. Court Orlando Fla. Monday. The company sought declaratory judgment convertibility debenture due 2011 recapitalization. Harcourt statement week Salomon Brothers Inc SB> Mutual Shares Corp intervene claim ownership 30 mln dlrs amount debenture. In addition British Printing Communications Corp head Maxwell own 9.5 mln dlrs amount Harcourt said. Salomon filing Securities Exchange Commission 21978 debentures. If court decides convert par value dlr convert 22.0 mln shares. Harcourt ask court rule company require issue common debenture holder convert prior June eight. An increase Reed share London attribute broker rumor Harcourt's rumor Maxwell buyer. But adviser Maxwell New York "there's basis it's us." Reuter 

Salomon Brothers Inc acquire 21978 convertible subordinate debenture Harcourt Brace Jovanovich Inc say convert 21978000 common shares. In filing Securities Exchange Commission New York brokerage firm bought debenture value 1000 dlrs May June regular investment arbitrage activities. The conversion right debenture subject Florida court Salomon Brothers intervened. Salomon Brothers reject Hartcourt's position debenture convertible stock June 9. It leave range option regard debenture include buying sell current stake market negotiate deal talk Harcourt security holder surrender debenture merger tender offer convert stock. Salomon 35.8 pct stake Harcourt base 39.4 mln share outstanding convert debenture 21978000 common shares. The percentage base current outstanding plus amount stock issue conversion. But Salomon stake Harcourt's common stock low debentureholders convert security stock. It say idea total debenture outstanding. Harcourt Salomon Mutual Shares Corp New York investment firm hold combine total 30 mln dlrs debentures. Harcourt announce recapitalization plan month ward takeover attempt British publisher Robert Maxwell. Reuter 

General Dynamics Corp form international consortium compete contract relate multinational air ground missile know modular standoff weapon. The modular standoff agreement U.S. West Germany United Kingdom France Italy Canada Spain develop version air-to-ground system. The company consortium include Brunswick Corp BC> Dornier GMBH DOGG.F> West Germany Hunting Engineering Co Ltd U.K. Aerospatiale France Agusta Italy Garrett Canada Inisel Spain. Reuter 

South African staff U.S. Bank Citicorp CCI> challenge plan sell local operation withdraw country. Employees write Citicorp chief executive John Reed protest disinvestment deal handled. They consult sale Citicorp's local subsidiary Citibank N.A. Ltd South Africa's First National Bank BCLJ.J>. The letter sign bank's 175 staff hint legal action Citicorp unless review disinvestment arrangement. "We seriously consider legal action" senior Citibank employee told Reuters. "There consultation South African staff run contrary American corporate think country" added. Citicorp announce 130 mln rand cash sale Tuesday effective date July 1. First National Bank's manage director Chris Ball bank essentially buying skill Citibank's specialist employee disclose American bank's asset South Africa total 15 mln rand. Ball indicate bank's staff told sale agree stay bank's employ. Citibank's staff 40 pct whom black complain disinvestment accord bar local employee job Citicorp anywhere five years. They provision amount restraint clause legally challengeable. This threaten divestment plan industry source purchase price Ball employee skill expertise assets. The Citibank employee challenge see previous ultimately unsuccessful challenge job security issue General Motors employee U.S. Automaker announce pull valuable manager key staff involve protest. The employee assert Citicorp sale unlike similar disinvestment move announce week Ford Motor Co> ITT Corp> include portion South African profit local employee black community projects. "We offer settlement staff keep image equal opportunity employer" senior black employee add "We idea age slavery alive." REUTER 

The World Bank extend loan India total 929 mln dlrs project sector supply sewage. One project support 485 mln dlr loan bank said. The project support 375 mln dlr loan plan aid phase generation complex eastern India bank said. The third project support bank loan 53 mln dlrs International Development Association loan 16 mln dlrs hope increase supply Madras. Reuter 

Lloyds Bank Plc withdraw market make Eurobonds U.K. Government bond (gilts). It statement maintain active presence short-term security trading swap treasury product building strength traditional foreign exchange money markets. In statement Lloyds chief executive Brian Pitman "We relatively position overcrowd market decide reallocate resource opportunity promise return shareholders' investment." With decision Lloyds becomes major U.K. Clearing bank feel effect deregulation London Stock Exchange "Big Bang" October. Earlier Midland Bank Plc pull equity market make believe return justified cost involve maintain develop market share. Lloyds Treasurer Alan Moore subsequently told Reuters decision take board meeting earlier discussion time. He move reaction loss sustain trading Eurobonds gilt result "strategic review" future Lloyds involvement markets. In Lloyds decide market represent "an attractive return shareholders" said. He note Lloyds expect U.K. Government bond operation profitable stage decline discus finance operation. "This overcrowed market" Moore U.K. Government bond market Big Bang 27 market makers. Lloyds withdrawal leaf 26. Market participant note Lloyds clearing bank buy jobber (middle man) broker Big Bang. Under gilt market operate separate involve separate function jobber brokers. Now task take market maker act both. Moore reason Lloyds decide withdraw market longer justify commitment capital require maintain operations. He Lloyds effort redeploy employee area bank. REUTER 

Viacom Inc ex-dividend date prefer stock Friday June 19. The company halt activity stock morning trading resume shortly. The price Viacom Inc prefer 24-1/2. Reuter 

Ford Motor Co May European dealer Europe sell record 643000 car increase market share 12 pct 11.7 pct earlier. The company industry sale ran seasonally adjust annual rate 11.6 mln car five month 1987 compare 10.9 mln car period year. Reuter 

The U.S. Agriculture Department end screwworm alert control Albuquerque New Mexico potential screwworm outbreak contained. The department screwworms confirm hunt dog return Venezuela. It six week surveillance fail turn additional case screrwworms. Reuter 

Moody's Investors Service Inc affirm First Wisconsin Corp's 50 mln dlrs debt. Affirmed firm's Baa-1 senior debt Baa-2 prefer stock. Moody's note First Wisconsin add special loan loss provision 96 mln dlrs reflect exposure economically troubled international borrowers. The provision adjusts firm's financial statement accurately reflect economic reality agency said. Reuter 

Great Western Bank unit Great Western Financial Corp offering 200 mln dlrs note due 1997 yield 9.60 pct lead manager Merrill Lynch Capital Markets. The note 9-1/2 pct coupon price 99.365 yield 130 basis point comparable Treasury securities. Non-callable maturity issue rat A-2 Moody's A Standard Poor's. The gross spread 6.50 dlrs sell concession dlrs reallowance 2.50 dlrs. Shearson Lehman co-managed deal. Reuter 

The market advanced visual display grow seven-fold five billion dlr five NV Philips Gloeilampenfabrieken PGLO.AS> said. Philips Europe's large supplier liquid crystal display (LCDs) currently lighter efficient television screens. Last market worth 683 mln dlrs. But Philips see surge demand application monitor test measure equipment car telecommunication equipment. Philips overall market value risen five billion dlrs 1992. It LCDs industrial application statement move share grow consumer product market. Pocket-sized LCDS already produce market Japanese manufacturer sell 100 200 dlrs Philips spokesman Jack Reemers said. Philips hope launch version year. Reuter 

Five mths 31 Shr 1.37 dlrs v 1.38 dlrs Net 75.2 mln v 73.6 mln Revs 632.3 mln v 629.6 mln Avg shrs 54.9 mln v 53.4 mln 12 mths Shr 3.19 dlrs v 3.13 dlrs Net 173.6 mln v 165.1 mln Revs 1.43 billion v 1.47 billion Avg shrs 54.4 mln v 52.8 mln Reuter 

Minnesota Governor Rudy Perpich consider call special legislative session consider amendment state's anti-takeover statute accord governor's office. A spokesman governor decide governor evaluate whether call special session days. The governor's office action trigger proposal Dayton-Hudson Corp DH> subject takeover rumors. A spokesman governor company propose amendment Perpich design takeover attempt difficult. Dayton-Hudson suggest amendment pass institute Friday spokesperson said. Press report Minneapolis newspaper morning quote legislator say inclined support legislation Dayton-Hudson accord governor's spokesperson. Senate Majority Leader Roger Moe quote say inclined support action company spokesperson said. Robert Vanasek House speaker designate quote Minneapolis Star Tribune say "We take (Dayton-Hudson) concern seriously help." Reuter 

Boeing Co Hart-Scott-Rodino wait period require connection pending tender offer ArgoSystems Inc ARGI.O> expire midnight June 18. Boeing 37 dlr share cash tender offer defense electronics firm June two. Reuter 

MegaVest Industries Inc> agree principle acquire unlisted Computer Trade Development Corp exchange 119 mln share common stock. The company 21.5 mln share outstanding. It Computer Trade revenue 6.1 mln dlrs year. Reuter 

May Department Stores Co expect record profit sale fiscal 1988 five-year 3.3 billion dlr capital expenditure plan. "Our sight achieve 13th consecutive record sale earnings" chairman David Farrell told annual meeting. In end January 31 1987 company earn 381 mln dlrs 2.44 dlrs share sale 10.3 billion dlrs. Farrell expect improve second-quarter profits. "We believe second-quarter performance show improvement 1986" said. In quarter end August 30 1986 company earn 45.6 mln dlrs 52 ct sale 1.23 billion dlrs. The five-year capital expenditure include 1.9 billion dlrs record 73 department store 52 discount store 1200 specialty stores. About two-thirds department store open Lord Taylor May Co J.W. Robinson's California Hecht's Washington D.C. G. Fox Connecticut. The remainder 3.3 billion dlrs store relocation closing remodelings Farrell said. Sales square foot rise eight pct 1986 134 dlrs president Thomas Hays note company seek annual increase 10 pct. Also annual meeting shareholder vote approve indemnification company's officer directors. Reuter 

Gemcraft Inc expect post profitable quarter. Gemcraft record net income 908000 dlrs 16 ct shr quarter end June 30 1986. In addition company annual shareholder meeting repurchase approximately 130000 share common stock decrease earlier plan purchase 330000 share total price mn dlrs. Reuter 

Moody's Investors Service Inc upgrade rating 1.45 billion dlrs debt SCI Holdings Inc. The agency cite SCI's announcement agree sell 1.3 billion dlrs six television station related property joint venture form SCI Gillett Holdings Inc. While financing detail available agency SCI's debt decline result sale. BCI currently carry Ba-3 zero coupon senior note B-2 senior subordinate debentures. The BCI unit Storer Communications Inc B-2 subordinate debentures. Reuter 

Cold wet weather northern western central part Europe continued slow beet growth plant density report country sugar statistician F.O. Licht said. Temperatures low season rain hamper field occasionally lead water-logged fields. But eastern southeastern Europe warmer weather boost sugar beet growth. Weather Soviet Union allow beet development Licht said. In Sweden beet growth delayed plant population report regular good. Cool rainy weather slow beet growth Denmark crop prospect rat slightly below normal. In United Kingdom Ireland cool heavy rainfall place delayed beet growth. In France Belgium Netherlands West Germany mostly cool frequent heavy rainfall continued slow beet growth field impossible. In Austria warm rainfall favourable beet growth Licht said. In Czechoslovakia Poland mostly warm favour beet development. heavy rain cause damage. In European beet grow region Soviet Union warm shower area weather generally emergence growth beets. In south eastern Europe warm weather rainfall boost beet development. Labour trouble threatens beet crop Spain. Disputes factory trade union threaten delay start processing southern area beet mature year. Reuter 

First City Bancorp Texas Inc solicit bidder reiterate premature speculate course action pursue follow story today's Wall Street Journal attract potential acquirers. First City article confirm company caution "absotluely report beyond" statement. The Journal report bidder First city Robert Carney Robert Abboud former Chicago banker. Reuter 

BankAmerica Corp's Bank America unit offer 300 mln dlrs certificate represent interest pool receivables select California Classic Visa credit card accounts. The certificate rate 8.2 pct. The offering price 99.89 dlrs result yield certificate holdes 8.21 pct. The certificate provisional rating Aaa Moody's Investors Service back 30-mln-dlr lettter credit Bayerische Vereinsbank AG BankAmerica said. The offering co-managed Salomon Brothers Inc bank. "Selling loan provide cost-effective source medium-term fund allows bank leverage exist capital base across broad range activities" Vice Chairman Chief Financial Officer Frank Newman. Bank America continue service loan maintain customer relationship proceeds offering fund loans. BankAmerica pioneer securitization 1977 loan sell mortgage pass-through certificates. Reuter 

Tribune Co offering 100 mln dlrs medium-term notes. The note maturity nine month 15 company said. The term deal sale. They offer continue basis Salomon Brothers Merrill Lynch firm added. Proceeds corporate purposes. Reuter 

The Paris Club creditor nation agree major reschedule Uganda's Mozambique's government-to-government debt Club statement. At meeting week country accord term generous usually grant Club. Uganda 15 repay debt six-year grace period Mozambique accord exceptionally 20-year period 10 years' grace. The Club approve countries' economic financial program therefore contribution improve external payment prospects. It country face heavy debt service obligation low caput income add solution countries' debt problem years. The statement Mozambique's limited debt service capacity borrowing International Monetary Fund upper credit tranche "inappropriate." No detail available countries' embassy nor Club amount involve week Ugandan Finance Minister Chrispus Kiyonga hop reschedule 120 mln dlrs. Uganda's total foreign debt estimate 1.5 billion dlrs. A French Finance Ministry statement issue Paris Club statement France formally agree Gabon reschedule bilateral unpaid debt amount 440 mln francs. The bilateral agreement cover payment due May 31 follow Paris Club's January decision grant Gabon extend repayment period government-to-government debt. The ministry French aid Gabon 1987 framework country's economic recovery amount 1.67 billion francs. REUTER 

Shr loss 20 ct v loss ct Net loss 346000 dlrs v loss 26000 dlrs Revs 7671000 dlrs v 4775000 dlrs 12 mths Shr profit dlr v profit 2.19 dlrs Net profit 2927000 dlrs v profit 5613000 dlrs Revs 40.9 mln v 35.8 mln Reuter 

Jewelmasters Inc sign licensing agreement Walt Disney Co market gold jewelry feature Disney character Mickey Mouse Minnie Mouse Donald Duck Pluto Goofy. Terms disclosed. The company "Disney Gold" merchandise include necklace earring ring 14 carat 18 carat gold cost anywhere 200 dlrs 10000 dlrs. It sale expect begin fall initial license agreement begin June continue September 1988 "multiple renewal options." Reuter 

U.S. Agriculture Department inspector refuse entry part lot Australian beef pesticide residue spokeswoman department said. She USDA notify Australia assure stricter control implemented. The Australian government already impose residue control believe meat presticide residue already pipeline control spokeswoman said. There five case Australian meat residue level above U.S. allowable limit said. Reuter 

Chevron Corp sell 4.6 mln share UNC Inc common stock June 15 leave 1.4 mln UNC common share 8.4 pct total. In filing Securities Exchange Commission Chevron sell share 11.88 dlrs total 54.6 mln dlrs agreement UNC. The stock sell underwriting syndicate manage Dillon Read Co Inc Donaldson Lufkin Jenrette Securities Corp underwriter pay 38.3 mln dlrs UNC pay 16.4 mln said. Reuter 

N-D Resources Inc agree principle issue undetermined share Recovery Resources Corp Bahrain acquire Recovery's Atoka Gas Gathering Systems Inc. Atoka currently operates 20-mile natural gas pipeline 46 mile length southeastern Oklahoma. Reuter 

The United Food Commercial Workers Union unlisted Safeway Inc agree provide severance pay 5000 worker Dallas result closure division April. The union total severance payment five mln dlrs. It division close result 4.6 billion dlrs debt incur leveraged buyout year. The union file suit follow leveraged buyout protect claim union members. The leveraged buyout implement ward bid Dart Group Corp DARTA.O>. Reuter 

Fifteen country Eastern Southern Africa agree cut tariff regional trade 10 pct 1996. A statement Preferential Trade Area (PTA) seek create common market stretch Ethiopia north Lesotho south government tariff cut year. In 1996 ass impact tariff reduction timetable complete elimination barrier trade 2000. The PTA 1982 group Burnudi Comoros Djibouti Ethiopia Kenya Lesotho Malawi Mauritius Rwanda Somalia Swaziland Tanzania Uganda Zambia Zimbabwe. PTA source agreement avert split want progress towards free trade weaker concerned effect custom revenue. The reduction cover common list 300 widely trade commodity good PTA source organisation plan expand list include 425 items. Reuter 

The World Bank approve loan Jamaica total 104 mln dlrs assist country economic structural adjustment sugar industry rehabilitation scheme population health project. The bank loan support Jamaica's structural adjustment -- 40 mln dlr loan trade financial sector adjustment 20 mln dlr loan enterprise sector. The 40 mln dlr loan design raise performance export industry strengthen financial sector. Reuter 

Hot dry weather cause deterioration Saskatchewan crop accord Saskatchewan Wheat Pool's weekly crop report. Rain need southwest west-central northeast region region expect rain soon. Summerfallow crop fair condition stubble crop rat fair poor. Wheat durum oat barley crop one-pct head rye 40 pct milk stage winter wheat 21 pct milk stage. Flax 51 pct tiller canola 58 pct tillering. Areas southern grain belt hit wind hail Tuesday damage reported. Reuter 

Illinois Governor James Thompson likely sign bill set December 1 1990 trigger date opening wider interstate banking gubernatorial spokesman said. The bill pass chamber Illinois legislature week wide margins. The bill provide Illinois bank bank hold company acquire similar institution reciprocal law. Current Illinois law limit interstate banking six Midwestern states. The governor support July 1 1988 date full interstate banking. Large banking firm particularly Citicorp CCI> lobby earlier date. But legislation date approve state's senate. The governor authority amendatory veto pencil earlier trigger date. "I'm sure bill approval" spokesman said. "The question whether authority change trigger date. He hear dates. I don't he'll action late summer." Reuter 

Japanese crusher bought 8000 tonne Canadian rapeseed shipment last-half July September trade source said. Price detail available. Reuter 

The World Bank approve loan Jamaica total 104 mln dlrs assist economic structural adjustment sugar industry rehabilitation scheme population health project. The bank loan support Jamaica's structural adjustment -- 40 mln dlr loan trade financial sector 20 mln dlr loan enterprise sector. The bank 34 mln dlr loan Jamaica's sugar industry self-sufficient meet domestic demand export demand United States European Community. The fourth loan 10 mln dlrs improve planning program health care. Reuter 

Galaxy Cablevision L.P. sign letter intent sell asset cable television system West Texas serve 4600 basic subscriber nine cable television systems. Terms disclose Galaxy identify buyer. The company cash dividend 37 cent unit August 15 holder record June 30. In March Galaxy complete offering 2.2 mln unit 43 mln dlrs acquire asset 132 cable television system 34 mln dlrs. Reuter 

IC industry Inc Karl Bays elect chairman chief executive officer effective July one. William Johnson recover recent stroke name chairman emeritus continue member board. Bays currently chairman Baxter Travenol Laboratories Inc BAX>. Reuter 

Stifel Financial Corp receive unsolicited merger proposal privately held Laidlaw Adams Peck Inc 15 dlrs share cash outstanding shares. The proposal expires July 1 value Stifel 54 mln dlrs. Stifel 3.6 mln share outstanding. The company management board director consider proposal date meet. It proposal currently study Goldman Sachs Co legal counsel. It condition proposal include obtain necessary financing satisfactory completion due diligence investigation Laidlaw execution employment contract key employee designate Laidlaw. Reuter 

U.S. crude oil price high level ahead week's OPEC meeting industry analyst expect policy change session. They price steadily climbed organization's accord December risen technical factor market concern supply Iran-Iraq disrupt delivery Gulf. The U.S. benchmark crude West Texas Intermediate trading 20.55 dlrs July contract New York Mercantile Exchange's energy future spot market. That high level January 1986. OPEC conference president Rilwanu Lukman Nigeria's oil minister Friday expect meeting Vienna brief calm OPEC's current price production agreement slight review. Although industry expert expect reaffirmation December agreement oil price continue climb due desire hedge position surprises. Analysts expect high price continue soon OPEC meeting. At bar increase tension Gulf change OPEC's policy price begin easing. "OPEC probably anything hasn't already agree December oil price firm" John Hill vice president Merrill Lynch Futures. OPEC agree December maintain official oil price 18 dlrs barrel raise group's production ceiling 16.6 mln barrel third quarter 18.3 mln barrel fourth quarter. This agreement help send price sharply high rise 15 dlrs barrel December. Several OPEC price hawk include Iran Algeria Libya seek high official price reduction output. "And U.S. West Texas Intermediate crude continue trade above 20 dlrs barrel great chance OPEC raise official 18 dlrs price" Nauman Barakat analyst Smith Barney Harris Upham Co. But analyst expect moderate producer Saudi Arabia block change policy. "The meeting non-event change official price OPEC particular Saudis commit stabilize market" Rosario Ilacqua analyst L.F. Rothschild. However analyst OPEC hold meeting September re-evaluate market conditions. Overproduction OPEC real fourth quarter quota raise 18.3 mln barrel Iraq's pipeline Turkey brings 500000 barrel market John Lichtblau president Petroleum Industry Ressearch Foundation. Most expect Saudi Arabia oppose price increase meeting look increase year-end 20 dlrs offset decline dollar. Oil price denominate throughout dollar currency decline producer receive money oil. "The real production restraint OPEC Saudi Arabia" Sanford Margoshes analyst Shearson Lehman Brothers. "In half expect Saudis produce 4.1 mln barrel quota therefore act vehicle stablize market pave dlrs barrel price increase December 1987 meeting" said. One uncertain factor course Iran-Iraq war. "The wild card increase tension Persian Gulf" Frank Knuettel analyst Prudential-Bache Securites. Oil tanker take oil Iraq Kuwait regular target Iranian planes. The Reagan administration planning Kuwait tanker protection U.S. flag naval escorts. "Extra (oil) inventory need crisis nervousness incident disrupt oil supply drive price up" Knuettel said. Reuter 

The New York Times Co agreement buy Gwinnett Daily News even newspaper publish Lawrenceville Ga. Terms disclosed. The company Gwinnett weekday circulation 27500 Sunday circulation 30900. The New York Times Gwinnett County northeast suburb Atlanta fastest-growing county country. The purchase agreement include Forsyth County News publish Wednesday Sunday Winder News weekly publications. Reuter 

Lloyd's London insurance market offer settlement five-year PCW Underwriting Agencies> affair involve loss total 235 mln stg unconditional. For offer unconditional 90 pct acceptance Lloyd's affected PCW fraud level reduce caretaker agency 1985 manage affair. The offer involve one-off cash payment PCW name - investor guarantee insurance risk - exchange Lloyd's guarantee end exposure PCW-related claims. Reuter 

Chancellor Corp board declare special dividend 17 ct share payable Aug 14 1987 shareholder record July 31 1987. The company intention pay quarterly dividend pay special dividend board believe appropriate. Reuter 

The tug-of-war pay develop weapons--contractors government--is likely lead writeoffs defense firm analyst said. Singer Co SMF> Northrop Corp NOC> recently announce plan quarter writeoffs related cost major defense program fixed-price government contracts. "It's company pay environment Defense Department paid for" Howard Mager Donaldson Lufkin Jenrette Securities Corp. In recent Defense Department DOD increase competitive bidding weapon contract contractor pay cost develop weapon programs. The move help cut waste abuse contractor dictate firm assume risk analyst said. "It's stricter environment" Anthony Hatch Argus Research Corp. "Contractors absorb cost risk that's likely trend come." The trend probably lead far writeoffs analyst said. Programs prone agree Advanced Tactical Fighter ATF generation high-technology fighter plane developed U.S. Air Force C-17 air transport plane Light Helicopter Experimental LHX development Army. Other program affected said. The Air Force expect 750 advanced fighter plane 1990s cost 40 billion dlrs analyst said. Two team contractor compete contract develop prototype ATF. Lockheed Corp LK> General Dynamics Corp GD> Boeing Co BA> team competition Northrop Corp NOC> McDonnell Douglas Corp MD> ATF. The team fight award develop LHX Bell Helicopter unit Textron Inc TXT> couple McDonnell Douglas United Technologies Corp's UTX> Sikorsky pair Boeing. The C-17 four-engine transport plane. McDonnell Douglas's Douglas Aircraft Co work test plane production award 210 aircraft late 1989 Douglas Aircraft spokesman said. Under government's procedure contractor spend hundred million dollar development typically recoup investment production. But government sometimes award production contractor develop system. General Electric Co GE> example developed F404 engine Navy. But week ago Pentagon award 30 pct F404 production United Technologies' Pratt Whitney. Such tactic increase competition government risk decimate industry make competitive Michael LaTronica Redding Research Group. "Two ago defense contractor bad enemies. They cost efficient" LaTronica said. "Now DOD allow situation swing danger lose defense industry resource." While nation post trade deficit recent aerospace defense export product import noted. LaTronica change government procurement coming. "I hear Pentagon look situation" John Diamantis defense analyst Pershing Co. He defense electronics firm believe Pentagon begin re-evaluating procurement policy start pay development money. Redding Research's LaTronica like industry despite probability additional unforeseen writeoffs "There's swing sentiment. The defense bashing psychology start shift." LaTronica note government official recently suggest winner ATF prototype award sole production plane specify time. The investment large. The Lockheed General Dynamics Boeing ATF team example spending 691 mln dlrs develop prototype. The danger Pentagon run change company hesitate bid develop instead wait source production award. "But company bust really change people's thinking" LaTronica said. Reuter 

Reed International Plc REED.L> comment U.K. stock market rumor Harcourt Brace Jovanovich Inc HBJ> bid company escape unwelcome offer Robert Maxwell's British Printing Communication Corp BPCL.L>. A spokeswoman Reed earlier analyst forecast bid Reed 700 mln stg totally unrealistic add current market 2.7 billion stg. Reuter 

Unocal Corp told U.S. Treasury Department include fluidized bed combustion technology method efficient burning solid Parachute Creek oil shale project Colorado due costs. Under 1985 agreement now-defunct U.S. Synthetic Fuels Corp Unocal study use technology oil shale plant. In return company eligible 500 mln dlrs loan gaurantees price support U.S. Treasury Department contract Synthetic Fuels Corp Unocal said. Unocal study show cost fluidized bed combustion facility exceed 352 mln dlrs compare original estimate 260 mln dlrs. The fluidized bed facility provide heat electricity oil shale project Unocal said. Last year's fall oil price loss investment tax credit Tax Reform Act project uneconomical government price support loan guarantee Unocal said. The Parachute Creek oil shale plant produce 4000 5000 barrel crude shale oil Unocal said. Reuter 

Merck Co MRK> Squibb Corp SQB> benefit study show low level blood cholesterol slows build-up fat heart's artery lower risk heart attack industry analyst said. Both company developed drug slow body's production cholesterol Merck 18 month ahead Squibb drug expect approve year. "Certainly study create great acceptance anti-cholesterol drugs" Robert Uhl drug analyst F. Eberstadt Fleming. Although neither company's drug study conduct team scientist University Southern California School Medicine leader class drug fight cholesterol. The study report Journal American Medical Association show low level cholesterol achieve combination drug special diet slow case reverse build fatty deposit heart's arteries. Such build lead heart attack lead cause death U.S. Health official low level cholesterol immediately benefit six mln Americans suffer symptom coronary artery disease. The study advocate reduction cholesterol 40 mln Americans. As anti-cholesterol crusade gain momentum industry analyst executive believe healthier diet drug therapy gain wider acceptance. In context pharmaceutical analyst David Crossen Sanford C. Bernstein "the culture shift term drug treatment arn't fundamentally alter diets". The worldwide anti-cholesterol drug market value 600 mln dlrs year. But drug reach market analyst estimate revenue swell 1.5 billion dlrs annually five years. The drug study combination low cholesterol diet niacin common compound colestipol drug Upjohn Co UPJ> sell 1977. But drug drawback analyst drug Merck Squibb avoid. "Niacin lead tremendous amount flush constipation stomach upset" Crossen said. Colestipol sand-like powder come dosage 15 30 gram mixed glass water. "It isn't fun take" Crossen said. Drug analyst Uhl drawback restrict Upjohn's sale drug 10 mln dlrs year. In contrast drug Merck Squibb little effect target key factor body's production cholesterol -- enzyme found liver. "Past method get cholesterol variable" Dr. Charles Sanders executive vice president Squibb. The drug contrast interupt clear step cholesterol production Sanders said. Also drug easy tablet form swallow twice day. Merck's drug Mevacor receive recommendation advisory panel Food Drug Administration earlier expect receive full approval sale late summer fall. Squibb's drug eptastatin expect submit regulatory approval quarter 1988 Sanders said. Warner Lambert Co WLA> Bristol Meyers Co BMY> cholesterol fight compound similar Upjohn drug Merck Upjohn ahead class cholesterol inhibitors. Reuter 

Civil service industrial action start month delay publication May's U.K. Overseas trade figure due Thursday Trade Industry Department statement said. A department spokesman figure probably month. The June trade figure due late July delayed added. REUTER 

Canadian narrowly-defined money supply M-1 fell 430 mln dlrs 35.65 billion dlrs week end June 10 Bank Canada said. M-1-A M-1 plus daily chequable non-personal deposit fell 874 mln dlrs 79.97 billion dlrs M-2 M-1-A plus notice personal fixed-term deposit fell 952 mln dlrs 184.45 billion dlrs. M-3 non-personal fix term deposit foreign currency deposit resident book charter bank Canada fell 549 mln dlrs 225.30 billion dlrs. Chartered bank loan outstanding fell 584 mln dlrs 127.58 billion dlrs. Canadian liquid plus short term asset rise 20 mln dlrs 37.96 billion dlrs total Canadian dollar major asset charter bank fell 753 mln dlrs 229.05 billion dlrs. Chartered bank net foreign currency asset fell 92 mln dlrs minus 1.92 billion dlrs. Notes circulation total 17.11 billion dlrs 59 mln dlrs week before. Government cash balance rise 26 mln dlrs 2.65 billion dlrs week end June 17. Government security outstanding fell 424 mln dlrs 227.38 billion dlrs week end June 17 treasury bill rise 700 mln dlrs 78.00 billion dlrs Canada Savings Bonds fell 121 mln dlrs 42.45 billion dlrs. Reuter 

Demand platinum reach 3.4 mln ounce 1991 compare estimate offtake 2.88 mln 1986 Chris Clark platinum marketing director Johnson Matthey Plc said. Clark told meeting Minerals Research Organisation Milton Keynes foresaw 250000 ounce increase consumption autocatalysts currently large single application platinum. Jewellery consumption rise 70000 ounce Clark predict speech text release London today. Clark forecast allow modest far increase investment buying cautious. He South Africa likely source additional supply increase output 500000 ounce meet increase demand. The capital investment require produce additional output billion U.S. Dlrs political climate difficult raise money said. The Soviet Union whose export decline 1970s increase sale West 50000 ounce Clark said. "The probability growth demand massive investment require expansion - expansion viable South Africa Russia - lead conclude price platinum substantially underpinned medium long-term" Clark said. REUTER 

Trammel Crow Co agree buy 42-story headquarters building First Wisconsin Corp undisclosed terms. The privately held real estate development investment firm plan develop remainder eight-acre site Milwaukee include tower office space luxury condominium retail stores. First Wisconsin continue occupy 19 floor First Wisconsin Center said. Reuter 

Metro Airlines Inc agree principle acquire privately held Chaparral Airlines inc 5700000 dlrs cash. Chaparral provide regularly schedule service Dallas/Fort Worth Regional Airport affiliate carrier AMR Corp AMR> revenue 1986 14.1 mln dlrs. Reuter 

Weatherford International Inc executive vice president chief operating officer Kurt K. Bushati leave September One accept senior operating position Austrian oil company. The company president chief executive officer Eugene L. Butler assume add duty chief operating officer. Reuter 

Duff Phelps lower rating senior debt prefer stock DP-7 (low A) DP-6 (high A) affect nearly 670 mln dlrs debt securities. The action reflect increase financial leverage result company's 1986 acquisition Hammmermill Paper raise fix obligation ratio 34 pct compare 26 pct 1985 Duff Phelps said. Reuter 

Standard Poor's Corp keep Crazy Eddie Inc's 81 mln dlrs B-rated convertible subordinate debt creditwatch negative implications. The company's imply senior debt rating BB-minus. S P considers downgrade Crazy Eddie likely rash senior management resignation Chemical Bank's withdrawal 52 mln dlr credit line. Crazy Eddie yet respond compete takeover bid founder chairman Eddie Antar First City Capital Corp 235 mln dlrs Entertainment Marketing Inc S P noted. Reuter 

Manufacturers Hanover Corp offering 200 mln dlrs two-year senior extendable note final maturity 1993 yield 8.30 pct lead manager Shearson Lehman Brothers Inc. The note 8-1/4 pct coupon price 99.90 yield 85 basis point when-issued two-year Treasury note. After holder sell note Manufacturers par. In 1989 1993 issuer conduct reset yield note sell Shearson said. Moody's Investors Service Inc rate Manufacturers issue A-3 compare A grade Standard Poor's Corp. The gross spread 3.50 dlrs sell concession dlrs reallowance 1.25 dlrs. First Boston Prudential-Bache Salomon Brothers co-managed deal. Reuter 

Standard Poor's Corp downgrade B-plus A 50 mln dlrs collateral trust note Leaseway Transportation Corp. S P cite leveraged buyout offer investor organize Citibank include management. The buyout Leaseway result significant deterioration balance sheet agency point out. Leaseway's strong competitive position auto haul retail support service enable generate sufficient cash flow service commitments. But S P expect debt leverage remain extremely forseeable future. Reuter 

June 19 Semi-annual div eight ct v 15 ct prior Pay Aug 1 Record July 1 NOTE: Before establishment Amity Bancorp Inc hold company Amity Bank declare full dividend 15 ct end December 31 1986. Reuter 

Shr loss 46 ct v loss five ct Net loss 3922000 v loss 420000 Sales 16.0 mln v 23.9 mln Avg shrs 8567000 v 8458000 Nine mths Shr loss 1.02 dlrs v profit 35 ct Net loss 8685000 v profit 2978000 Avg shrs 8547000 v 8437000 Reuter 

Chyron Corp enter term 10 mln dlr revolve credit agreement European American Bank. It agreement allow convert 10 mln dlrs short-term debt long-term debt. The agreement period option extend payment said. Reuter 

Altus Bank able reach definitive agreement buy Horizon Financial Corp Horizon Funding 2.8 billion dlrs loan service Victor Savings Loan Association. Altus formerly know First Southern Federal Savings Loan Association earlier announce signing letter intent acquisitions. Horizon Financial Horizon Funding unit Victor Savings Loan Association. Reuter 

Shr 12 ct v 10 ct Net 189578 v 100254 Sales 3403914 v 3122983 Avg shrs 1617600 v 954400 Reuter 

Qtly div 35 ct v 35 ct prior Pay July 15 Record June 30 NOTE: Full name Winthrop Insured Mortgage Investors II Reuter 

Qtly div 17-1/2 ct v 17-1/2 ct prior Pay July 15 Record June 30 Reuter 

Qtly div 2-1/2 ct v 2-1/2 ct prior Pay Sept 18 Record Aug 21 Reuter 

Marcade Group agree buy Europe Craft Imports Inc combination cash common stock. The company Europe Craft design import distributes menswear sportswear Member's Only brand name. The company Europe Craft sale 70 mln dlrs year. Marcade late deal ongoing acquisition phase. Reuter 

Qtly div 47 ct v 47 ct prior Pay Aug 15 Record Aug Three Reuter 

Merck Co Inc open 80 mln dlr research facility Rahway N.J. headquarters. The company researcher building involve research MK-906 reduce size enlarge prostate gland agent promote wound heal leukotiene substance link asthma arthritis vaccine genetic engineering fermentation broth safe cost-effective way produce drugs. Reuter 

Options Viacom International stock adjust account payment dividend prefer stock Chicago Board Options Exchange said. Trading Viacom stock New York Stock Exchange halt morning company announce prefer stock dividend rate 0.025834 prefer stock prefer share held. The Chicago option exchange exercise option require delivery receipt 30 share prefer stock 20 share common cash payment 4322.37 dlrs undetermined cash payment lieu fractional share prefer dividend payment. The option symbol Viacom change VIY VIZ June 22 exchange said. Reuter 

The 72-member Canadian Chemical Producers Association adopt code practice safe transport chemical by-products. "Through cooperation transportation industry minimize transportation accident risk environment" association president David Buzzelli annual meeting Jasper. He step association conduct internal survey rating safety capability trucking company transport chemicals. Reuter 

Pacific International Services Corp plan register Securities Exchange Commission July issue convertible subordinate debentures. The company detail prospective offering. Reuter 

European coffee roaster trader agree propose formula calculate International Coffee Organization ICO quota Dutch Coffee Trade Association chairman chairman Frits van Horick said. Van Horick council member European Coffee Federation speak ECF annual meeting. The formula base six-year move average Brazil world's big coffee producer unchanged quota remain current coffee agreement van Horick said. If accepted consumer producer ICO formula basis negotiate agreement van Horick said. Coffee quota suspend February price shot fear drought-induced crop disaster Brazil. Although price considerably low consumer producer unable agree re-introduction. "Brazil strongly change formula fear low quota. But proposal leaf little object to" van Horick said. "The exist quota rigid reflect supply demand reality" said. "Our formula build flexibility benefit everyone." Although full implication formula work initial estimate suggest country Colombia Kenya Indonesia Costa Rica slightly high quota Ivory Coast El Salvador Nicaragua lose quota share van Horick said. Because proposal provide future quota distribution reflect current demand actual supply prevent under-shipment quota country do automatically prejudice follow year's quota. "If ICO consumer accept proposal stand fair chance accepted producer September meeting whom generally favour quota formula " van Horick said. At depend Brazil's attitude. "Brazil increasingly isolated producer side. If frost damage coffee crop month producer favour proposal agreement" van Horick added. Reuter 

Continental Illinois Corp add reserve bad loan developed country board meet week E.F. Hutton analyst Fred Meinke said. Meinke Continental executive told Friday banking firm parent Continental Illinois National Bank Trust Co Chicago add reserve week line bank do Citicorp CCI> initiate provision month. Continental Illinois 2.6 billion dlrs loan Latin American countries. Meinke think Continental Illinois add 25 pct Latin American exposure loss reserve 650 mln dlrs more. "They reserve already. My guess top that" said. available. Reuter 

Hills Department Stores Inc decide amend registration file Securities Exchange Commission cover plan initial offering. The company expect offer mln common share filing range 11 12 dlrs share 40 mln dlr offering convertible junior subordinate debenture instead 6.9 mln common share propose pending registration. Hills expect file registration statement propose change weeks. Reuter 

The World Bank approve 70 mln dlr loan Hungary finance 833.1 mln dlr telecommunication project. The Bank note Hungary recently telecommunication low priority recognize inadequate telecommunication serious constraint economic development reform. The project extends 1991 Magyar Posta enterprise oversee telecommunication sector meet long-term development goals. Reuter 

Brazil bought 75000 tonne French wheat tender Brazilian Wheat Board spokesman said. He Board accepted offer 25000 tonne wheat grain firm J. Souffle 80.49 dlrs tonne Fob August shipment. For September shipment Board bought 25000 tonne Graniere 79.32 dlrs tonne Fob October shipment accepted 25000 tonne Andre Companie 79.47 dlrs tonne Fob. The tender Aug/Sept/Oct shipment June 24 spokesman said. Reuter 

Standard Poor's Corp affirm AA long-term debt J. Sainsbury PLC. S P cite Sainsbury's offer share Shaws Supermarkets Inc's SHAW> own. Sainsbury currently hold 28.5 pct company. The acquisition finance equity issue impact Sainsbury's capital structure significant agency said. The merger provide opportunity expansion favorable economic trend low trading margin Sainsbury's historic level S P point out. Reuter 

North American Communications Corp consider option maximize shareholder value include sale merger corporate restructuring leveraged buyout. Trading company's stock halt pending announcement. The company own operates 47 cable television system Minnesota Wisconsin retain Communications Equity Associates financial adviser explore alternatives. Reuter 

Federal Co fiscal end May 30 record net income double previous fiscal year. The company's chairman R. Lee Taylor told security analyst Wall Street estimate earnings share range 4.25-4.50 dlrs line company expects. The company fiscal 1986 post earnings 2.24 dlrs share sale 1.2 billion dlrs. It nine month earnings 3.55 share 1.66 dlrs share 1986 period. Federal Co decide change name Holly Farms Corp. The company identify strong sell brand. reuter 

Alcan Aluminum Corp subsidiary Alcan Aluminium Ltd increase U.S. primary aluminum price cent lb effective yesterday. The price 72 cent lb ingot 80 cent extrusion billet company said. Reuter 

Primerica Corp complete previously announce acquisition Smith Barney Inc 750 mln dlrs cash. Primerica wh ich change name April American Can Co Smith Barney Harris Upham Co Inc wholly own Smith Barney Inc add 100 domestic overseas branch offices. Reuter 

Bloomfield Savings Loan Association F.A. receipt 8.5 mln dlrs partial settlement lawsuit "substantial positive impact" earnings 1987. The thrift net loss 4095000 dlrs 1.85 dlrs share 1986. The 8.5 mln dlrs report quarter Bloomfield Savings continue seek recover remain 5.5 mln dlrs total 14 mln dlr judgment United Federal Savings Loan Association Durant Okla. 1985 real estate loan. Reuter 

Brooklyn Union Gas BU> New York gas utility company try limit rate hike customer arrange alternative supply replace spot natural gas Transco Energy Co E> longer delivers company official told Reuters. Edward Sondey vice president supply grandfather clause Brooklyn Union request Transco transmit 165 mln cubic foot (mcf) spot natural gas purchasing 250 mcf contract gas Transco. Brooklyn Union take 30 pct 75 mcf contract gas Transco acquire 120 mcf spot non-contract market said. Lacking access spot gas Transco cost Brooklyn Union 50 ct mln btu Sondey Transco contract gas cost 2.55 dlrs mln compare dlrs spot gas. "The rate increase serious" Sondey said. The contract price 2.55 dlrs mln BTU effective May 1 Transco lower commodity rate reflect seasonal weakness make low 12 month end May 31 accord report submit Brooklyn Union New York Public Utility Commission. In peak demand season Transco's contract gas reach 4.30 4.40 dlrs mln btu commission official said. Industry analyst expect little adverse effect interrupt spot supply Brooklyn Union's earnings current fiscal end September 30. But access Transco resolve winter cost contract gas cut company's profit said. Reuter 

King World Productions Inc finance repurchase 7600000 share announce earlier cash 200 mln dlrs bank borrowing receive commitment First Chicago Corp FNB> Bank New York BK>. The company start tender offer 4100000 share 28 dlrs agree buy 3485085 share King management together total 13.9 mln shares. All share repurchase amount 25 pct King World's stock. Reuter 

Best Buy Co Inc file registration statement Securities Exchange Commission propose offering 30 mln dlrs subordinate extendable notes. Underwriters lead Piper Jaffray Hopwood Inc. Financing expect complete 30 day company said. Proceeds fund company's plan expansion. Reuter 

A spokesman Continental Illinois Corp bank comment rumor soon add reserve cover loss loan develop countries. Rumors circulate Wall Street Continental soon join list bank add reserves. Some analyst speculate decision announce Continental's regularly schedule board meeting held Monday. "Our board meet fourth Monday month agenda confidential" spokesman said. He "we comment rumors." Reuter 

Manufacturers National Corp add 30.4 mln dlrs reserve cover exposure Latin American loans. It add reserve expect result second-quarter loss 10 mln dlrs corporation. Of 30.4 mln dlr provision 20 mln dlrs loan loss reserve main bank hold company Manufacturers National Bank Detroit 10.4 mln dlrs writedown investment nonconsolidated affiliates. It expect profitable year. Reuter 

Qtly div 20 ct v 20 ct prior Pay September Record August 17 Reuter 

Qtly div 28-1/2 ct v 28-1/2 ct prior Pay September 15 Record September Reuter 

Rockwell International purchase SofTech Inc's new line Ada-86 tool building digital autopilot anti-tank missle Hellfire SofTech said. SofTech contract award Rockwell's Duluth Ga. division involve 10 program digital autopilot. Reuter 

Murphy Oil Corp board propose reorganization acquire 23 pct common share Canadian subsidiary own parent. Under proposal undertaken court-approved plan arrangement shareholder Murphy Oil Co Ltd Calgary Alberta Canada offer option receive 31 dlrs (Canadian) share cash equivalent market value common share parent company. Reuter 

Gynex Laboratories Inc sign agreement Warner-Lambert Co's Chilcott Laboratories division market Gynex's line generic oral contraceptives. Gynex Labs 50/50 joint venture own Gynex Watson Laboratories Inc privately-held pharmaceutical company bnased Corona California. Marketing Warner Chilcott currently schedule begin third quarter 1987 said. Gynex sign similar marketing agreement Monsanto Co's MTC> G.D. Searle Co subsidiary February 1986 terminate April follow recall oral contraceptive due packaging problems. Reuter 

Jeffrey Neuman Santa Monica Calif. told Securities Exchange Commission sell entire RB Industries Inc stake 341210 share 10.0 pct total outstanding. Neuman transfer stock nearly ago Tudor Trust trustee trust sell entire stake private deal June 9 11.00 dlrs share. Reuter 

Fortune Financial Group Inc Fortune Savings Bank acquire Financial Security Savings Loan Association branch Sunrise Fla. Terms disclosed. The Fortune Savings Bank office 40 mln dlrs deposit June 5. Meanwhile acquisition Marine Savings Loan Association Florida office Naples Fla await regulatory approval. Reuter 

Coca-Cola Enterprises Inc Don Ulrich resign president Northeast Group pursue interests. The company Jim Stevens Coca-Cola Enterprises vice president president Mid-Atlantic Coca-Cola Bottling Co affiliate succeed Ulrich. Reuter 

Bally Manufacturing Corp file shelf registration Securities Exchange Commission secondary offering mln share Series D convertible exchangeable prefer stock. The stock exchangeable Bally's option company's convertible debenture due February 2007 convertible holder's option share Bally common. The prefer stock carry liquidation value 50 dlrs share. All share offer holder Bally bought prefer stock private placement February 1987. Bally receive proceeds offering said. Reuter 

Mars Graphic Services Inc expect sale quarter end August 31 exceed ago sale 3.7 mln dlrs period. In year-ago quarter company earn 191000 dlrs 18 ct share. Reuter 

The U.S. budget deficit 35.74 billion dlrs May compare deficit 39.40 billion dlrs May 1986 Treasury Department said. Last month's deficit follow April surplus 38.66 billion dlrs. For fiscal date budget deficit 119.02 billion dlrs compare deficit 165.81 billion dlrs previous fiscal year. Outlays month 83.44 billion dlrs 85.64 billion dlrs May ago 84.24 billion dlrs April department said. Receipts 47.69 billion dlrs May 46.25 billion dlrs May ago 122.90 billion dlrs April Treasury said. The bulge receipt April result surplus month result 1986 income tax payment individuals. Reuter 

Digicon Inc offering exchange 55 mln dlrs outstanding subordinate debenture package issues. The outstanding debenture issue include 12-7/8 pct senior subordinate note 10-1/2 pct convertible subordinate debenture 8-1/2 pct convertible subordinate debenture unit Digicon Finance NV. The security issue exchange offer 8.5 mln dlrs 12 pct senior subordinate note due 1994 23.5 mln dlrs 9.35 pct convertible subordinate debenture due 1997 16.5 mln share common stock. Reuter 

TransAmerican Natural Gas receive approval U.S. District Court Texas allow company solicit creditor acceptance negotiate Chapter 11 plan reorganization. The company approval authorize company distribute disclosure statement creditor solicit creditors' acceptance plan. TransAmerican confirmation hearing schedule August 17 U.S. Southern District Texas court. Reuter 

A lead Far Hills N.J. investor Natalie Paul Koether told Securities Exchange Commission acquire 299523 share American Physicians Service Group Inc 5.1 pct total. The Koether bought stock 1.0 mln dlrs "capital appreciation" buy more. The Paul Koether met June 8 management representative talk include company's potential acquisition company opportunity expand company possibility Koether name board. The whether talk result agreements. As SEC filing concern company stake Koethers reserve "to action deem appropriate maximize value shares" current plan take action. While buy American Physicians share Koethers decide sell stake company. Reuter 

Lloyds Bank Plc's LLOY.L> decision withdraw make market Eurobonds U.K. Government bond (gilts) sent shiver spine market participant view prudent banking analysts. "It (the move) really isn't surprise. They lose lot money stage gilt market cut loss can" Keith Brown banking analyst Greenwell Montagu. "The question gilt market maker similar fate" senior gilt market maker said. Eurobond market participant equally stunned. "They firm size I remember pull eurobond market make altogether" member Association International Bond Dealers London staff. Other Eurobond market participant Lloyds frequently change staff eurobond operation hard believe trouble. With action Lloyds third large U.K. clearing bank becomes U.K. clearing bank withdraw gilt market follow Big Bang deregulation London Stock Exchange October. Earlier Midland Bank Plc MDBL.L> fourth large clearing bank opt make market equity ground return justify expense. It continue market maker gilt however. In prepared statement Lloyds Bank chief executive Brian Pitman bank "relatively position overcrowd market decide reallocate resource opportunity promise return shareholder investment." Lloyds maintain presence short-term security trading swap treasury products. Alan Moore Lloyds Treasurer told Reuters decision forward look follow "strategic review" prospect Lloyds markets. "We decide return attractive" said. Although decision meeting Lloyds board morning Moore consideration time. He deny move "reaction event trading room" acknowledge bank's gilt operation profitable stage market. Greenwell's Brown note 1986 Lloyds Merchant Bank sustain loss 28 mln stg account Eurobond gilt operations. For 1986 Lloyds report pre-tax profit 700 mln stg. "Lloyds easily absorb losses" Brown note minuscule compare bank's exposure Latin America. U.K. Clearing bank pressure increase provision bad loan third country Citibank announce plan add billion dlrs provision mid-May. National Westminster Bank Plc NWBL.L> large clearers become U.K. Clearers follow Citicorp's CCI> move earlier week add 466 mln stg sovereign debt provisions. Lloyds large exposure Latin America Midland Bank small clearers. Lloyds review situation Moore deny today's action connection. "It totally unrelated" said. Trading Eurobonds gilt end announcement made. But market participant dumbfounded. "We heard news 20 minute announcement. I idea coming. I don't I job" trader Lloyds decline identified. Lloyds' Moore bank redeploy staff affected decision part bank. But Lloyds' share market relatively market participant particularly gilt unnerved. One senior gilt market maker note news come period gilt Eurosterling market batter lack investor participation follow June 11 U.K. election. Most firm held position expectation return ruling Conservative party prompt heavy demand. These expectation fail met market sustain sizeable loss election. Lloyds subject rumor experience problem gilt operation official deny stage unprofitable. Gilt market source suggest problem face Lloyds gilt decision build team. It clearer purchase broker jobber (middle man) run-up Big Bang. Under function conduct separately market maker perform tasks. But Big Bang market maker express doubt gilt market sustain 27 market maker turnover increase substantially. And Lloyds withdrawal market maker believe remain 26 opt bow gracefully. Reuter 

The Securities Exchange Commission support legislation define insider trading recommend language definition six weeks. Acting SEC chairman Charles Cox told Senate Banking Committee bill propose week define insider trading wrongful material nonpublic information contain ambiguous provision reduce Commission's flexibility prosecute cases. "The Commission believe definition insider trading desirable" Cox said. He promise provide SEC's recommend definition committee August 3. The bill propose Sens. Donald Riegle Michigan Democrat Alfonse D'Amato New York Republican illegal anyone receive pas inside information person provide information security transaction. Federal law enforcement official definition insider trading useful difficult crime prove. Cox SEC have success insider trading case despite lack clear definition. He become act chairman agency chairman John Shad left U.S. Ambassador Netherlands. President Reagan nominate Northwestern University law professor David Ruder SEC chairman Wednesday confirm Senate weeks. Riegle chairman Senate security subcommittee want act legislation Thomas Moore member President's Council Economic Advisors action delayed Supreme Court rule appearl insider trading conviction former Wall Street Journal reporter R. Foster Winans. Winans convict tell friend advance stock write column. The stock usually price depend Winans' recommendation. "We believe wait Supreme Court review Winans leigilation considered. After court decides consider law changed. Until legislation premature" Moore testimony. Reuter 

Oper shr ct v ct Oper net 529000 v 579000 Sales 322.0 mln v 173.8 mln Nine mths Oper shr six ct v eight ct Oper net 1619000 v 1700000 Sales 875.1 mln v 482.3 mln Note: oper data include extraordinary gain tax loss carryforwards 291000 dlrs ct shr v 316000 dlrs ct shr qtr 890000 dlrs ct shr v 992000 dlrs ct shr nine mths. Reuter 

Sithe-Energies LP sign agreement increase Energy Factors Inc 70.0 pct 53.4 pct invest 100 mln dlrs Energy Factors stock. Reuter 

Bacro California board approve offer chairman Kenneth Donner President Michael Donner purchase outstanding Barco common share 5.05 dlrs share leveraged transaction. The Donners currently 44 pct company's outstanding share Barco said. It vice chairman David Grutman 28 pct Barco's share agree sell stock offering price. Reuter 

Braintree Savings Bank Winthrop Sargent IV name president chief executive officer succeed Lindsay L. Tait remains chairman. It Sargent senior vice president name board. It Tait intend retire years. Reuter 

Stelco Inc form 15 mln U.S. dlr joint venture Northern Automatic Electric Foundry wholly own unit Armco Inc produce cast grind medium mill line mining industry worldwide. The venture operate M E International company base Minneapolis Minn. pool asset Northern Automatic grind medium foundry Ishpeming Mich. Evans Duluth Steel Castings Co Duluth Minn. Minneapolis Electric Steel Castings Co Minneapolis. Armco Stelco operate joint venture produce forge grind medium Kamloops British Columbia. Reuter 

Gemcraft Inc told shareholder annual meeting company principal shareholder repurchase 130000 share common stock. The company's portion repurchase obligation equal 800000 dlrs company plan record capital transaction 1987. Originally Gemcraft estimate require buy 300000 share 3.0 mln dlrs. Gemcraft originally estimate portion trading loss total 600000 dlrs record charge earnings amount 1986 fourth quarter. The company plan provide after-tax credit income 200000 dlrs quarter 1987 reflect difference. Gemcraft told shareholder see profitable 1987 quarter. In year-ago period report earnings 908000 dlrs 6 ct share sale 88.8 mln. Reuter 

Investor Irwin Jacobs investment Gillette Co amount five pct consumer product company's stock. Jacobs comment response enquiry comment further. Yesterday Gillette rebuffed takeover proposal Revlon Inc. Under agreement company Revlon permission Gillette's board make offer shareholders. The board decline grant permission. Gillette topic takeover speculation weeks. Its stock trade heavily arbitrager believe Jacobs investor sizeable position company. Reuter 

April 30 Shr loss Net loss 449000 v loss 155000 Revs 84000 v 52000 Nine mths Shr loss Net loss 810000 v loss 394000 Revs 173000 v 144000 Reuter 

Rapitech Systems Inc enter agreement FORTRIX-C software available Hewlett-Packard Co's salesforce assist customer migration application software operating environment another. The company FORTRIX-C select American Telephone Telegraph Co T> Vendor Involvement Program. It cannot forecast impact profit neither agreement contains purchase requirements. It expect continued loss rest fiscal 1987 end July 31. The company lose 548000 dlrs year. Today report nine month loss 810000 dlrs compare 394000 dlr loss earlier attribute poorer performance substantially increase marketing sale research expenditure partly result hire additional staff. Rapitech far sign agreement Computer Systems Consultants BV Netherlands Sages Group France represent Rapitech Conversionware product line Benelux country France French-speaking canton Switzerland. Reuter 

Malaysia urge fellow tin produce country contribute money towards research us metal Malaysian primary industry minister Lim Keng Yaik told Reuters interview. Lim Brussels tour Europe America instruct Malaysia's representative executive committee Association Tin Producing Countries ATPC draw paper matter. Lim earlier met European Community farm commissioner Frans Andriessen industry commissioner Karl-Heinz Narjes. He appear likely Commission proposal tax vegetable marine oil fat defeat fear Commission revive idea. Lim note Andriessen week promise tax adopt third country suffer export loss result compensate access EC alternative exports. "Since product commodity base I cannot case" Lim said. Malaysian palm oil export EC worth 250 mln dlrs year. The tin research proposal present ATPC meeting held Kuala Lumpur September. "Not research development effort tin producer push substitute aluminium paper plastics" Lim said. He mention inorganic tin pesticide excite application. Lim estimate amount extra money need spent research us paper produced. He Narjes told appear fundamental barrier EC quickly ratify International Rubber Agreement INRA translation accord EC language awaited. Lim sign ratify agreement Malaysia's behalf visit New York current tour "interregnum" agreement lapse October come force. He described accord model commodity agreement due sign nearly produce consume country virtue review system control buffer stock management. Reuter 

VR Business Brokers Inc close sale control comon prefer stock VR Acquisition Corp Delaware corporation control investment lead C. Robin Relph London. Under agreement date April 28 VR Business agree sell 5008120 share common stock 11846 share 10 pct cumulative stock. VR Business issue 3964000 share common stock 11846 share prefer stock remain share common list week 10 days. Reuter 

April 30 Shr 12 ct v eight ct Net 316655 v 148567 Sales 2011195 v 1422719 Avg shrs 2738864 v 1881296 Year Shr 43 ct v 49 ct Net 1006356 v 918290 Sales 7059446 v 5441408 Avg shrs 2329329 v 1881296 Reuter 

Monthly div 11.244 ct v 10.309 ct prior Pay July 10 Record June 30 NOTE: Full name Freeport-McMoRan Oil Gas Royalty Trust Reuter 

The World Bank loan Uganda 13 mln dlrs International Development Association (IDA) bank's concessionary lending affiliate. The IDA loan support project hope preserve country's natural forest meet demand wood product rehabilitate Uganda's forestry management agency bank said. It project plan increase management protect forest establish pilot wood farm nursery rehabilitate soft wood plantations. Reuter 

Liposome Co Inc annual meeting announce formation Canadian subsidiary Canadian Liposome Co Ltd. It company cement relationship University British Columbia researcher Pieter Cullis scientific develop anti-cancer product Liposome. The company lead banker complete Liposome's stock offering mln share June 11 6.875 dlrs share. Liposome net 7388750 dlrs. Reuter 

It fairly hectic trading week raw sugar China pay market level nearby shipment London trader Woodhouse Drake Carey weekly report. July shipment Thai raw trade China week fob level equivalent 20/25 point discount July New York future said. Mid-week sale cover trade 10/15 point discount. Enquiries July/Sep 15 raw sugar filter trade value rise quickly 13 point premium New York July 18 Woodhouse said. In Western Hemisphere Dominican Republic Mexican nearby raw bid 15 point discount July New York offer five point limited trading said. All action past week Far East raw market whereas white market little fresh prospect nearby offtake Whitehouse added. Reuter 

Shr profit six ct v loss ct Net profit 80939 v loss 12808 Rev 7.0 mln v 6.3 mln Six month Shr profit eight ct v loss ct Net profit 101345 v loss 10460 Rev 13.2 mln v 12.5 mln Reuter 

Oper shr loss 32 ct v loss 17 ct Oper net loss 2999000 v loss 1692000 Sales 10.3 mln v 11.5 mln Avg shrs 9517000 v 9905000 NOTE: 1986 Operating loss excludes profit 3688000 dlrs 37 ct share discontinue operation Reuter 

Qtly div 15 ct v 15 ct prior Payable August 31 Record June 30 Reuter 

A Latin American Caribbean nation formally oppose trade legislation pending Congress say curb export slow development hinder ability repay foreign debt. Mario Rodriguez Montero president Organization American States special committee trade aware U.S. trade deficit add "the region affected trade bills." He cause deficit strong dollar budget deficit "it regrettable solve trade bill serve private U.S. interests." Rodriguez comment news conference day meeting U.S. official trade bill Congress design reduce U.S. trade deficit hit record 166.3 billion dlrs. Congressional observer bill aim mainly Japan Taiwan South Korea nation annual trade surplus United States. Mexico Brazil Venezuela Latin nation trade surplus United States Mexico large surplus 5.2 billion dlrs Japan's 58.6 billion dlrs. The European Community oppose bills. Rodriguez Latin Caribbean nation back Reagan Administration's opposition section legislation include curb import require retaliation foreign unfair trade practices. He told reporter committee likely mount campaign fight legislation come debate Senate floor expect week. Rodriguez "the region need trade continue development. We hope affected negatively trade legislation." Rodriguez said: "we keep market open - especially U.S. market - obtain necessary foreign exchange service debt continue development progress." President Reagan veto legislation term "protectionist" aide mount effort objectionable provision legislation. Asked whether Reagan ready cast veto Rodriguez yet "the administration veto frame mind." reuter 

Reed International Plc REED.L> deny rumour U.K. Stock market target takeover bid receive approach. "In view increase share price I clear receive bid approaches" Reed's chairman Leslie Carpenter statement. Rumours U.S. Publisher Harcourt Brace Jovanovich Inc HBJ> bid Reed paper printing company push Reed share 54p 600p stage ease 564p close background widespread decline U.K. Equity prices. Share market analyst speculator buying stock belief Harcourt bid Reed effort escape unwelcome billion dlr bid Robert Maxwell's British Printing Communication Corp BPCL.L>. Such move Harcourt BPCC analyst added. They speculation BPCC's bid Harcourt unsuccessful turn attention Reed. Reuter 

Applied Data Communications agree acquire privately-held Dateline Technology Inc Redmond Wash. undisclosed amount cash stock. Dateline Technology design sell high-capacity high-speed computer peripheral subsystem primarily data storage Applied Data said. Reuter 

USA Network acquire Time Inc's TL> one-third network. The network formerly joint venture Time Gulf Western Inc MCA Inc MCA> Gulf Western MCA previously held one-third jointly USA Network 50/50 basis. Terms disclose USA Network said. USA Network advertiser-supported entertainment basic cable network reach 39 mln home 8500 cable systems. Reuter 

Tektronix Inc previously announce Dutch Auction cash tender offer 10 mln common shares. Under term offer company select single cash purchase price stock base share tender exceed 40 dlrs share low 35 dlrs share Tektronix said. The company intend spend 380 mln dlrs share tendered. It far state tender offer expires July eight unless extended. Reuter 

Coastal Corp's Coastal Limited Ventures Inc subsidiary offering 14000 limited partnership unit Coastal 1987 Drilling Program Ltd extend July unit solf occurs earlier. It eight mln dlrs 1000 dlr unit sell yesterday. The partnership plan raise 14 mln dlrs sale unit borrow mln dlrs Coastal said. Reuter 

Kay Corp Balfour Maclaine International Ltd subsidiary sign letter intent acquire asset privately-owned distributor specialty fastener 13 mln dlrs plus management incentive disclose. Kay firm annual sale 15 mln dlrs. Kay pursue private placement debt security corporate purposes. Reuter 

Larissa Industries Inc file Securities Exchange Commission initial offering mln share common. All share sell Larissa make market component assembly automobile truck van helicopter military vehicle nucelar reactor U.S. Navy submarine vessels. The offering underwritten Merrill Lynch Capital Markets E.F. Hutton Co Inc. Reuter 

Sunrise Medical Inc close facility fourth quarter charge 625000 dlrs 15 cent share result fourth quarter loss. The company net earnings below 1.8 mln dlrs earn year. It note earnings affected 13 cent share operating loss Sunrise Medical GmbH unit West Germany. It closure complete 1987 cost reduction plant consolidation program. The company plant close Trans-Aid factory Turbotville Penn. Minivator factory Dunstable England Sunrise Medical GmbH distribution facility Bischofsheim West Germany. The Turbotville Dunstable operation fold Sunrise facility German distribution local distributor company said. The German operation shut effective June 26. The company anticipate non-recurring extraordinary charge fiscal 1988. Reuter 

New England Critical Care Inc complete purchase NPO Therapies Inc Salt Lake City. The company NPO Therapies' president founder Kelly Mutchie join New England Critical Care regional vice president cover western United States. NPO Therapies provide infusion therapy services. Reuter 

A U.S. government trade official responsible coffee policy prospect accord coffee quota uncertain despite recent Colombian effort bridge difference producer consumers. Jon Rosenbaum assistant U.S. trade representative trade talk Colombia produce country accept sort standardize criterion agree reintroduce coffee quotas. "There country evidently not" Rosenbaum obvious reference Brazil negative recently reintroduction quotas. Rosenbaum stance Brazil outlook agreement reintroduce coffee quota September International Coffee Organization meeting hard predict. He visit Bogota held technical discussion Colombian officials. While meet Jorge Cardenas Colombian coffee producer federation Europe Cardenas left "positive letter" Rosenbaum said. The Cardenas letter respond U.S. letter month praise Colombia try compromise formula reintroduction quota outline concern technical detail Colombian plan. Rosenbaum reach comment formula calculate ICO quota agree European coffee roaster traders. Dutch coffee trade association chairman Frits van Horick Amsterdam formula base six move average Brazil unchanged export quota remain current coffee agreement. The U.S. agree coffee quota unless "objective criteria" reflect recent change coffee market export limits. Reuter 

The Commodity Credit Corporation (CCC) reallocate 1.3 mln dlrs credit guarantee originally grant cover sale protein meal El Salvador buy rice U.S. Agriculture Department said. The action reduces guarantee line authorize sale protein meal 12.7 mln dlrs creates rice credit guarantee line 1.3 mln dlrs department said. All sale credit guarantee line register export complete September 30 department said. Reuter 

Jefferies Group Inc make market Storage Technology Corp QSTK.O>. The firm bid 3-1/2 offer 3-5/8. Reuter 

Moody's Investors Service Inc affirm Delta Air Lines Inc's 977 mln dlrs debt upgraded rating Western Air Lines Inc's 216 mln dlrs debt securities. The agency cite Western Air's merger Delta Delta's assumption Western's debt. The action reflect Delta's continue strong financial condition earnings improvement quality service record. Moody's affirm Delta's A-3 senior unsecured debt industrial revenue bond raise Western's senior secure debt A-3 Ba-3 senior unsecured A-3 B-1. Reuter 

Moody's Investors Service Inc cut B-2 Ba-1 Diamond Bathurst Inc's subordinate note 1995. Moody's expect company's operating performance hurt heighten competition increase inroad form packaging. It Diamond benefit production efficiency quality control plant closings. But due company's major role sell distil spirit industry small market glass container margin asset return materially improve Moody's said. Reuter 

Brazil's crisis-ridden motor industry -- dominate subsidiary Volkswagen AG VOWG.F> Fiat Spa FIAT.MI> General Motor Corp GM> Ford Co F> -- single domestic sale day assembly line stop shortly industry spokesman said. The motor manufacturer feel pinch month demand slump country head recession. But industry hit fresh dealer decide Tuesday stop buying car truck protest government tax vehicles. The dealers' decision spark 33 pct increase car price authorize week government cover industry's rise costs. Spokesman Marcio Stefani Brazilian Association Autmotive Vehicle Distributors dealer livelihood stake -- car aren't sell cost much. "It question survival. The price car Brazil reach insupportable level" said. A GM Opala Diplomata cost 30000 dlrs Brazil equivalent car United States cost 10000 dlrs. The National Association Automotive Vehicle Manufacturers trade's boycott continue week consequence serious. Association spokesman Fred Carvalho told Reuters "The consequence collective holiday lay-offs catastrophic situation." A spokesman Ford Brasil tell half 21000 workforce holiday June 29-July 13. Fiat announce yesterday 2000 worker month's holiday July 6 halt production domestic market. Carvalho industry work 3500 vehicle below 1986 average 4700 capacity 5100. During year's Cruzado Plan price freeze feverish demand outstrip supply. The industry say sell car produce constrain lack parts. Today picture completely month rag inflation demand disappeared. Carvalho government tax car add 138 pct cost vehicle. He described tax "the high universe galaxy." Domestic car sale five month slip low level decade 241632 unit compare 382182 unit period year. On bright export boom -- sale abroad May total 242 mln dlrs record figure. The motor industry critical government President Jose Sarney gain reputation indifferent manager economy. Last month Volkswagen postpone indefinitely investment 150 mln dlrs plan year. Wolfgang Sauer president Volkswagen Brasil government create crisis confidence. Brazil's motor industry employ 150000 people. Reuter 

U.S. Comptroller Currency Robert Clarke office expand plan give temporarily ail manage bank extra compliance minimum capital requirements. The policy originally intend run bank economically depressed area rebuild deplete capital level broaden apply bank Clarke speech financial seminar. A text remark today. The comptroller's office extend application deadline plan Dec. 31 1989 Dec. 31 1987. It extend 1995 1993 deadline bank boost capital level require minimum level. Finally eliminate current requirement bank capital pct participate capital forbearance plan. "In theory bank allow continue operate nearly zero capital approve plan rebuild capital base" Clarke add bank situation "a virtually ironclad plan prompt restoration capital" accepted. The critical linkage forbearance fundamental assure bank survive: short capable management financial prospects" Clarke said. He continue close insolvent banks. Reuter 

Standard Poor's Corp affirm debt rating Chrysler Corp Chrysler Financial Corp follow automaker's agreement acquire Electrospace Systems Inc 367 mln dlrs. It acquisition easily fund exist cash balance leave Chrysler adequate level precautionary cash. At March 31 Chrysler 2.9 billion dlrs cash marketable security 2.7 billion dlrs year-end 1986 S P noted. Standard Poor's affirm BBB senior debt Chrysler Chrysler Financial. Also affirm finance arm's BBB-minus subordinate debt A-2 commercial paper. Electrospace make communication electronic system aerospace applications. Because company's relatively size acquisition little effect Chrysler's balance sheet S P said. Reuter 

Qtly div ct v ct prior qtr Payable July 15 Record June 30 Reuter 

International LPG price little change past week barely affected excitement advent OPEC's mid-year meeting trader industry source said. "If OPEC decides increase crude oil production" trader "LPG supply correspond rise demand." Petrochemical buyer sideline foray market june said. An industry meeting Dublin week drew market participant trading desk added. Algeria move cargo propane U.S. Gulf keep Mediterranean price steady trader said. In Mideast Gulf propane appear ease slightly major U.S. oil company bought propane formula net 123 dlrs cif Mideast Gulf dlrs below Saudi Arabia's government sell price (gsp) industry source said. Delivered propane Japan quote gsp plus 19 dlrs butane gsp plus 25 dlrs trader said. Reuter 

After battling President Reagan Congress pas trillion dollar 1988 budget set stage fiercer fight tax defence policies. But dust settle congressional budget analyst Reagan Democratic opposition finally sit "budget summit" call truce deal implement budget opposes. "I essentially (negotiate)" prominent House leader identified. "The ball court ... We've everything summit." The Democrat budget plan call $19 billion tax $64 billion pass Democratic-led Congress week. It cut year's deficit $37 billion $134 billion. On Tuesday week Reagan consider talk except defence tax day argue Congress bend further. Reuter 

Kleinwort Benson Australian Income Fund Inc Qtly div investment income 30 ct v 36.5 ct prior qtr Payable July 17 Record July Reuter 

Qtly div 18 ct v 18 ct prior Pay August seven Record July Reuter 

Former U.S. Secretary State Henry Kissinger U.S. Government disregard future economy five "find situation similar indebted Latin American countries." "The United States able service debt austerity" told news conference. The former secretary criticise country's foreign policy. "We problem send tell country handle problems." Kissinger Brazil private visit opening speech Sixth World Congress International Federation Purchasing Materials Management held June 24 26. During visit call President Jose Sarney Foreign Minister Roberto Abreu Sodre Finance Minister Luiz Carlos Bresser Pereira Chamber Deputies chairman Ulysses Guimaraes Monday Brasilia. Asked comment economic measure impose Brazilian government week include price freeze 90 day Kissinger said: "I read summary plan. In principle seem reasonable plan succeed lead agreement International Monetary Fund." Reuter 

Unisys Corp Value Added Marketing organization sign agreement privately held VMark Computer Inc remarketing Unisys 5000 7000 series minicomputer VMark software. Terms disclosed. Reuter 

The United States Kuwait discuss plan lease privately-owned U.S. tanker transport oil Gulf addition put vessel American flags. State Department spokeswoman Phyllis Oakley disclosure tanker told reporter United States expect conclude soon favorable arrangement Saudi Arabia concern expand security cooperation Gulf. The development occur Reagan administration continued fire Congress plan bring 11 Kuwaiti tanker American flags. The move design protect tanker Iranian attack ensure freedom navigation strategic waterway raise fear Capitol Hill draw United States seven-year-old Iran-Iraq War. "The Kuwaitis discuss possibility charter U.S. flag vessel Maritime Administration" Oakley said. She emphasize "if charter arrangement work supplant reflagging arrangement work Kuwaitis." In case ship eligible U.S. Navy escort Gulf said. The Washington Post quote John Gaughan administrator Martime Administration say Kuwait approach American shipping company possibility charter. Gaughan earlier week told representative company whose identify charter vessel fly U.S. flag "would protected" newspaper reported. Concerning Saudi Arabia Oakley "we move forward talk ... tailor effort security cooperation facilitate Gulf operations." Reuter 

Environmental Power Corp Robert W. Baldridge resign board director effective June 17. Environmental develops own operates production hydropower waste-energy plants. Reuter 

Senior official government ruling Revolutionary Institutional Party (PRI) reject sector call week reprivatise 26 Mexican bank nationalise five ago. PRI president Jorge de la Vega speak Saltillo Coahuila party permit reprivatisation "because bank belong Mexicans." Speaking Hermosillo Sonora State Deputy Finance Minister Francisco Suarez Davila nationalise bank prove positive instrument government able promote economic development. Suarez davila hand bank perform government adopt whatever reorganization need improve efficiency. Earlier week newly elect powerful coordinate council agustin legorreta call bank reprivatized charge competition efficiency eroded. Then president jose lopez portillo nationalise bank 1982 accuse aid capital flight. Later miguel de la madrid office announce scheme offer 34 pct banks' share public. Reuter 

Lloyds Bank Canada unit Lloyds Bank LLOY.L> PLC appoint David Drake chief executive replace David Lewis remain vice-chairman effective June 30. The bank former president David Rattee resign pursue interests. Drake 45 serve Lloyds Bank 1958 currently bank's regional director Birmingham England. Lewis chief executive Continental Bank Canada sell 90 pct asset Lloyds Bank November. Reuter 

Standard Poor's Corp affirm 6.3 billion dlrs debt American Express Corp related entities. Affirmed American Express' AA senior debt AA-minus subordinate debt A-1-plus commercial paper. S P cite American Express banking unit's decision aside specific reserve develop country credits. While 600 mln dlr loan-loss provision generate quarter loss diminish equity capital reduction replenish earnings half S P said. Reuter 

Pacific Basin Development Corp> base Vancouver British Columbia reach agreement buy 51 pct T.E.A.M. Pacific Corp marketing arm 4.2 mln U.S. dlrs. Pacific expect ot earn mln Canadian dlrs end June 30 1988 10 mln Canadian dlrs end June 1989. T.E.A.M. former Signetics Corp unit assembles integrate circuit Southeast Asia buying assembler. Pacific T.E.A.M. expect earn 80 mln Canadian dlrs acquisition completed. Reuter 

May 31 Shr loss 13 ct v loss 4 ct Net loss 225000 v loss 80000 Revs 11.8 mln v 10.4 mln Avg shrs 1789165 v 1789455 Reuter 

Dayton Hudson Corp letter employee told "aggressive buyer" company's stock acquired. A Dayton Hudson spokeswoman identify buyer Wall Street source Dart Group Corp DARTA.O> company interested buying Dayton Hudson stock. The Wall Street source Dart Group expect soon file statement Securities Exchange Commission accumulation Dayton Hudson stock. According letter company employess Dayton Hudson management move direction fend takeover. According letter chairman Kenneth Macke express buying stock company's desire remain independent. Dayton Hudson Thursday met Minnesota governor Rudy Perpich appeal legislative help. A spokesman Governor Perpich earlier governor expect recommend stiffen state's anti-takeover law Minneopolis retailer defend itself. Minnesota House speaker designate legislator probably look language similar contain Indiana New York law. He amendment propose probably design thwart company dismantle company profit. "Obviously Dayton-Hudson feel whatever statute protect enough" Vanasek said. Reuter 

Barnett Banks Inc Home Federal Bank Florida file suit Federal Home Loan Bank Board Federal Savings Loan Insurance Corp. The company suit asks Jacksonville Fla. federal district court enjoin enforcement interpretive rule adopt FHLBB seek jurisdiction Barnett's propose acquisition Home. The suit say rule arbitrary capricious. Reuter 

Environmental Power Corp file statement Securities Exchange Commission offering mln share common. All share sell company Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc sole manager offering. Environmental 400000 dlrs net proceeds pay portion purchase price capital stock Milesburg Energy Inc> remainder repay mln dlrs short-term debt coporate purposes. Reuter 

Chrysler Corp take step automobile towards military contract purchase Electrospace Systems Inc ELE> analyst said. "A chief goal Chrysler gain military Gulfstream plane cause dramatically" analyst Gary Glaser First Boston Corp. Chrysler bought Gulfstream Aerospace Corp 1985 earlier Electrospace agree acquire friendly merger 367 mln dlrs. Analysts merger continue trend automobile industry diversification carmaking. General Motors Corp GM> paid five billion dlrs Hughes Aircraft aerospace company 1985. A earlier bought Electronic Data Systems data processing firm 2.5 billion dlrs. Meanwhile Ford Motor Co F> add First Nationwide Savings move financial services. Ford huge stockpile cash indicate aerospace Lockheed Corp LK> rumor target. Both Ford Lockheed deny rumor accord analysts. Ford 9.5 billion dlrs cash security analyst said. "The overall strategic thrust (within car industry) somewhat sensitive vagary automobile sale cycle" analyst Jack Kirnan Kidder Peabody Co. "One company feel particularly GM Chrysler diversify aerospace" Kirnan said. Ford "a little bit laggard" concern investors. Chrysler's move auto 1985 purchase Gulfstream 637 mln dlrs. Defense analyst Chrysler pay price Electrospace auto analyst regard modest outlay company. Electrospace earn 10 mln dlrs sale 191 mln dlrs fiscal 1987 end April 3. Kirnan Chrysler trouble digest Richardson Texas electronics firm buying American Motors Corp AMC> billion dlrs deal close year. "Chrysler hand full absorb AMC absorb lot debt" Kirnan make heavily leveraged auto company. But analyst relative size Electrospace easy Chrysler absorb. Analysts note Hughes contribute significantly GM Gulfstream provide 57 mln dlrs pretax earnings Chrysler year. In statement Chrysler 92 pct Electrospace's sale military. In addition help Gulfstream gain government Chrysler believe electronics technology automobile business. Robert Miller Jr Chrysler Corp vice chairman Gulfstream's example involves electronics composite aerodynamic design. "Those technology win automobile 1990s" Miller told Reuters. Electrospace add significantly electronics said. Miller Electrospace earnings hurt one-time item recover year. Miller cash pay Electrospace. "They substantial presence Washington 150 professional people. They accounting system Texas manage Defense Department" said. Both move Gulfstream military market. "Gulfstream traditionally aim commercial market kettle fish" Miller said. Reuter 

Business loan book major U.S. bank exclude acceptance fell 896 mln dlrs 275.61 billion week end June 10 Federal Reserve Board said. The Fed loan include acceptance fell 546 mln dlrs 278.12 billion dlrs. Reuter 

Manhattan Federal Court Judge Shirley Wohl Kram rule Monday whether grant request block 78 dlr share merger agreement Burlington Industries Inc Morgan Stanely Group Inc MS>. The request bar merger Samjens Acquisition Corp partnership form financier Asher B. Edelman Dominion Textiles Inc. Samjens hostile 77 dlr share takeover bid Burlington. Reuter 

K.G. Saur German-based publisher database legal bilbiographic reference material sell asset The Butterworth Group division Reed International PLC REED.L> 15 mln dlrs. Saur Klaus Saur president owner company remain president Saur operation Munich London New York. Reuter 

Shr 10 ct v ct Net 419000 dlrs v 196000 dlrs Revs 27.3 mln dlrs v 25.9 mln dlrs Note:the quarter end May 29 Reuter 

Chefs International Inc complete private sale nine mln unit security 20 ct unit total price 1800000 dlrs. The company unit consist share Chef's common stock three-year warrant exerciseable purchase share Chef's stock 25 cents. The company Robert E. Brennan purchase 8250000 units. Reuter 

Shr ct v nine ct Net 125465 dlrs v 245718 dlrs Revs 8.4 mln dlrs v 7.8 mln dlrs Note:the fiscal end March 31 Reuter 

The Pentagon stop approve military contract Japan's Toshiba Corp TSBA.T> Toshiba subsidiary's transfer submarine technology Soviet Union senior defense official said. "We approve contract (with Toshiba) pending satisfactory resolution entire matter" Deputy Assistant Defense Secretary Stephen Bryen told Reuters confirm publish report matter. The temporary ban Bryen effect unofficially April cost Toshiba hundred mlns dlrs electronics Pentagon include pending 100 mln dlr Air Force deal computers. Bryen U.S. military service sign contract Toshiba April publicity arose subsidiary Toshiba Machine Co's allege sale Moscow milling machine grind silent submarine propellers. The Japanese government investigate previously report Toshiba Machine sell milling machine Soviet Union late 1983 1984. But Bryen told Reuters interview Pentagon inform Japanese police small machine capable make precision propeller sell Kremlin apparently 1984. "There beyond that. I don't yet" Bryen said. Toshiba know seek U.S. Air Force contract 90000 lap-top computer worth 100 mln dlrs. The Air Force call bid contract partly Toshiba investigation Pentagon official said. The official identify computer contract re-advertised bidding change dlr-yen ratio question raise U.S. import restriction Japanese micro-electronics. Two day ago U.S. senator want temporary ban U.S. import Toshiba Corp product include television set videotape recorders. Senators Jake Garn Utah Richard Shelby Alabama John Heinz Pennslvania seek amendment major trade bill consider Senate summer. The Navy report furious technology transfer Pentagon official told Reuters state-of-the-art propeller already mount Soviet attack submarines. The Japanese government already prohibit Toshiba Machine Co do Soviet Bloc year. The Norweigan state-own firm Kongsberg Vaapenfabrikk involve original technology transfer provide vital computer software Japanese milling equipment. But Norweigan firm reorganize Bryen apparently involve allege recent transfer Toshiba Machine equipment. Reuter 

Archer-Daniels-Midland Co deny report interested acquire International Minerals Chemical Corp (IGL). "We International Minerals divisions" spokesman told Reuters. "We've conversation them." USA Today report Archer-Daniels-Midland seek hostile takeover International Minerals. Reuter 

Shr 15 ct v 10 ct Net 1790824 v 1031602 Revs 14.0 mln v 6.7 mln Nine mths Shr 41 ct v 23 ct Net 4830513 v 2296192 Revs 40.5 mln v 15.4 mln Avg shrs 12.0 mln v 10.5 mln Reuter 

One investor group formerly associate London investor Christopher Moran unsuccessful bid Zondervan Corp cut stake company five pct. In filing Securities Exchange Commission lead investor Lawrence Altschul James Apostolakis cut Zondervan stake 157500 share 3.8 pct total 246500 share 5.9 pct. The earlier month SEC filing want join group maximize share value sell 89000 share June 9 15 1.5 mln dlrs. The join Moran assemble combine 44 pct stake Zondervan unsuccessful takeover try. Last month Moran broke splinter various factions. Moran withdrew takeover effort report personal stake 4.8 pct. A lead Miwok Capital Corp California broker 10.6 pct stake lead Minneapolis stockbroker Jeffrey Wendel 2.6 pct recent SEC filing say seek agreement party seek control company. Reuter 

venezuela seek 2.4 billion dollar export financing 1987 double amount receive finance director jorge marcano said. Marcano told reporter finance ministry yesterday 2.4 billion total package 3.2 billion dlrs credit venezuela try obtain. "we've begin effort secure financing" said. Reuter 

America Pop Inc plan build joint venture partner Puissant Group 2.6 mln dlrs 120-unit Days Inn Motor Lodge Ohio State Fairgrounds Columbus. Construction expect complete late October. The company plan complete mid-October construction 60-unit Days Inn Athens Ohio November 60-unit Days Inn Motor Lodge Green Castle Pennsylvania. These project organize limited partnership said. Reuter 

Noranda Inc 1100 unionized worker 63 pct-owned Brunswick Mining Smelter Corp lead-zinc mine New Brunswick start voting Monday tentative contract pact. Company official Andre Fortier "We hopeful settle interruption." Fortier add Brunswick's estimate 500 unionized smelter worker currently meeting Noranda contract proposal probably vote week. The mine's contract expires July 1 smelter's July 21. The Brunswick mine produce 413800 tonne zinc 206000 tonne lead recovery rate 70.5 pct zinc 55.6 pct lead. Concentrates produce 238000 tonne zinc 81000 tonne lead. Reuter 

President Reagan's nominee top policeman nation's security market inherit agency challenged insider trading scandal wild stock price gyration host uncertainty stem globalization financial markets. David Ruder 58-year-old Republican law professor Northwestern University Evanston Ill. name Thursday 23rd chairman five-member U.S. Securities Exchange Commission. If confirm Senate expect succeed John Shad left agency earlier week record six chairman ambassador Netherlands. The SEC limelight past investigator probed colossal insider trading scandal uncovered Wall Street. The investigation active mushroom recent month grow know trader prominent investment banking firm charge wrongdoing. The pace probe picked markedly November Ivan Boesky Wall Street's successful stock speculator agree cooperate government investigator pay record 100 mln dlrs penalty illegal profit charge insider trading. But agency wrestling vex phenomenon huge rapid swing stock price spur computer-driven trading strategy span market security option futures. The price gyration combine rise trading volume bring unprecedented volatility U.S. security markets. At SEC press lawmaker stop abusive tactic corporate takeover contest unrelenting wave takeover steadily reshapes U.S. corporate landscape. And agency push U.S. foreign exchange intent expansion lay regulatory groundwork international security marketplace trading occurs across border throughout clock. Such worldwide trading network offer vast investment opportunity strain SEC's ability enforce U.S. security law guard investor fraud. Under leadership Shad SEC ease financial disclosure requirement publicly trade company eliminate minor investor protection rule attempt spur competition exchange streamline agency's review hostile corporate takeovers. Shad vice chairman E. F. Hutton investment banking firm brought Wall Street perspective agency name chairman 1981. In line view top administration official favor marketplace determination takeover battle federal regulations. The SEC Shad stress prosecution insider trading violation corporate wrongdoing case topped agency's enforcement agenda administration President Jimmy Carter Democrat. Securities lawyer industry official acquaint Ruder chairman-designate unlikely significantly alter commission's current priorities. The SEC currently 2000 employee lawyer annual budget 115 mln dlrs figure likely significantly high agency move beef enforcement staff. The agency government actually take money spent past fee charge company investment bank security firm regulates. The SEC structure independent regulatory agency meaning five commissioner appoint president fix five-year term protect fire policy difference alone. By law commissioner political party agency prepares budget request instead leave White House. Established Congress 1934 SEC trace origin stock market crash 1929 attribute widespread trading credit attempt market manipulation investment firms. The agency require company investment vehicle mutual fund issue periodic report financial condition disclose change condition issue securities. It require broker dealer investment bank register comply investor protection rule police exchange regulates trading practices. Its chairman Joseph Kennedy industrial magnate father John Kennedy nation's 35th president. Other former chairman include William Douglas serve 1937 appointment U.S. Supreme Court 1939 William Casey serve President Nixon's term Reagan's director Central Intelligence Agency death earlier year. Reuter 

The Administration Congress replace U.S. tariff schedule bring line international tariff category U.S. Trade Representative Clayton Yeutter said. The add item fiber optic accurately define composite item widely trade current schedule devise 30 ago. Yeutter Harmonized System schedule call change tariff category definition meet present-day need exporter importer pay rate duties. Yeutter "American exporter easy deal standardize worldwide variety differ system face." He end 12 multinational negotiation create unified tariff schedule. Yeutter government move base data tariff schedule improve knowledge trade flow quality decision-making. He 56 nation pledge bring standard half expect join January 1988. reuter 

Moody's Investors Service Inc affirm 500 mln dlrs debt PNC Financial units. Affirmed Aa-2 senior debt PNC Financial Corp PNC Funding Corp AAA long-term deposit Pittsburgh National Bank Aa-2 long-term deposit Citizens Fidelity Bank Trust. Moody's cite PNC's announce special second-quarter loan loss provision 110 mln dlrs raise loss reserve coverage loan economically troubled borrower less-developed countries. Moody's firm's financial condition change materially result action. Reuter 

A lead Chas. P. Young Co subsidiary Service Resources Corp cut stake Sorg Inc 366700 share 16.7 pct total outstanding common stock 385000 share 17.5 pct. In filing Securities Exchange Commission Young yesterday withdrew 23 dlr share takeover proposal member SDI Partners Ltd Partnership sell 18300 Sorg common share June 16 18 17-1/2 19 dlrs each. Reuter 

Audi America Inc increase price model average 3.9 pct 838 dlrs effective July 20. The increase applies Audi 4000S 4000CS Quattro Coupe GT 5000S sedan wagon 5000S Quattro 5000CS Turbo 5000CS Turbo Quattro sedan wagon model company said. Reuter 

Eaton Corp award 25 mln dlr contract U.S. Customs Service development intelligence intend intercept drug smuggle southern border U.S. The contract call company provide government current information gathering assessment technology available fight border drug traffic Eaton said. Reuter 

Qtly div 30 ct v 30 ct prior Pay July 16 Record July 6 Reuter 

Qtly div 20 ct v 20 ct prior Pay Aug 19 Record Aug 3 Reuter 

Shr profit nil v loss ct Net profit 39617 v loss 200740 Revs 619076 v 491085 Nine Mths Shr loss nil v loss five ct Net loss 68293 v loss 434087 Revs 1614960 v 1791148 Reuter 

Towle Co St. Louis Mo. investment advisory firm told Securities Exchange Commission acquire 55900 share Supreme Equipment Systems Corp 5.1 pct total outstanding. Towle bought stock investment purpose behalf advisory clients. Reuter 

Moseley Holding Corp expect loss fiscal quarter end June 30. The company loss related municipal bond unit trust corporate bond activity affected difficult bond market. The company loss area close mln dlrs April May. It mortgage-backed activity profitable months. Reuter 

Philadelphia Electric Co complete sale 1500000 share common stock continuous offering plan Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc. The company proceeds sale amount 32.4 mln construction program. Reuter 

Italy's Foreign Trade Minister Mario Sarcinelli comment speculation Italian press sharp balance payment deficit May attribute recent move liberalize purchase foreign securities. Sarcinelli react suggestion month's overall 3211 billion lira deficit compare April's 2040 billion surplus link May 13 decree abolish obligatory non-interest-bearing deposit foreign security purchases. "The deficit attribute premature delayed foreign trade payment receipt (leads lags) capital outflow portfolio investment" Sarcinelli statement. Earlier newspaper La Repubblica cite remark Bank Italy announce deficit May partly cause "non-banking capital outflows." "In practice seem constant flow capital foreign security investment outside borders" newspaper. But newspaper add move abolish foreign security purchase deposit affected Italy's balance payments. Reuter 

Allied Stores Corp> name Michele Fortune president division chief executive officer Ann Taylor division stores. Allied Fortune currently senior vice president-merchandising Lord Taylor> New York. Reuter 

Equitable Life Assurance Society United States> Hospital Corp America HCA> Equicor joint venture unit name William Hjorth vice chairman chief operating officer. Reuter 

Sico Inc agree principle buy U.S. asset Reichold Chemicals Inc's Sterling Group manufacture electrical insulation compound industrial resin develops coating electronics industry. Terms undisclosed. Sico acquire Sterling Group's Canadian asset February. It U.S. acquisition add 15 mln dlrs annual sale volume. Reuter 

A Boston investor investment partnership told Securities Exchange Commission sell entire stake Silicon Systems Inc 410000 share 6.0 pct total outstanding. The include HLM Associates HLM Associates II partner sell stock April 22 June 9 9.00 9.125 dlrs share result investment decision. Reuter 

Mosely Holding Corp expect report unspecified loss quarter end June 30. The company current quarter result reflect loss associate municipal bond unit trust corporate bond activities. It report net income 203000 dlrs cent share revenue 35.5 mln dlrs fiscal 1986 quarter. Reuter 

qtr end May 2 Oper shr ct v 11 ct Oper net 333000 v 885000 Revs 14.9 mln v 12.2 mln Note: Latest qtr exludes writeoff 735000 dlrs store renovation. Reuter 

A company include Chicago-based Coronet Insurance Co Sunstates Corp Jacksonville. Fla. real estate firm raise stake Tandy Brands Inc 175900 share 6.9 pct total. In filing Securities Exchange Commission bought 43600 Tandy common share May 21 June 9 633333 dlrs addition 132300 share 5.2 pct held previously. Reuter 

Wisconsin Electric Power Co amount slightly radioactive release Point Beach Nuclear Plant Two Creeks Wis. The company 235 gallon cool release Lake Michigan morning plant employee accidentally open valve cleaning hold tank. The company radioactive heavily dilute expect "no environmental health safety impact result discharge." Preliminary test lake sample detect increase lake radioactivity said. Reuter 

Gateway Medical Systems Inc withdrawn May 27 offer acquire Westworld Community Healthcare Inc>. The company remains interested acquire Westworld's hospital attempt continue negotiation Westworld. Reuter 

The Student Loan Marketing Association announce five-year fix rate note offer bearing 8.25 pct annum price 99.635. It note due 1992 offer mln foreign currency warrant 4.375 dlrs increase value U.S. dollar rise yen decrease dollar fall yen. Semi-annual payment book-entry note begin Dec 29 add obligation trade American Stock Exchange sell Morgan Stanley Co Inc Dean Witter Reynolds Inc. Reuter 

American Capital Corp offer holder 13325367 outstanding common stock purchase warrant 2.10 dlrs cash 0.09 share common stock outstanding warrant. The company offer remain July 21. It offer subject condition include completion pending offering series prefer stock. Reuter 

Argentine President Raul Alfonsin met hour International Monetary Fund Managing Director Michel Camdessus Argentine economy minister Juan Sourrouille discuss Argentina's economy commercial bank financing package. Sourrouille told reporter 91.5 pct 1.95 billion dlr loan form core package subscribed. Citibank chairman Argentina's bank advisory committee yesterday subscription total 91 pct. The IMF "critical mass" bank commitment need start disburse 1.83 billion dlr standby loan approve principle Argentina. Asked IMF stipulate critical mass Sourrouille "That define anywhere 90 pct do fine." Although money subscribed official note third Argentina's 350 creditor bank hold 93 pct debt. They worried persuade bank join deal. Monetary source Alfonsin Camdessus met mostly discuss Argentina's political economic situation. Alfonsin begin four-day private visit U.S. Philadelphia speak private World Affairs Council non-partisan body dedicate increase awareness international affairs. In speech Alfonsin economic integration Latin America overcome current crisis. "This (economic integration) probably audacious challenge face Latin America century audacious history" said. Reuter 

First Chicago Corp register offering nearly 2.5 mln share cumulative convertible prefer stock Series A value 50 dlrs share. The stock issue conjunction First Chicago's previously announce acquisition First United Financial Services Inc. First United holder option receive either First Chicago prefer stock cash exchange share provide 70 pct First United share exchange prefer stock. The prefer stock's conversion premium 22.86 pct. The dividend fix shortly closing rate cause prefer stock initially trade par subject minimum rate five pct maximum rate nine pct. Reuter 

Shr profit six ct v loss 18 ct Net profit 156000 v loss 212000 Revs 5094000 v 5669000 Reuter 

Qtly div 14.25 ct v 14.25 ct prior Pay Sept 21 Record July 1 Reuter 

Privately-held Joe Franklin Productions Inc enter preliminary agreement merge Assets Development Corp company. Terms disclosed. The company expect merge qualify listing NASDAQ. Reuter 

Dart Group Corp DARTA.O> comment report company accumulate share Dayton Hudson Corp. Dayton Hudson letter shareholder told "aggressive buyer" stock acquired. Wall Street source identify buyer Dart earlier thwart takeover attempt privately held Supermarkets General Corp. Reuter 

Bower industry Inc> change name Metalclad Corp restructure loan agreement bank. Under pact 3.5-mln-dlr revolve credit line convert 1.8-mln-dlr six note 1.7-mln-dlr revolve line credit. The company restructuring 4011000-dlr debt creditor whereby mln dlrs forgiven 1950000 dlrs convert long-term note due April 1989 61000 dlrs include line credit. Reuter 

Shr loss 33 ct v loss ct Net loss 320000 v loss 8000 rev 822000 v 405000 Reuter 

Qtly div 65 ct v 65 ct prior Pay July 22 Record July 10 Reuter 

Magnolia Foods Inc complete 250000 dlr private offering convertible prefer common purchase warrants. Magnolia sign license agreement approve conversion site Tulsa Okla. previously approve conversion site Colorado Springs Colo. open late July. Magnolia operates nine cafes: license joint venture company owned. Reuter 

Warehouse Club Inc sublease Chicago location close April review five mln dlr quarter reserve establish cover cost closures. The company told Reuters probably remove mln dlrs total reserve amount result high third quarter profits. In 1986 quarter Warehouse Club net loss 891000 dlrs 13 cent share sale 41.4 mln dlrs. The company achieve profit third quarter despite reduction reserve. Reuter 

WPP Group Plc> extend 50.50 dlrs share offer JWT Group Inc midday June 22. The company temporarily extend offer June 17 expiration date. Its 45 dlrs share offer JWT reject JWT expires July 10. Reuter 

Tenneco Inc Tennessee Gas Pipeline Co large interstate natural gas pipeline transport natural gas access rule Federal Energy Regulatory Commission FERC. In access gas pipeline serve purely transport company move gas supplier customers. Pipelines transport gas customers. Earlier week Transco Energy Co T> reject FERC guideline say offer access regulatory body offer solution exposure face gas bought sell. The exposure face industry stem pay contract pipeline bought gas long-term contract sell. The grow severe customer won cheaper source gas access. Some industry analyst speculate earlier week Tenneco follow Transco's lead close pipeline open-access take-or-pay issue. But Tenneco access "is step FERC take restructure gas industry U.S. FERC move industry restructuring transitional problem solved." A spokesman Tenneco face 1.7 billion dlrs exposure take-or-pay contract specific figure Tennessee Gas run 2000 mile pipeline Louisiana Texas New England. "We remain convince critical transitional issue face industry--take-or-pay--must resolve FERC near future. "A failure grave consequence industry's continued ability provide customer reliable natural gas" Tennessee Gas Transmission Co president R.C. Thomas. Reuter 

Consumers' Gas Co Ltd agree sell July 6 100 mln dlrs 10.60 pct debenture mature 2012 price 998 dlrs 1000 dlrs principal amount. The company proceeds corporate purposes. It underwriter Gordon Capital Corp. Reuter 

Maxicare Health Plans Inc end negotiation sell Maxicare Alabama L.P. (Complete Health Inc). The company week reach agreement principle Complete Health purchase health maintenance organization large Alabama. Maxicare term interest heatlh care provider built Alabama HMO. It intend health care provider Alabama far develop HMO. Reuter 

Shr loss 22 ct v loss 18 ct Net loss 2494000 v loss 1608000 Revs 3590000 v 1710000 Year Shr loss 68 ct v loss 53 ct Net loss 7318000 v loss 4160000 Revs 10503000 v 7134000 Reuter 

qtr end April 30 Shr nine ct v 17 ct Net 1026000 v 1840000 Revs 25.9 mln v 26.1 mln Year Shr 27 ct v 56 ct Net 2942000 v 5865000 Revs 95.7 mln v 96 mln Reuter 

venezuela turn international monetary fund credit country's overall effort reestablish financial flow abroad finance minister manuel azpurua today. "this secret. It's step executive begin take reestablish financial flow country" azpurua told reporter finance ministry. He specify type loan venezuela seek fund amount involved. A technical team imf currently caracas gathering data annual report venezuelan economy finance minstry said. Members mission met official ministry's finance department. Venezuela latin american debtor drawn standby extend fund facilty loan imf region's financial crisis 1982. The country imf quota 1.371 mln sdr's (1.75 billion dollars) accord fund's 1986 report. Reuter 

Cominco Ltd talk schedule strike worker Trail smelter Kimberley British Columbia lead-zinc mine. A company spokesman company union met informally Tuesday talk constitute formal bargaining session. The formal talk June 5. The worker strike May 9 production shut then. The Trail smelter produce 240000 ton zinc 110000 ton lead year. The Sullivan mine Kimberley produce 2.2 mln ton ore 1986 processing Trail smelter. Reuter 

The economy face lackluster growth risk recession recent improvement U.S. export falter economist say. Growth slow sharply month due weakness key housing auto sector far hamper unless consumer spending pick say. "These factor raise question: Is strength keep economy tip recession?" Lyle Gramley chief economist Mortgage Bankers Association former Federal Reserve Board official. The Commerce Department week economy grow robust 4.8 pct annual rate quarter U.S. monetary official call weak report. Housing start fell 2.7 pct May consumer spending rise weak 0.1 cent. "Our large visible industry -- auto housing -- falter export pick slack " Martin Mauro senior economist Merrill Lynch Economics told Reuters. Gramley worried consumer spending slow inflation rise faster real wages. To offset U.S. export continue rise return job manufacturing sector boost personal income consumption says. "I expect improvement real net export keep recession happen close call" Gramley said. Federal Reserve Board Governor Martha Seger told reporter apparent strength 4.8 pct growth figure result temporary buildup inventory recovery show anemia. Seger recovery stumble "The pace economy lack robustness factor monetary policy" - possibly signal Fed accommodative. Most economist predict growth slow 3 pct forecast Reagan administration 1987 warn dollar drop suddenly high inflation result add risk recession. Mauro 0.5 pct rise industrial production May despite cutback output auto industry inventory overhang exists. He say boost production small industry paper chemical lumber improve sale overseas due drop dollar. "They surge economic activity I keep recession" Mauro said. In speech financial planner week Beryl Sprinkel chief White House economic adviser predict trade deficit continue improve. "Prospects continued economic growth 1987 1988 quite favorable" said. But private economist raise concern resurgence inflation. Allen Sinai chief economist Shearson Lehman Brothers Inc. told Congress week inflation rise 4.5 five pct stay level 1989 1.1 pct increase 1986. The rise come sharply low dollar high oil energy price rise price service said. "The lesson history inflation genie get bottle continue persist" add Fed tighten credit. A major factor affect inflation value dollar continue fall feed inflation say prominent international banker. Rainer Gut chairman Credit Suisse told National Press Club dollar's downward trend yen mark continue United States world's large debtor nation. The Swiss banker economic indicator far slacken activity call naive belief five-year boom equity market forever. "It difficult optimistic" Gut said. Reuter 

The Food Drug Administration step test condom agency lead recall U.S. manufacturer detention foreign-made condom U.S. borders. The FDA industry standard require roughly 1000 condom leak. Condoms test pour 10 ounce look leakage. The FDA Schmid Laboratories Little Falls N.J. voluntarily recall lot Sheik Fetherlite condom distribute 22 account United States. The agency Schmid report condom transit wholesaler recall recovered. National Sanitary Labs Lincolnwood Ill voluntarily recall lot Protex Contracept Plus brand latex condom distribute wholesaler California retailer Indiana Michigan FDA said. The FDA National estimate none suspect lot remains market. The FDA National recall lot condom follow additional FDA tests. The FDA Circle Rubber Corp Newark N.J. voluntarily recall Saxon L'appel condom inform FDA test results. The FDA condom distribute North Carolina Illinois. The FDA urge condom maker April 7 inform consumer condom increase protection sexually transmit disease include AIDS. Since April FDA detain 15 shipment condom firm Korea shipment condom Malaysia. Reuter 

Brazil's coffee export amount 19 mln bag excellent crop estimate 35.2 mln bag IBC spokesman said. He export surpass average annual 18 mln bag mark especially final harvest conduct October November confirms crop 35 mln bags. He average limit error official crop harvest five pct above below estimate officially publish today. He IBC agree request producer Institute ask government monthly indexation guarantee minimum price. Reuter 

Endotronics Inc operation joint venture Summa Medical Corp SUMA.O> ended. The company venture provide production purification service biotechnology company contract basis. Endotronics reorganize Chapter 11 75 pct stake partnership. The company intend sell facility house operations. It review adequacy mln dlr reserve quarter end March 31 carry value facility. The company cessation joint venture move take refocus operation instrumentation business. The company previously longer perform research development health care technologies. Reuter 

Charter Oak Partners Connecticut investment partnership raise stake Facet Enterprises Inc 480000 share 9.6 pct total outstanding common stock 300000 share 6.0 pct. In filing Securities Exchange Commission Charter Oak bought 180000 Facet common share June 12 18.25 dlrs each. Reuter 

The six basis rise past month U.S. debt future extend week series U.S. economic report analyst dollar hold firm. "Interest rate decline approximately 50 basis point month largely indication inflation fear narrow U.S. trade balance nominal terms" Samuel Kahan chief financial economist Kleinwort Benson Government Securities said. Kahan recent government report show strength economy quarter concern whether U.S. economy sustain strength longer term. Weak U.S. economic growth hurt dollar direction debt future beneficial impact rate sluggish economy. The median trade expectation Tuesday's U.S. Consumer Price Index Durable Goods report 0.4 pct 1.5 pct respectively. Meanwhile eight billion dlr drop M-1 money supply announce week "surprising large expected" accord Kahan. "Unless quickly reversed" trend "will ensure June M-1 growth negative" Kahan said. Taken conjunction M-2 M-3 aggregate Kahan "slowed crawl below Federal Reserve Board annual targets" consequence hint economic weakness road said. Based chart formation T-bond future poise far gain advance slow recently analyst said. September T-bonds "are six point May 18" Merrill Lynch debt analyst Jim Duggan noted. September bond future climbed low 87 month ago 93 mid-June Duggan said. While follow-through buying aid advance bout short cover prohibit slide chart support rally September T-bonds thwart above 93 level. "The 93 level formidable resistance take activity anything trading range market" Carroll McEntee McGinley Futures debt analyst Brian Singer said. The dollar remains key fundamental factor U.S. currency little headway late analyst said. "The critical variable remain market value dollar" Kahan said. Additional influence week development ahead OPEC meeting impact size U.S. budget deficit "although forefront market week" Kahan said. In look ahead U.S. Treasury mini-refunding auction 24.25 billion T-notes Tuesday Wednesday Thursday Singer market likely greet result little excitement. However successful auction prove turn depend prevail market psychology. Reuter 

Canada Post federal government appoint mediator increasingly violent series strike country's letter carriers. The government expect respond quickly request union formally reject corporation's late offer settle four-day-old dispute. The state-run postal service halt replacement worker union blame trouble picket line. "We increasingly concerned safety employee strike employee replacement worker risk" Canada Post negotiator Harold Dunstan told reporter downtown Ottawa hotel. Robert McGarry president 20000 member Letter Carriers Union told reporter union leader consider suspend walkout week mediator involved. In bid step pressure management letter carrier walk Toronto 50 pct country's mail sorted. Workers picket line populous city southern Ontario center across Canada. There arrest property damage sometimes violent clash striker replacement worker whom corporation hire try keep mail moving. The Canadian Union Postal Workers (CUPW) represent postal employee letter carrier strike worker stabbed hospital scuffle broke replacement worker Toronto today. Police report stabbing. CUPW President Jean-Claude Parrot call resignation Andre Harvie minister responsible Canada Post condone so-called strikebreakers. "The federal government (the) blood worker hand postal strike" Parrot told reporter union's Ottawa headquarters. Reuter 

A federal judge heard argument Manville Corp's chapter 11 reorganization plan confirm December thrown out. During four-and-a-half hour hearing U.S. District Judge Whitman Knapp heard argument five appeals. Whitman issue advisement rule date. Key challenge Manville shareholder claim adequately represent bankruptcy proceeding 2.5 billion dlr fund pay victim asbestos overfunded. Another challenge asbestos victim claimed trust fund underfunded. Today Manville lawyer 54000 claim file injured asbestos. The reorganization plan set trust fund initial funding 125 mln dlrs pay property damage claims. Additional fund available needed. Manville currently 9500 property damage claim filed. Manville file bankruptcy 1982 reorganization plan approve party except common stockholders. The stockholder object proposal greatly dilute value holdings. The plan effect convert eight share common stock share. Manville lawyer criticize shareholder group far delay execution bankruptcy plan. Herbert Edelman Manville's lawyer point thousand victim creditor await payment victim already died. He point bankruptcy court found Manville insolvent. "They (shareholders) plan aside nebulous value road" Edelman said. Common shareholder claim adequately represent U.S. Bankruptcy Judge Burton Lifland refuse request divide equity holder committee separate group repesenting common shareholder prefer stock shareholders. During confirmation hearing plan equity committee's lawyer George Hahn walk hearing say represent groups. The equity holder committee abolished. An unofficial committee represent 10 pct company's stock confirmation hearings. However lawyer committee evidence cross examine witnesses. During today's hearing Paul Gonson Washington lawyer represent Securities Exchange Commission told Judge Knapp agency concerned shareholder adequate representation. Knapp unofficial committee represent New York law firm Kronish Lieb Weiner Hellman. "They law firm town" Knapp said. Reuter 

surinam bring dutch government court justice hague press resumption 100 mln dlr aid cut 1982 prime minister jules wijdenbosch said. Wijdenbosch told news conference tuesday government request court judgment aid suspend december 1982 murder 15 surinamese opposition leader government custody. Reuter 

Qatar franchise Cable Wireless Plc (CAWL.L) emirate newly-created Qatar General Telecommunications Corporation (QTELC). Cable Wireless operate Qatar 1951 expert staff provide technical computer service agreement sign QTELC. Cable Wireless manager Colin Davies told Reuters "Basically franchise situation 36 government decide big role course sovereign right." REUTER 

Banking authority police investigate allege fraud large trading Caracas free foreign exchange market Finance Minister Manuel Azpurua told reporters. The Superintendency Banks Technical Judicial Police begin probe Cambio la Guiara Azpurua Friday night. Police owner firm Mario Muggia brother Luigi Muggia left Venezuela. Cambio la Guiara operate "parallel market" trader buy sell dollar themselves. The Venezuelan central bank June 17 suspend licence 21 foreign exchange operator parallel market blame speculation constant rise value U.S. Dollar here. Juan Domingo Cordero vice-president Caracas Stock Exchange owner foreign exchange trading Friday begin legal action Cambio la Guiara issue check fund total amount mln dlrs. The Cambio la Guiara exchange operate Venezuela 20 years. REUTER 

Prospects Tokyo stock mixed week investor try figure future yen/dollar exchange rate digest implication OPEC's late accord crude output pricing broker said. They market extend dull trend 225-share index fell rapidly record close 25929.42 June 17. It end 24902.72 Saturday fell far morning close 24707.68 uncertain reaction weaker yen weekend OPEC accord. Brokers attention focus cheaper well-known stock exchange's section generally show resilience. The section index contrast close record 2404.64 June 26 surpass peak June 17 2401.71. "Probably share company involve domestic economy bet" broker Daiwa Securities Co Ltd. He observation base figure show activity Japan booming. The government Friday department store supermarket sale rise 7.5 pct May earlier order receive Japan's 50 major construction firm month 7.6 pct year. Brokers expect figure stock link domestic demand remain overpriced. "They hard company attractive niche domestic economy unaffected currency movement bet" broker foreign security decline identified. But sharp rise money supply voracious domestic consumption stir inflation fears. The consumer price index rise 0.2 pct May April third consecutive month month increase. Although investor unduly worried inflation erodes real value stock holding rise price arouse concern rate climb. The recent market advance assume far cut Japan's 2.5 pct discount rate. Such assumption die discourage investor broker said. If oil price rise stock market Japan suffer downturn high production cost stir inflation. But share price Japan's oil import company firm broker said. "I able justify mean cost import rises" broker Yamaichi Securities Co. "It happens." Export-oriented company continue recent rally dollar climb yen. But price blue chip exporter risen fast week make look attractive broker said. However dollar fall 140 138 yen market index rally broker said. A low dollar damp rise capital outflow dollar investment Japan's stock bond market broker said. And yen/dollar rate suppose reflect balance trade United States Japan low dollar bring pressure Japan expand demand American import stimulate local economy broker said. "If dollar fall buy domestic rise maybe buy exporters" foreign broker. REUTER 

Kuwait whose shipping repeat attack Iran full support Saudi Arabia Gulf ally senior government official said. Cabinet spokesman Abdul-Aziz al-Otaibi quote Kuwaiti news agency KUNA yesterday Foreign Minister Sheikh Sabah al-Ahmed al-Sabah told cabinet found "complete support...At delicate phase" visit Gulf Cooperation Council (GCC) states. The GCC economic military alliance generally support Iraq Iran comprises Bahrain Kuwait Oman Qatar Saudi Arabia United Arab Emirates. REUTER 

Santos Ltd STOS.S> significant oil discovery Mawson One Moomba block Cooper Basin South Australia. It flow oil sand average rate 1440 barrel 2131 2135 metre 6mm choke. Santos case suspend pending far evaluation. But proximity discovery exist production facility Gidgealpa South field allow Mawson One brought production rapidly. Santos 60 pct stake block Delhi Petroleum Pty Ltd> 30 pct South Australian Oil Gas Corp Pty Ltd> 10 pct. REUTER 

Year end December 31 1986. Group net profit 45.2 mln mark v 35.2 mln. Interest surplus 1.09 billion mark v 1.21 billion. Commission surplus 405.5 mln mark v 391.7 mln. Extraordinary earnings 784.4 mln mark v 82.6 mln. Published risk provision 865.9 mln mark v 366.7 mln. Balance sheet 59.89 billion mark v 63.67 billion. Full name Bank fuer Gemeinwirtschaft AG. Note. Figures revise provisional figure issue March. Extraordinary earnings link sale subsidiaries. REUTER 

Bank fuer Gemeinwirtschaft AG's BKFG.F> (BfG) partial operating profit month low period 1986 management board chairman Thomas Wegscheider said. But balance sheet total May pct high earlier saving continued flow bank told annual press conference. BfG parent bank partial operating profit halve 166 mln mark 1986 311 mln 1985 balance sheet fall 48.80 billion mark 49.02 billion. Wegscheider decline forecast full note month comparable 1986 period quarter 1986 extremely successful bank. The banking environment easy margin pressure security suffer markedly low bourse turnover sluggish credit demand said. "As specific BfG environment concerned note clear atmospheric improvement reflect figure slowly" added. Wegscheider bank recover speculation ownership unnerved customer financial crisis involve Neue Heimat housing link BfG's former trade union owners. Insurer Aachener und Muenchener Beteiligungs-AG AMVG.F> AMB acquire 50 pct plus share BfG late year. Wegscheider earnings trading bank's account 1986 little high partial operating profit perform half. Following AMB acquisition BfG sell 25.01 pct stake Volksfuersorge Deutsche Lebensversicherung AG> 74.9 pct BSV Bank fuer Sparanlagen und Vermoegensbildung AG> five pct Allgemeine Hypothekenbank AG>. These sale produce extraordinary earnings 700 mln mark parent bank earnings profit transfer agreement rise 494.18 mln mark 1986 54.24 mln 1985 earnings include write bank risk provision rise 317.95 mln mark 65.67 mln. Wegscheider extraordinary earnings risk provisions. Total risk provision undetailed twice 1985 Wegscheider said. Published risk provision rise 865.9 mln mark 366.7 mln. But share credit country cover risk provision below 50 pct BfG said. The BSV Bank stake sale main factor behind 3.8 billion mark drop balance sheet 1986. Wegscheider re-organization BfG plan AMB acquisition involve decentralization occupy BfG's energy year. BfG AMB look way cooperate sale services. REUTER 

South Korea's ruling party announce reform package include recommendation direct presidential elections. There immediate reaction President Chun Doo Hwan Democratic Justice Party (DJP) chairman Roh Tae-woo unveiled reform vowed resign rejected. Roh whose confirmation government candidate succeed Chun spark week massive demonstration country withdraw candidacy quit DJP post Chun fail accept package. "I reach conclusion I cannot choose direct presidential election overcome confusion achieve compromise" Roh said. There immediate indication soon Chun react Roh's proposal whether involve formulation. The president office 1980 follow military coup due step February election tentatively December. Under Roh's package Chun remain president successor chosen direct elections. At president chosen electoral college opposition say stack favour DJP. Among major change package offer release political prisoner guarantee human right free press. Kim Young-sam opposition Reunification Democratic Party "I wholeheartedly welcome Chairman Roh's announcement belated measure." A Western diplomat told Reuters "It's substantial courageous move." The surprise Roh's proposal amnesty lead dissident Kim Dae-jung ban politics suspend sentence sedition charges. The opposition demand met Roh's package RDP's insistence Chun step immediately. REUTER 

The World Bank prepared play aggressive role promote Third World development ease debt crisis bank president Barber Conable said. "We realistic immediate prospect expansion voluntary commercial bank lending World Bank play vigorous role debt crisis" Conable interview Newsweek magazine. Conable bank step relieve debt crisis prompt U.S. Commercial bank write portion Third World loans. "Our plan include initiative debt front great emphasis debt-equity swap promotion private investment Third World country affiliate International Finance Corporation" Conable said. "The bank primarily development institution debt-management agency. But debt manage effectively hamper development." Conable defend reorganisation plan bank aim improve efficiency limit bureaucracy. He add environmental consideration play large role evaluation propose projects. REUTER 

OPEC show control oil situation speed hammer pact limit crude oil output 16.6 mln barrel (bpd) rest 1987 oil trader said. They market respect cartel increase announce Saturday cut fourth quarter output 16.6 mln bpd 18.3 mln agree December. "There oversupply OPEC ... Has ensure oversupply fourth quarter effect put pressure end-users" European crude oil trader said. In Tokyo oil analyst "There's reason expect weak market on." A Japanese oil trader base Tokyo "We OPEC difficulty agree fourth quarter production market react bullishly." Traders Singapore slight increase spot quote Dubai benchmark crude expect price increase days. August Dubai discuss cautious activity 17.35 dlrs above Friday's 17.15-20 range below government sell price (GSP) 17.42. Even price Mideast grade Qatar Abu Dhabi crude expect improve recent weak position 15 20 cent below GSP's. Singapore trader seller aim GSP's least. They initial jump expect price stabilise hover GSPs months. They Japanese oil market affected Japanese end-users rebuild stock winter requirement October. Prices likely rise fourth quarter European U.S. Stockbuilding winter added. "There's doubt consumption high production fourth quarter stock high" international trader Tokyo. Another Tokyo trader bullish "For sure shortage depends (OPEC members) cheat." A Singapore trade source "There cheat leakage OPEC sale convince trader worry shortages." Other trader questionable Iraqi production level Iraq's rejection assign quota bearish factor considered. Traders end-users buy term contract buy spot market cool initial reaction OPEC agreement. Spot product price Singapore little change thin discussion naphtha middle distillate quiet minimal buying interest. Fuel oil product steady firm demand tight prompt supply dealer said. REUTER 

Producers news writer editor technician strike National Broadcasting Co (NBC) leave management employee jobs. The strike National Association Broadcast Employees (NABET) represent 2800 NBC's 8000 worker 12:01 A.M. (0401 GMT) network impose contract union unacceptable. The union main objection contract permit NBC employ additional part-time workers. The average salary worker represent NABET 65000 dlrs year. Union official management intransigent blame General Electric GE> purchase NBC parent company RCA 1985 flurry communication company takeovers. The strike NBC 1976. The side meet again. REUTER 

OPEC's agreement limit output 16.6 mln barrel (bpd) rest boost spot price enable raise official reference price 20 dlrs barrel January current 18 dlrs Far East oil industry source said. "Fundamentally market situation bullish official price 20 dlrs January" Japanese refiner said. The source spite over-production OPEC Iraq United Arab Emirates Kuwait Qatar demand exceed supply fourth quarter. Spot oil price surge Friday late U.S. Trading market anticipate OPEC agreement second-half 1987 output. In Tokyo trade level firm 17.30 dlrs Mideast Dubai cargo load month 19.00 dlrs U.K. Brent trader said. They expect foreign crude suck U.S. Market benchmark crude West Texas Intermediate (WTI) trade 20.30 dlrs. "With WTI 20 21 22 dlrs U.S. Refiners import Mideast Far East crude strengthen grade further" Japanese oil trader. Some Tokyo trader cautious whether thU spot market far upward potential short term have risen strongly OPEC news Friday. "You certainly argue New York rise basis there's reason price today" international oil trader Tokyo. "But I there's sign dip bought pretty quickly" added. One oil industry analyst concur "There reason expect weak market on." He expect OPEC raise price 20 dlrs meet December 9. Oil source spot price unlikely surge strongly month due cheat OPEC likelihood Saudi Arabia act swing producer maintain steady prices. Iraq currently produce mln barrel compare second-half quota 1.54 mln said. Its export capability rise 2.5 mln bpd pipeline Turkey come onstream September. Qatar achieve sale 350000 bpd OPEC-assigned quota 299000 discounting 20 cent barrel official price source said. Iran United Arab Emirates Kuwait cheat OPEC agreement over-production effective price discount counter-purchases industry source said. But mostly agree Saudi Arabia unofficially act swing producer cut production compensate high output boost output spot price rise fast. Saudi Arabia float oil stockpile 40 50 mln barrels. "Saudi Arabia want oil price stability stockpile utilized cool market rise much" oil industry analyst said. REUTER 

Japan ratify 1986 International Cocoa Agreement (ICCA) effect July 1 renew membership International Cocoa Organisation (ICCO) Foreign Affairs Ministry official said. They Japan participate ICCO meeting July 13 London revise ICCO buffer stock policy. The 1986 ICCA effect January 1987. Government approval participate ICCO delayed parliamentary debate sale tax issue official said. REUTER 

Kobe Steel Ltd> agree supply technology manufacture thin-walled copper tube air conditioner refrigeration unit Halstead Industries Inc> Zelienople Pennsylvania. Total demand copper tube U.S. Is 25000 tonne month 5000 thin-walled type Kobe statement. The company study joint partial production Kobe's thin-walled copper tube U.S. REUTER 

Lebanese bank employee one-day strike draw attention fate Central Bank colleague miss believe kidnap 1985. The strike shut foreign exchange market bank across country call Central Bank Employees' Union Bankers' Association group 80 Lebanese banks. The miss Christian employee believe kidnap cross Christian East Beirut Moslem West Beirut nearly ago. REUTER 

WPP Group Plc> Friday secure agreement bid JWT Group Inc> increase offer raise plan right issue raise 213 mln stg instead 177 mln finance deal. On Friday group agree merge WPP raise cash price 55.5 dlrs share 45.0 dlrs value JWT 566 mln dlrs. Under right proposal WPP shareholder apply ordinary share 875p two-for-one basis. The issue underwritten. The remainder purchase price loan facility 260 mln dlrs. The issue propose acquisition JWT remain conditional approval shareholders. The original proposal right issue basis five share held. The revise version involve issue 24.3 mln share represent 65 pct enlarge fully dilute share capital. WPP share quote 0757 GMt unchanged 10.70 stg. REUTER 

The act governor Saudi Arabia's state-owned oil company Petromin Jamal Hassan Jawa retire request oil industry source said. They Ali Ibrahim Rubaishi organisation planning Petromin act governor. Jawa held post predecessor Abdul-Hadi Taher left major oil industry shake December. The source Rubaishi expect hold post permanently. The government remove Taher Oil Minister Ahmed Zaki Yamani post late move industry source aim come grip buyers' oil market. The run Saudi oil industry 20 years. Industry source despite huge resource Saudi Arabia unable mould oil marketing strategy tune competitive reality 1980s glut. Hisham Nazer replace Yamani successfully lead OPEC-engineered return fix oil price 18 dlrs barrel December. Nazer believe review Saudi oil operation lead thorough overhaul Saudi Arabia source said. The source candidate governor's job include Prince Abdul Aziz Ibn Salman Ibn Abdul Aziz earlier ran research center Saudi Arabia's University Petroleum Minerals former Deputy Planning Minister Faisal Beshir. They list Abdulla Bakr President University Petroleum Minerals economist Ali Jonahi Ahmed Shinawi Zuheir Masoud director Jeddah Islamic Port. REUTER 

UAE Oil Minister Mana Said al-Oteiba arrive Alexandria visit Egypt Middle East News Agency (MENA) said. It Oteiba attend OPEC ministerial meeting Vienna stay day give details. Non-OPEC Egypt pledge restrain output support OPEC's move boost oil prices. Oil Minister Abdel Hadi Kandeel week Egypt plan leave oil production 870000 barrel unchanged five years. Egypt able produce mln bpd. REUTER 

Willis Faber Plc WIFL.L> agree 302.6 mln stg offer fellow insurance broker Stewart Wrightson Plc> joint statement said. The offer basis Willis share Stewart value Stewart share 655.5p. Willis already own 2.05 mln share 4.62 pct receive acceptance Stewart's director far 247469 shares. Full acceptance offer involve issue 66.2 mln Willis share 28.2 pct enlarge total. The company propose merger bring together business largely complementary. Both believe combination permit effective competition throughout enahnce service provide clients. Following merger company significant opportunity growth brokerage income considerable scope improve operating efficiency. Willis share suspend Friday 437p. When trading restart drop sharply 393p. Stewart Wrightson share rise 576p 0835 gmt suspension price 499p. REUTER 

New Zealand's opposition National Party cut personal tax regulate control rate return power. The economic strategy unveiled party leader Jim Bolger prime minister David Lange announces date election widely expect August 15. The National Party's tax policy include abolition death gift duty removal indirect tax basic food doctors' fees. The recent opinion poll take June 20 give Labour 26 lead National eight point month earlier. National administration New Zealand dollar level "complementary fiscal monetary policies." The party elaborate. Controversy National's economic policy erupt March former prime minister Robert Muldoon party adopt policy manage exchange rate. Bolger National Party continue float dollar. Since dollar float Labour Party March 1985 risen 34 pct cut export income farmer traditional National Party supporters. The party tight monetary policy alone lead unrealistic exchange rate line exporter unless support low government borrowing requirement shrink government sector positive growth. It aim keep aspect deregulation benefit New Zealanders cut government spending unemployment rate inflation tax. The National Party intend privatise totally Bank New Zealand> Development Finance Corporation> Tourist Hotel Corporation> Petrocorp> State Insurance> Government Life Office> party said. Other candidate privatisation Air New Zealand Ltd> consider share market absorb them. REUTER 

Norway extend 7.5 pct cutback plan North Sea oil output support OPEC July 15 Oil Ministry spokesman Egil Helle told Reuters. "We positive view OPEC meeting Vienna" said. "The accord reach mean stability oil market shall continue make contribution." The cut originally brought February 1 probably officially approve July 10 parliament Helle said. The ministry write Norway's oil company discus implement cuts. OPEC agree weekend Vienna output ceiling 16.6 mln barrel (bpd) rest 1987 retain fix price December accord base 18 dlr barrel reference point. OPEC's half 1987 output ceiling 15.8 mln bpd it's December pact provisionally third quarter ceiling 16.6 mln bpd rise 18.3 mln fourth quarter. Norway pump mln bpd offshore field previously continue output curb plan production rest OPEC remain December accord output prices. Norway's oil production rise 10 pct average 840000 bpd 1986. Since risen mln bpd expect reach 1.5 mln bpd 1995. The 7.5 pct cut plan production implement February reduce Norway's oil output 80000 bpd. Norway's Oil Minister Arne Oeien currently Iceland meeting Nordic minister official statement late oil production cutbacks. Over past lead non-OPEC producer include Soviet Union Mexico China Malaysia Egypt pledge support OPEC's bid keep price stable. Norway decide initial round cut follow OPEC agreement December boost oil price 18 dlrs barrel 14 15 dlrs December. Norway relies oil 40 pct total export earnings hit hard collapse oil price half 1986. But firmer oil price brought stability economy help narrow foreign trade deficit. Norway's North Sea neighbour Britain consistently refuse cooperate OPEC output cut say produce oil company level production. REUTER 

Brent Walker Group Plc> agree buy company comprise Lonrho Plc's LRHO.L> Metropole Casino Division together freehold central London 121.55 mln stg. Payment cash completion except mln stg payable December 1 1988. Brent propose raise 126 mln stg net issue 131.67 mln convertible share stg each. The share convert 1990 2002 rate ordinary share 15 convertible held. On full conversion issue ordinary share capital company increase 64 pct. Birdcage Walk Ltd> company control Walker own 20.68 pct share entitle 27.2 mln convertible share offer. The trustee indicate intend sell convertible nil paid enable remainder. Brent buy casino company freehold 45 Park Lane London. Under arrangement arrange repayment 6.45 mln stg inter-company debt. Brent Walker share firm sharply announcement 385p 353p Friday's close Lonrho firm 275p 265.5p. REUTER 

The Bank Japan bought 100 billion yen certificate deposit (CDs) via repurchase agreement show determination maintain easy money policy central bank official said. "Today's CD buying operation design seek announcement effect reassure market change policy stance" senior central bank official told Reuters. The bank bought 400 billion yen two-month commercial bill smooth tight credit condition interbank market official said. The central bank concerned grow market expectation high rate responsible recent plunge stock yen bond price official said. But money trader market generally shrug bank's CD operation rate below prevail market rates. The rate key three-month CDs primary market 4.08/00 pct bank's bid 3.75 pct said. The bank's bill buying operation little impact regard routine operation said. The money trader regard central bank's CD buying operation simply gesture live Japan's pledge guide rate low stimulate economy. "We expect central bank ease credit grip further" bank manager add prevail market expectation high rate remain. "If three-month CD rate stay above pct being" said. REUTER 

The Bank Japan tomorrow sell 1200 billion yen bill holding absorb project money market surplus 2100 billion money market trader said. Of total 800 billion yen yield 3.6004 pct sale money house bank security house 34-day repurchase agreement mature August 3. The 200 billion yen yield 3.6003 pct 43-day repurchase accord mature August 12. The remain 200 billion yen yield 3.6503 pct 50-day repurchase agreement mature August 19. The repurchase agreement yield compare 3.5625 pct one-month commercial bill discount rate 3.6250 pct two-month bills. They attribute project surplus mainly 1900 billion yen government tax allocation local government bodies. REUTER 

Sony Corp SNE.T> issue 75 billion yen 15-year unsecured convertible bond placement mainly Japan company spokesman said. Co-lead manager Nomura Securities Co Ltd NMSC.T> Daiwa Securities Co Ltd DSEC.T> Yamaichi Securities Co Ltd YSEC.T> Nikko Securities Co Ltd NIKT.T>. Coupon conversion price par-priced bond mature September 30 2002 board meeting held late July. Payment due August 17. U.S. And Canadian resident exclude subscribing. REUTER 

Group shr 24.20 yen v 37.42 Net 10.95 billion v 15.46 billion Pretax 25.25 billion v 31.15 billion Operating 28.39 billion v 31.73 billion Sales 592.37 billion v 593.86 billion NOTE - No forecast current REUTER 

Japan agree United States strengthen anti-submarine defence illegal high-technology Japanese export significantly damage mutual security U.S. Defence Secretary Caspar Weinberger said. Weinberger told press conference export Japanese machine design Soviet submarine quieter harder detect serious blow. But encourage punishment dealt Toshiba Machine Co subsidiary Toshiba Corp TSBA.T> illegal export Prime Minister Yasuhiro Nakasone's assurance action take keep happen again. The government bar Toshiba Machine export Communist country intend strengthen expand export control system. Weinberger give detail anti-submarine program. In talk Japanese Defence Minister Yuko Kurihara pitch American company seek build Japan's fighter aircraft 1990's. "I assure Minister Kurihara I support plan increase Japanese air defence capabilites I believe American aircraft this" said. The Japanese industry argues develop fighter plane own. REUTER 

Mazda Motor Corp MAZT.T> sign agreement import coal Coalex Pty Ltd> Australia Sumitomo Corp SUMT.T> Mazda spokesman said. Under agreement Mazda annually import 144000 tonne Australian coal worth nine billion yen. The coal fuel Mazda's energy centre due start operation November main plant Hiroshima western Japan said. He decline specify term contract add contract usually periods. REUTER 

Aug 12414 Oct 13929 Dec 1403 Mar 2901 May 482 Aug 716 Total 31845 

A split Thai government's main coalition party prompt Prime Minister Prem Tinsulanonda dissolve parliament soon Interior Minister Prachuab Suntharangun said. He told reporter Prem consider election squabble Democrat Party undermined government performance held legislation Prem want passed. But Prem reluctant call election reshuffle cabinet likely result wobbly multi-party coalition Prachuab said. He decline soon parliament dissolved. The Democrats party ruling coalition split win 100 parliament's 347 seat election July 1986. The current coalition form August constitutes hefty parliamentary majority. But Democrats' inability together coalition partner government vulnerable cohesive opposition. Parliament close annual session month schedule reconvene September. REUTER 

The Republic Portugal issue 700 mln French franc variable-rate bond due July 1995 100.05 pct lead manager Credit Commercial de France said. The issue unsecured unsubordinated debt coupon base three-month LIBOR plus 20 basis points. If date 25 pct above three-month Paris Interbank Offered Rates rate three-month PIBOR plus 30 basis points. Payment date July 24. There call par thereafter payment date. Listing Paris denomination 10000 100000 francs. Fees total 50 basis point 25 point sell 25 management underwriting combine include six basis point praecipuum. The issue rat A Moody's. REUTER 

The major benefit BHP Steel International Group's capital expenditure begin see 1988 financial end May 31 Broken Hill Pty Co Ltd BRKN.S> official said. A decline BHP Steel's net profit 200.02 mln dlrs 1987 end May 31 1987 253.87 mln contribute drop attributable earnings 820.27 mln dlrs 988.20 mln. "We look forward 1988 consolidation continue strong development initiatives" BHP Steel chief executive officer David Rice told reporters. Rice BHP Steel's capital spending 1987 total 701 mln dlrs total expenditure 1.4 billion dlrs government's five-year Steel Industry Plan expires calendar 1988. He investment aim make BHP Steel technically commercially competitive scale peak begin scale down. Operational commission problem flow investment combine high level industrial action steel plan start contribute decline 1987 earnings said. Rice industrial production problem force BHP Steel import 280000 tonne steel 1987 financial keep faith customers. The item plant past initial teethe problem talk intensified union industrial trouble said. Despite profit drop 1987 BHP Steel International profitable steel producer after-tax basis said. Its capacity utilisation high 89 pct current western average 69 pct added. REUTER 

IMF Managing Director Michel Camdessus paid brief weekend visit Ivory Coast discuss country's economic difficulty President Felix Houphouet-Boigny. Camdessus wish visit pleasant circumstance remark report official Ivorian daily Fraternite Matin. He add extremely steep fall agricultural commodity market dealt harsh blow Ivorian economy country experience growth difficulty international debt. Last month Ivory Coast inform creditor suspend payment foreign debt estimate eight billion dlrs. Camdessus agency study problem Ivory Coast solution depend coordinate effort country commercial bank government international finance institutions. He disussed problem develop country banking government official Abidjan. REUTER 

Yields certificate deposit (CDs) issue United Arab Emirates central bank unchanged Monday's offer bank said. The month yield week's 6-3/4 pct month CDs remain unchanged 6-13/16 pct. The six month yield seven pct. REUTER 

Zimbabwe's temporary freeze salary wage price economy breather radical economic reform need resuscitate attract foreign investment economist said. They June 24 freeze government company private sector wage January 1988 postpone provide solution Zimbabwe's economic problems. They urge review tax introduction investment incentive review foreign exchange price control check government expenditure. These measure aim stimulate investment create employment 100000 leaver annually seek jobs. The freeze Finance Minister Bernard Chidzero check production cost reduce budget deficit partly welcome criticise worker whose real purchasing severely erode 1980. The government announce freeze amid worsen economic crisis cause serious drought budget deficit billion Zimbabwean dlrs acute balance payment owe debt service cost 357 mln U.S. Dlrs external debt billion U.S. Dlrs. The crisis force country company halve dividend remittance overseas shareholders. The Zimbabwe National Chamber Commerce support freeze wage salary criticise promise stricter control price good services. "If company whose cost production increase allow price increase profit margin severely squeeze negate current government effort revitalise economy" chamber said. The Zimbabwe Congress Trade Unions freeze worsen plight low paid workers. The union body campaign minimum monthly wage 277 Zimbabwean dlrs (165 U.S. Dlrs). The low paid earn 100 dollar (60 U.S. Dlrs). "Inflation hit hardest low income bracket demand economic recovery programme bias favour" union body said. It add promise price freeze "bolting stable horse gone" price basic commodity already risen phenomenally. Both union hope freeze herald return wage bargaining worker employer government-regulated pay awards. Zimbabwe 1980 annual minimum wage sector economy award wage salary increment slide scale give high increase low paid. REUTER 

The European Investment Bank (EIB) lent 200 mln French franc French railway Societe Nationale de Chemins de Fer (SNCF) extend speed train system. It statement loan finance contruction 279 km track speed "TGV" train Paris Le Mans western France Tours south west. The loan pay trains. The EIB already lent total 600 mln franc SNCF speed train 1985 1986. REUTER 

Banks Singapore planning far expand treasury security equity debt instrument activity line global financial market banker economist told Reuters. "Banks move towards treasury activity vital link global capital foreign exchange markets" Clemente Escano vice-president Union Bank Switzerland said. Central link Asian Dollar Market's pool fund deposit estimate 212 billion dlrs March. Banks fond book tap offshore Asian Dollar Market fund variety reason include low taxes. New impetus market growth 52 billion dlrs March partly due liberalisation financial market Japan lead increase interbank activity banker said. Despite slowdown traditional loan syndication region offshore market continued grow bank rebundle securitise asset create generation tradeable debt instrument banker said. Singapore's daily turnover foreign exchange deal increase 30 billion U.S. Dlrs 1987 21 billion accord Finance Minister Richard Hu. Susumu Sakaguchi manager Dai-Ichi Kangyo Bank 22 Japanese bank Singapore expand foreign exchange department account 30 40 pct total bank activity year. Sakaguchi liberalisation Toyko market stimulate Asian Dollar deposit foreign exchange turnover lead active Japanese future trading Singapore International Monetary Exchange. Robin Tomlin manage director Singapore International Merchant Bankers Ltd international merchant bank cluster Singapore tax incentive presence major player shift regional capital flows. Tomlin pegged future Singapore banking industry security equities. "In 1988 expansion security trading follow link-up" Stock Exchange Singapore Dealing Automated Quotation System (SESDAQ) London exchange National Association Securities Dealers Automated Quotation System (NASDAQ) said. Equity equity-linked issue dominate financial market date buoyant domestic international stock markets. Tomlin privatisation programme Singapore abroad encourage huge flow capital banks. Applications receive 30 mln Singapore Airline share offer week worth 601.1 mln Singapore dlrs. The share offer Sembawang Maritime Ltd rake record 6.8 billion Singapore dlrs May year. Bankers Singapore's privatisation link exchange abroad show determine international stance. Singapore's major local bank venture stockbroking government security market SESDAQ compete successfully merchant banks. Tomlin merchant bank continue play role Singapore domestic capital market modest size total market limit potential entrants. Bankers total 650 mln U.S. Dlrs raise Singapore capital market volume issue grow 1987. Total lending bank Singapore fell 1.04 billion dlrs March 1987 compare follow trend towards asset management service capital market activities. Hans-Rudolf Schaub senior vice-president manager Swiss Bank Corp bank chosen Singapore Asian treasury centre favourable tax rule offshore bank political stability economic growth. He bank security portfolio management service addition exist link international money market service Zurich New York. REUTER 

The Philippines foreign creditor bank sign formal document mid-July restructure debt Central Bank said. A spokesman told reporter document formalise agreement reach March restructuring 10.3 billion dlrs total foreign debt 28.2 billion. The rate spread agree 7/8 percentage LIBOR. The spokesman give date signing. Manila demand renegotiation Argentina won 13/16 percentage spread drop demand. REUTER 

Belgium current holder European Community presidency appear ready drop controversial oil fat tax year's hotly-contested farm price package diplomat said. In discussion document prepared today's summit meeting EC leader Belgium propose so-called "stabilising mechanism" subject "further study consultation Community's main trading partners." The proposal tax 330 Ecus tonne import domestically-produced vegetable marine oil fat attract storm international criticism. The discussion document aim prevent cash row summit break deadlock year's farm price talk contain formal reference drop measure. Britain Denmark assumes EC presidency June 30 lead opposition measure. They support West Germany Netherlands lesser extent Spain. Although paper universally welcome diplomat proposal postpone consideration tax far six month survive redrafting. REUTER 

Samsung Semiconductors Inc> U.S. Subsidiary South Korea's Samsung Semiconductors Telecommunications Co Ltd> sign 22 mln U.S. Dlr loan arranger LTCB Asia Ltd said. The eight loan grace period. Interest 1/4 percentage London interbank offer rate rise 3/8 thereafter. Management fee 1/2 pct flat include 1/4 pct praecipium. Participating loan addition LTCB Credit Lyonnais Daiwa Overseas Finance Ltd Taiyo Kobe Finance Hongkong Ltd Takugin International (Asia) Ltd. REUTER 

Bahrain's 19 commercial bank instruct Bahrain Monetary Agency (BMA) return six work week effect July 4. A circular sent bank revers shift April five week follow month controversy domestic banking sector hours. A BMA spokesman circular affect offshore bank represent "compromise solution" differ view industry drawn follow agency's survey bank staff customers. In April BMA allow commercial bank operate five week Sunday Thursday. Banks close Fridays Islamic weekend Saturdays. The regulation require bank 7.30 A.M. To 12 noon Saturday Thursday inclusive. Banks day afternoon 3.30 5.30. The regulation apply bank opening hour staff work hour continue decide banks. Under five week introduce April bank oblige 8 A.M. Until noon 3.30 5.30 P.M. REUTER 

The Bank Japan increasingly worried crash high-flying financial market Bank Japan source said. "We're afraid someday bubble burst deflationary impact economy disastrous" source said. They central bank embark delicate policy -- want deflate speculation pumped price sharply recent month bursting bubble. Stock price plunge 393.31 point extend sharp decline earlier month market speculate rate rise. The Bank Japan bought 100 billion yen certificate deposit (CDs) via repurchase agreement show determination maintain easy money policy central bank official said. Today's CD buying operation design reassure market Bank change policy senior central Bank official told Reuters. "There possibility deflationary impact permeate economy price exist asset collapsed" Bank Japan earlier month annual economic report. Such possibility heighten Bank see excessive speculation stock bond land prices. Over stock market average double drive price/earnings ratio 70 compare 15 Wall Street. Bond yield drop sharply land price Tokyo soared. The excessive speculation mean market increasingly touch economic reality vulnerable central bank source said. A collapse rob businessmen consumer little confidence economy yen-induced recession past private economist said. Some hard-pressed exporter already great profit financial dealing basic business said. "There seem accelerate demand money support transaction share bond land exist asset little bearing value add therefore GNP" Bank Japan report. The increase inclination investor seek capital gain accompany rise price exist asset dangerous implication economy added. In Bank's view major reason behind skyrocket price easy monetary policy belief market rate head inexorably lower. Mindful potential inflationary danger pose excessive liquidity Central Bank's board recently decide spell clearly market far discount rate cut off source said. But bank tighten monetary policy run risk market collapse. This achieve partly rise short-term rate Bank source ascribed seasonal pressure change market expectations. While deny bank tighten monetary policy senior source welcome change market expectations. The source acknowledge shift cause partly decision press commercial bank limit lending July/September period. Faster expect economic growth strong dollar played part. In longer run Central Bank counting gradual upturn economy draw liquidity financial market productive area capital spending Bank Japan economist said. But wait occur six month avoid overt tighten monetary policy collapse market lead recession. REUTER 

Bangladesh's trade gap expect widen fiscal 1987/88 begin July 1 government relaxed restriction import include luxury cars. The country export target 1.1 billion U.S. Dlrs import 1.805 billion dlrs compare 1986/7's billion dlrs export earnings 1.113 billion dlrs imports. Commerce Minister Mohammad Abdul Munim change aim encourage export orient industry boost foreign exchange earnings import essential machinery raw material increase industrial production. The government ease procedure enhance incentive especially exporter textile frozen food importer industrial machinery raw material Munim told reporters. Commerce Ministry official told Reuters import policy cover commercial import amount 1.805 billion dlrs. Imports capital machinery foodgrains government include policy added. They country's total import bill (both commercial imports) expect reach 2.7 billion dlrs compare 2.4 billion dlrs 1986/87. The minister end restriction import car drop 50 pct sale tax car harm economy. Munim Bangladesh fear far drop price main export jute "which certainly affect export earnings" come year. Bangladesh's jute export fell 410 mln dlrs 500 mln 1986/87 accord official figures. But Munim export non-traditional item account 40 pct total export play key role achieve 1987/88 export target. REUTER 

China Australia's Victoria sign joint venture contract 290 mln dlr aluminium processing plant China export South Korea Australian official told journalists. China official direct trade government tie Seoul maintains close link North Korea. China International Trust Investment Corporation (CITIC) 75 pct equity Bohai Aluminium Industries Ltd> company build roll mill extrusion plant northeast China coast said. It China's large joint venture said. "A joint venture open potential penetrate market otherwise (for China)" Victoria treasurer Rob Jolly said. An Australian diplomat CITIC eager pursue South Korean markets. Indirect trade China Seoul grow officially publicised. Victoria's Aluvic Ltd> behalf government hold 25 pct equity stake project intend sister plant Victoria's Portland aluminium smelter. CITIC May agree invest 80 mln dlrs Portland. The China-based joint venture process Portland aluminium aim sell aluminium product domestic Chinese market export Jolly said. The Australian side's investment limited 22 mln dlrs Aluvic appoint key manager said. Australian official hop goodwill generate participation lead far CITIC investment Victoria. The Chinese enjoys level independence Peking's central government extensive overseas investments. REUTER 

Norway's central bank sell crown market bid ease strong upward pressure currency threatens rise above level basket currency dealer said. The central bank decline comment dealer note bank intervene sell amount crown Friday. The bank commit defend crown level basket 14 trade-weighted currencies. "They've morning sell piecemeal whenever necessary" senior dealer Oslo bank decline identify told Reuters. The crown's index currently 109.60 basket -- close upper limit 109.50 central bank commit defending. A low index figure indicates value crown. The limit scale 114.50. The crown bolster Norwegian rate currently 16 pct money market expect economic indicator show sharply reduce foreign trade deficit May inflation stabilise current annual rate 10 pct. REUTER 

United Merchant Finance Ltd joint venture Barclays Plc Jardine Matheson Holdings Ltd planning 200 mln H.K. Dlr certificate deposit issue banking source said. The five issue call option third fourth carry 1/4 percentage Hong Kong interbank offer rate payable quarterly. The management fee 25 basis points. Jardine Fleming Co Ltd lead manager. Co-managers Barclays Baring Brothers Asia Ltd East Asia Warburg Ltd Indosuez Asia Ltd Mitsubishi Finance (Hong Kong) Ltd. REUTER 

Prime Minister Yasuhiro Nakasone's diminish hope overhaul tax dealt serious blow report sharply high expect tax revenue 1986/87 government official said. Nakasone argue tax reform provide revenue 1000 billion yen tax cut promise government's emergency economic package month. But argument undercut report 1986/87 tax 2500 billion yen expected. That mean government money fiscal end March pay plan tax cut have recourse unpopular tax measure propose Nakasone official said. The Prime Minister propose indirect tax abolition tax break saving way raise revenue offset tax cuts. But stiff opposition force shelve idea indirect tax being. He hope gain parliamentary approval month abolish tax break savings. The high expect revenue 1986/87 partly stem increase receipt land security tax price share land soar official said. But corporate tax revenue buoyant expect indicate recession induced strong yen bad said. The final figure 1986/87 revenue due release Finance Ministry July 1. The high revenue fiscal undercut attempt Finance Ministry's budget bureau reduce investment spending government department 1988/89 budget official said. A budget bureau official bureau want stick so-called "minus-ceiling" policy call government department reduce investment spending five pct year. But acknowledge difficult sharp increase revenue fiscal heavy domestic U.S. Pressure ministry stimulate economy. REUTER 

Share analyst commentator Volkswagen AG VOWG.F> suffer enormous loss recover 473 mln mark currency swindle. An auditors' report affair prepared week's annual shareholders' meeting largely clear management Volkswagen blame. But "mud sticks" Gavin Launder analyst Scrimgeour Vickers London. (See index ECRA) The financial daily Boersenzeitung write commentary: "More devastate loss link currency scandal result loss image company." VW provision 473 mln mark cover loss unauthorised foreign exchange deal auditor Deutsche Treuhand-Gesellschaft highlight major gap supervisory apparatus firm's financial department. The auditors' report highlight failing VW's control especially relation 385 mln mark deal Hungarian National Bank shed little made. It contract benefit VW advantageous banks. It detail foreign exchange dealer profitted. It concluded: "The nature scope technical construction deal ... Suggest target professionally execute manipulation detriment VW." The finance department Rolf Selowsky resign day scandal broke March. He accuse wrongdoing auditor conclude "not apply necessary diligence instances." Two former VW foreign exchange dealer arrested. But VW admits report publish week reveal company failings. Peter Frerk temporarily take Selowsky's reponsibilities finding "not class acquittal." The currency swindle "lamentable event company" told journalists. The auditor remain VW's management board supervisory board correctly fulfil obligation verdict certainly mean major West German bank vote behalf number shareholder ratify board July 2 meeting. Many market analyst especially London believe sharp rise VW's share price week reflect major reassessment firm basis auditors' report. The stock close 430 mark Friday 11 pct week earlier. Dealers referrred short-term bargain-hunting London broker "I'm sure it's bargain." Most broker recommend client buy levels. Analysts believe VW match 1986 net profit 582 mln mark broker London company lucky report profit 15 pct down. VW expect fare market Europe. But sale fall sharply U.S Brazil late price freeze exacerbate result further. The company hope benefit term takeover Spanish company SEAT subsidiary produce losses. VW announce deal build pick-up truck Toyota Motor Corp TOYO.T> under-utilised plant Hanover analyst note production expect fully 1990. REUTER 

Top-level talk week European Community (EC) United States fail resolve dispute pasta provoke trade friction month diplomatic source said. The U.S. Insists EC complies regard unambiguous ruling trade body GATT dismantles export subsidy lead Italy take increase share U.S. Pasta market. The source EC currently provide subsidy 16 cent pound offer compromise week's talk Brussels reject U.S. U.S. Assistant Special Trade Representative Jim Murphy return Washington ahead theoretical July 1 deadline agreement August side resolve related dispute EC restriction U.S. Citrus imports. The diplomatic source citrus issue reopen pasta dispute solve quickly. It U.S. Would reimpose 40 pct tariff EC pasta lift citrus row settled. But side agree extend deadline day EC Commissioners Willy de Clercq Frans Andriessen due visit Washington July 7 10. REUTER 

The coupon 100 mln dlr five equity warrant eurobond Nicherei Corp indicate 1-3/8 pct lead manager Nikko Securities Co (Europe) Ltd said. The exercise price 974 yen share represent premium 2.53 pct today's closing price Tokyo. The foreign exchange rate 147.45 yen dollar. A 50 mln dlr seven deal Nichirei price morning lead manager Yamaichi International (Europe) Ltd. REUTER 

Polish farmer receive price rise range 13.4 pct crop 23.3 pct meat July 1 Finance Agriculture ministry said. The procurement price rape rise 13.4 pct 5500 zloty quintal wheat rye average 18.2 pct 3100 2400 zloty quintal. Pork rise 18.8 pct beef 23.3 pct. The ministry price aim ensure farmers' profit meet high living costs. But fertiliser rise average 50 pct animal feed 38 pct tractor 25 pct. REUTER 

European Community agriculture minister meet tomorrow even two-day summit meeting head government attempt agree 1987/88 farm price package EC Commission spokesman said. He add tomorrow's EC Official Journal contain notice special agricultural measure purely technical nature effect July 1 unless minister reach accord. The spokesman decline detail special measure sort "dynamic" move EC Farm Commissioner Frans Andriessen complete deadlock farm ministers. These move take tomorrow's meeting minister Brussels fails reach accord EC source said. Andriessen prepared cut cereal price seven pct drastic action trade source said. EC farm minister end meeting June 18 split Commission's proposal tax vegetable marine oil fats. In addition West Germany veto plan cereal price cut change green currency system. Earlier diplomat Belgium current holder European Community presidency appear ready drop plan controversial oil fat tax. REUTER 

Land Securities Plc LAND.L> issue 75 mln stg convertible eurobond due December 31 2002 indicate coupon 6-3/4 seven pct par pricing lead manager J. Henry Schroder Wagg Ltd said. The issue callable 106 pct decline pct annum par thereafter callable 1992 unless share price exceeds conversion price 130 pct. The sell concession 1-1/2 pct management underwriting pay 1/2 pct. Final term July 8 expect conversion premium 13 18 pct. The payment date July 30. The issue available denomination 1000 stg list London. REUTER 

Degussa AG DGSG.F> plan one-for-five right issue 225 mark share raise nominal share capital 61 mln mark current end September 30. The company statement raise nominal share capital 20 mln mark share swap plan takeover French medicine Laboratoires Sarget SA>. The capital measure raise Degussa nominal share capital 365 mln marks. Degussa week intend buy 100 pct capital medical pharmaceutical Sarget base Merignac near Bordeaux. Sarget 1986 sale France Belgium Netherlands Spain Portugal Italy 730 mln French francs. Degussa pay Sarget 20 mln mark nominal 50-mark share today's Frankfurt opening price 494.70 mark worth nearly 198 mln marks. A 61 mln mark nominal capital increase 225 mark raise 274.5 mln marks. Degussa 20 mln mark nominal capital increase form issue share non-cash consideration. The April 10 annual meeting agree right issue capital already authorize unissued. The right issue involve 61 mln mark nominal capital increase lead Dresdner Bank AG. Following capital increase Degussa left 19 mln mark authorize unissued capital Degussa spokesman said. Part 274.5 mln mark right issue Serget acquisition added. REUTER 

Ricoh Co Ltd RICT.T> predict net profit 11 billion yen end March 31 1988 0.5 pct earlier assume yen/dollar rate 140 yen company spokesman said. Sales 1987/88 expect rise 6.4 pct earlier 630 billion yen increase overseas production improvement domestic sale network. The company earlier report net profit 10.95 billion yen 1986/87 29.2 pct earlier. Sales 0.3 pct 592.37 billion due reduce export cause yen's appreciation dollar. Ricoh's export accounting 34.2 pct total sale 39.6 pct earlier fell 13.8 pct earlier 202.83 billion yen 1986/87 domestic sale rise 8.7 pct 389.55 billion. REUTER 

Canada threaten stop import Danish pigmeat July 14 Canadian veterinary inspector approve 33 slaughterhouse Danish agriculture ministry official told Reuters. The Canadians postpone original July 1 deadline request European Commission Denmark approach support. Danish Foreign Minister Uffe Ellemann-Jensen interview daily Berlingske Tidende: "Denmark accept ban Danish meat export I be sure reach understand Canadians EC." Danish pigmeat export Canada worth 106 mln crown 1986 Canadian export European Community total 6.5 billion U.S. Dlrs. Some Danish slaughterhouse official express suspicion Canadian action response tighten EC veterinary inspector Canadian food export EC. But official Canadian embassy Copenhagen inspection Danish slaughterhouse base EC regulations. "Canadian official concerned trade implications. We hold active discussion EC bilaterally" added. REUTER 

Following extract communique issue conclusion OPEC conference here. "The conference express satisfaction positive result agreement sign December 1986 OPEC re-established fix price level 18 dlrs barrel support OPEC production ceiling distribute production levels. "The conference note market indicator include spot price market netback value OPEC crude firm significantly consolidate OPEC price structure define agreement." "The conference examine supply/demand outlook half decide secure continued firm price market OPEC production fourth quarter 1987 equal third quarter I.E. 16.6 mln barrel (bpd) distribute production level define above-mentioned agreement quarter." "Furthermore conference decide establish committee five head delegation monitor price evolution market relation OPEC official price secure price stability opec price structure. "Should significant change market price committee immediately call extraordinary meeting conference view decide necessary OPEC production level half secure desire market stability." "The conference reiterate necessity member countries' strict adherence agreement sign December 1986 term official price production levels. "For purpose conference decide establish committee head delegation undertake visit member country motivate comply term agreement." "Moreover conference stress necessity cooperation oil-producing export country outside OPEC essential prerequisite last market stability. The conference therefore decide reinstate five head delegation establish 77th (extraordinary) meeting conference April 1986 undertake necessary contact countries. "The conference observe continued fall value U.S. Dollar agree matter study report meeting conference." "The conference discuss appointment secretary decide discus matter ordinary meeting. "The conference extend term office Fadhil al-Chalabi deputy secretary period October 7 1987. "The ordinary meeting conference convene Vienna December 9 1987." REUTER 

Bundesbank President Karl Otto Poehl West Germany badly advise low rate believe economy continue recover six-month lull. Asked newspaper Bild be Sonntag low rate boost domestic economy Poehl said: "We badly advise force far rate cuts. "This circumstance release inflationary fear likely lead high rates" added. Poehl Germany practically growth past six month mark's surge cold winter. "But April statistic clearly show economy find course growth" said. "I expect development continue come months." Asked expectation U.S.-European Community trade Poehl event disastrous. "For reason Europe avoid everything protectionist force U.S. As pretexts" added. "This includes...Eliminating exist restriction EC possible. Protectionism found U.S." Reuter 

Argentine Economy Minister Juan Sourrouille left weekend United States talk creditor bank IMF aim obtain release loan semi-official news agency Telam said. It Sourrouille urge IMF release 480 mln dlrs compensatory loan fall export tranche standby loan total 450 mln dlrs. Release fund standby loan delayed Argentina's failure win final approval 1.95 billion dlr loan creditor bank condition IMF disbursement. Banks pledge 97 pct 1.95 billion dlr loan IMF yet define amount constitutes "critical mass" need release IMF fund fund creditor banks. The president Argentina's bank steer committee William Rhodes Citibank Friday loan agreement Argentina sign August. Reuter 

OPEC output half 1987 include Iraq above official 16.6 mln barrel (bpd) output ceiling agree OPEC Saturday Kuwait oil minister Sheikh Ali al-Khalifa al-Sabah said. Iraq refuse sign pact OPEC maintain ceiling 16.6 mln bpd third fourth quarter 1987. In December OPEC provisional fourth quarter level 18.3 mln bpd cut third quarter target. Ali told news conference include Iraq "OPEC third quarter output 17.5 17.7 mln bpd fourth quarter output nearly 18 mln bpd" Ali detail effect production level prices. Iraq official half quota 1.466 mln bpd rise 1.54 mln half refuse adhere recently produce mln barrel export pipeline Saudi Arabia Turkey. Iraq's export capacity far boost 500000 bpd oil pipeline via Turkey come stream September. Iraq insist quota equal Gulf War enemy Iran quota 2.255 mln bpd rise 2.369 mln half. Ali position 400000 bpd production Neutral Zone Saudi Arabia Kuwait supply Iraq relief crude fixed. "We discus it. There change" said. Ali conference Thursday end Saturday even short necessary problem adressed. "We overdo hold short meeting. We sweep lot carpet" said. Ali price differential price various OPEC crude dealt properly meeting. Ali "The differential real one. I hate produce crude dealt properly. Light crude overprice relative heavy crudes." Asked issue differential raise OPEC meeting held Vienna December 9 Ali "If crude affected I raise issue I minister." Kuwait's crude range medium heavy grades. OPEC reintroduce fix price February 1 spread 2.65 dlrs barrel light heaviest crudes. Reuter 

Iraq reject OPEC production quota Vienna half official Iraqi news agency INA reported. It quote Oil Minister Issam Abdul-Rahim al-Chalabi return Sunday say "Iraq continue adhere position consider include agreement." Last December Iraq reject assign half 1987 quota 1.466 mln bpd demand share equal 2.255 mln bpd quota Iran enemy nearly seven-year-old Gulf war. The accord reach OPEC minister Vienna Saturday output ceiling 16.6 mln bpd group's 13 July December raise Iraq's share 1.54 mln bpd Iran's 2.369 mln. Reuter 

Shr 15.8 cent v 12.9 cent Int div six cent v Group net 19.90 mln dlrs v 16.25 mln Turnover 390.70 v 381.60 mln NOTE - Div pay Aug 3 register July 31. Co say expect result half similar half. REUTER 

Year end March 31 Group shr 33.98 yen v 39.10 Net 21.16 billion v 19.96 billion Current 45.23 billion v 32.87 billion Operating 77.17 billion v 63.90 billion Sales 616.96 billion v 527.88 billion NOTE - The company 37.6 pct increase 1986/87 current profit earlier mainly due drop billion yen payments. REUTER 

France's state-run television channel TF-1 process privatise achieve profit 25 franc share loss profit TF-1 president Francis Bouygues said. Interviewed TF-1 eve flotation 40 pct channel's equity Bouygues "in 1988 profit profit." "I envisage share profit 25 francs" said. "I be optimistic." Bouygues exceptional cost associate restructuring station prevent profit year. The sell 50 pct stake TF-1 April consortium lead Bouygues construction magnate include British press baron Robert Maxwell. Tomorrow 40 pct share sale 165 franc 10 pct offer special price 132 franc share station's staff. Bouygues dividend paid shareholder station return profit. Asked flotation price Bouygues "I paid virtually double...I consider buy." The Bouygues consortium paid billion franc 50 pct control stake April. After two-week flotation TF-1 share start trading market late July. REUTER 

French buying remain stable despite low economic growth investment rise sharply Prime Minister Jacques Chirac said. "I maintain buying power... I fall" Chirac told radio interviewer yesterday. Last French household buying rise 2.9 pct. Chirac economic growth substantially low originally forecast investment rise close 16 pct 1986 1988 period reverse 3.8 pct decline previous four-year period. REUTER 

Henkel KGaA HNKG.F> expect 1987 turnover profit exceed 1986 level recent acquisition compensate negative impact strong mark manage board chairman Helmut Sihler said. He told annual meeting base Henkel's performance profit increase "not insignificant." World sale rise six pct five month compare 1986 period turnover rise pct currency factor said. Sihler profit increase surpass turnover give figure. As report net profit rise 28 pct 226 mln mark 1986. World sale volume rise six pct currency factor trim turnover six pct 8.7 billion marks. Sihler 1986 profit/sales ratio 2.6 pct rise far year. Sihler turnover grow equally sectors. As report 1986 dividend ordinary voting share rise 4.50 mark 3.50 1985 dividend non-voting preference share increase 7.50 mark compare mark six month 1985. REUTER 

South Korea's ruling party seek direct presidential election solve acute political crisis country party spokesman said. The Democratic Justice Party ask President Chun Doo Hwan accept opposition demand direct poll current turmoil said. The party urge Chun allow amnesty top dissident Kim Dae-jung immediate release political prisoners. - REUTER 

Hitachi Ltd Japan's HIT.T> Hitachi Electronic Devices (S) Pte Ltd suspend sell colour television tube United States January anticipation "dumping duty" push U.S. Market final duty assessed. A company spokesman Commerce Department assess temporary 1.52 pct duty tube company. The department ass final dump duty September 8. The company Singapore's exporter colour television tube U.S said. 

Ivory Coast rainfall season previous 1986/87 cocoa coffee production suffer official Ivorian daily Fraternite Matin reported. The newspaper speculate whether recent dry condition seriously threaten main 1987/88 cocoa crop. Trade source weather irrelevant rainfall come weeks. Precipitation campaign low northern savannah region cotton crop especially benefit dry weather Fraternite Matin said. Agriculture Minister Denis Bra Kanon earlier month 1986/87 cotton output record 213506 tonne compare 190000 tonne 1985/86. Fraternite Matin mainstay Ivorian agriculture little affected dry weather. Coffee survive cocoa plant affected region added. London-based dealer Gill Duffus recently forecast 1986/87 Ivory Coast cocoa output record 590000 tonne compare 585000 estimate 1985/86. It described development main crop patchy. The U.S. Agriculture Department (USDA) earlier forecast drop 1986/87 coffee production Ivory Coast due drought western country. It estimate crop 3.84 mln bag compare previous year's 4.33 mln bag harvest. Ivorian official described year's coffee crop "normal." REUTER 

Year March 31 1987 Share 106 rupee v 130 Pre-tax profit 995.2 mln rupee v 1.57 billion Net profit 875.2 mln v 1.07 billion Sales 14.16 billion v 12.85 billion Dividend 25 pct v Tax 120 mln v 500 mln Note - Full company name Tata Iron Steel Co Ltd TATA.BO>. Dividend payable shareholder Aug 12. REUTER 

Kraft Inc complete previously announce acquisition Anderson Clayton Foods Division Quaker Oats Co 235 mln dlrs cash. Reuter 

Nearly 1000 employee Bangladesh Shipping Corp call two-week-old strike Saturday authority agree consider demand high wage benefit corporation official said. The employee walk June 11 demand force government-run corporation engage navy personnel unload grain country's big Chittagong port. Anwarul Haq director corporation striker join morning authority assure review demand soon. Reuter 

Ing C Olivetti EC SpA OLIV.MI> contact Telerate Inc TLR> U.S. And unidentifed group view strengthen economic news agency Radiocor - Agenzia Giornalistica Economica Finanziaria SRL> Olivetti spokesman said. The spokesman respond Reuters query follow item Milan weekly Milano Finanza say Dow Jones Co Inc DJ> control stake Telerate partner Radiocor subscribe capital increase. The spokesman Telerate company Olivetti contact view strengthen Radiocor entry partner accord reached. He decline identify company involve Milano Finanza name owner Italian financial daily Il Sole 24-Ore Societa Elenchi Ufficiali degli Abbonati al Telefono> likely partner Telerate. Olivetti month announce joint information technology deal Societa Elenchi specialises publishing telephone city directory Italian publishing L'Espresso>. Olivetti chairman Carlo De Benedetti told Olivetti annual meeting week entry partner Radiocor plan elaborate. Industry source believe talk Olivetti Telerate take months. Olivetti acquire 76 pct stake Radiocor December increase stake agency 100 pct. The takeover follow May acquisiton De Benedetti's French hold company Cerus> stake 35 pct French financial information agency Dafsa>. In May Cerus acquire 4.9 pct stake British publishing financial service Pearson Plc PSON.L>. REUTER 

Scientific Micro Systems won major original equipment manufacture contract value 12 mln dlrs Siemens AG SIEG.F> West Germany. The company contract handle Scientific Micro Systems GmbH Augsburg supply multi-function disk tape controller SCSI ESDI interfaces. Scientific supplier computer equipment include data controller mass storage subsystems. Reuter 

Baker Fentress Co name James Gorter chairman fill vacancy create death June 23 Chairman Chief Executive Officer James Fentress. Gorter partner Goldman Sachs Co Baker Fentress director 1978. The company Daivd Peterson president 1982 elect chief executive officer. Reuter 

Autospa Corp wholly own Autospa Franchising Corp subsidiary enter agreement form joint venture franchise Autospa Flat Proof Service Centers Seal-It Corp private Los Angeles-based automotive aftermarket company. Under agreement AutoSpa Franchising Seal-It hold 50 pct joint venture company shares. Reuter 

Marine Corp receive proposal Marshall Ilsley Corp MRIS.O> Marine shareholder receive Marshall Ilsley common stock combination cash stock equal 62.50 dlrs share Marine common. It proposal consider Marine board analysis advisers. Reuter 

Diversified Diagnostic Industries Inc> receive approval Food Drug Administration (FDA) sceening kit test salmonella food include meat. The test call Chik Chek over-the-counter test salmonella determine 15 minute bacteria poultry pork red meat egg dairy product company said. Diversified kit us chemical process detect bacteria available nationwide shortly. According company FDA estimate mln Americans suffer salmonella poison illness range mild gastrointestinal distress arthritis typhoid fever. Reuter 

Fieldcor Inc one-time 30 mln dlr special provision quarter loss loan develop countries. The corporation profitable quarter despite action reduce quarterly net income 23 mln dlrs 37 ct share fully dilute basis. For year-ago quarter Fieldcor report earnings 24.8 mln dlrs 95 ct share. Fieldcor expect report "strong earnings" half year. It earn 92.3 mln dlrs 3.69 dlrs share fully dilute 1986. The company loan develop country experience payment liquidity problem total 88 mln dlrs represent 1.3 pct total loan portfolio. It change current dividend policy. Reuter 

IMF Managing Director Michel Camdessus paid brief weekend visit Ivory Coast discuss country's economic difficulty President Felix Houphouet-Boigny. Camdessus wish visit pleasant circumstance remark report official Ivorian daily Fraternite Matin. He add extremely steep fall agricultural commodity market dealt harsh blow Ivorian economy country experience growth difficulty international debt. Last month Ivory Coast inform creditor suspend payment foreign debt estimate eight billion dlrs. Reuter 

Flash flood wind trap 10000 injured 50 northeastern Bangladesh's Sunamganj district official said. They knee-deep 10 village follow heavy rain Wednesday recede extensively damage crop property. The situation aggravate 40-mile-per-hour storm swept across yesterday flatten 200 house official give details. Relief Ministry official describe flood "routine hazard" told Reuters relief squad dispatch food medicine. Reuter 

Premier Group Holdings Ltd PMLJ.J> anticipates current fiscal profit show reasonable increase share result rise 43 pct 233 cent company annual report. The profit projection assume "no far significant political deterioration inside South Africa unmanageable increase sanctions" industry Premier involve company added. The company total turnover 2.62 billion rand end March 31 operates food fishing pharmaceutical leisure industries. Reuter 

Micron Products Inc agree acquire Numedco Inc Myraid Group Inc> 500000 Micron common share 2400 share 1000 dlrs par value prefer undisclosed amount cash. The company acquisition approve Micron Myraid director subject approval shareholder companies. Micron 1.9 mln common outstanding. Numedco increase Micron's sale 800 pct earnings 100 pct said. In nine month end March 31 earn 269000 dlrs sale 2.7 mln dlrs. Reuter 

OPEC's weekend decision cut plan oil output level half 1987 renew market confidence oil price outlook rest boost international spot price oil trader said. Spot crude price stand 80-85 cent barrel high start OPEC meeting Thursday continue rise week said. The optimism spring agreement reach OPEC minister Vienna Saturday fix July-December output ceiling 16.6 mln barrel (bpd). At previous meeting December OPEC provisional 16.6 mln bpd output limit third quarter propose sharp rise 18.3 mln fourth. The ceiling newly restore fix price 18 dlrs barrel. When sign emerge Friday OPEC contemplate cut plan fourth quarter ceiling spot price widely trade crude oil Britain's Brent Blend surge 30-40 cent barrel. Traders trend continued cautious rally morning London take quote level 19.25/35 dlrs compare 18.45/50 dlrs middle week. Most trader international oil market react bullishly news final agreement. They forecast tight supply demand oil increase onset Northern Hemisphere winter far rise spot prices. "There scramble oil third fourth quarter year" trader said. "In past month already see rise demand particularly U.S. And I expect high prices" added. Mehdi Varzi analyst stockbroker Kleinwort Grieveson London agreed. Varzi told Reuters OPEC anything cautious set output ceilings. "There chance Brent crude oil hit 20 dlrs barrel month" said. Laurie Law analyst E.F. Hutton Co Inc New York weekend spot price West Texas Intermediate (WTI) rally 22 dlrs 20 dlrs now. WTI U.S. Benchmark crude usually fetch premium 80 cent dlr Brent. So spot Brent held mostly 18 19 dlrs barrel. But trader fear continued over-production OPEC sound note caution accord. Iraq refuse party agreement OPEC minister repeat demand production quota Gulf War enemy Iraq. In recent month Iraq produce 500000 bpd above assign quota begin pump far 500000 bpd export pipeline come stream September. According Kuwaiti oil minister Sheikh Ali al-Khalifa al-Sabah actual OPEC production fourth quarter above official ceiling nearly 18 mln bpd. REUTER 

In fast pace personal computer industry million six month opportunity exist company seek capitalize delay IBM software standard. When International Business Machines Corp IBM> announce generation personal computer PS/2 April decide establish operating machine death sentence billion dollar software exist system. Because IBM world's large computer company - 70 pct world's computer bear IBM logo - industry analyst IBM's competitor expect operating call OS/2 commonplace current standard MS-DOS now. "By 1989 half 60 pct personal computer sell OS/2" predict George Colony president consult firm Forrester Research Inc. But opportunity analyst firm sell advanced version MS-DOS specialise multi-tasking software package Unix alternative MS-DOS developed American Telephone Telegraph Co T> developed follow engineer federal government. OS-2 IBM develop Microsoft Corp author MS-DOS ready six months. IBM week product schedule analyst software developer skeptical delay major software product commonplace. Initial acceptance likely hinder disgruntlement hardware software vendor alike prefer keep make product try true MS-DOS accord Paul Cubbage software analyst market research firm Dataquest Inc. Compaq IBM's major personal computer competitor already stick MS-DOS standard. Compaq president Rod Canion recently "automatic mass migration" OS/2. "(Advanced MS-DOS) application continue meet broader user need OS/2 supply becomes available" said. Cubbage acknowledge "it probably really useful application available OS-2" create opportunity multi-tasking programs. "But come memory limit get you" said. IBM's operating event computer industry PS-2 announcement itself. The computer powerful Intel Corp's fast 80386 microprocessor expect rejuvenate sag sale personal computer industry already give boost IBM. Company official week 250000 PS/2s ship 2-1/2 month introduction IBM expect record pc sale th result. The enthusiasm PS-2 particularly strike full potential powerful computer cannot tapped operating level software available analyst said. OS-2 allow user program task personal computer ideally slowdown operation capability industry strive for. Microsoft already promising alternative OS-2 particular advanced version Windows multitasking conjunction MS-DOS. Microsoft chairman Bill Gates suggest advanced version Windows 386 announce September available six eight week price 100 dlrs 300 dlrs. OS/2 expect cost 325 dlrs. Some software developer design 80386-based personal computer superior OS/2 allow user multitask application disruption. But analyst comment user really multi-taksing operating 80386-based personal computer desire met primarily Atlanta software publisher The Software Link Inc. In late spring company announce PC-MOS/386 multi-tasking multiuser operating compatible MS/DOS work 80386-based computers. The company fill 2500 order week availability expect shipment reach 40000 end. International Data Corp analyst Will Zachmann Unix promising alternative OS/2 IVM available. IBM endorse Unix PS/2 model announce version Advanced Interactive Executive (AIX) Unix compatible operating system. But federal government require Unix compatability computer contract company provide Unix-style operating system IBM systems. ATT week ago introduce version Unix compatible 80386 microprocessor IBM's computer specifically. Analysts announcement move Unix accepted strong alternative OS/2 IBM chance off. Reuter 

Kuwait aid recovery oil price announce mildly expansionary budget 1987/88 3.3 pct rise deficit 1.38 billion dinars. Oil revenue slash 40 pct original budget 1986/87 end tomorrow forecast rise 4.2 pct 1.73 billion dinar 1987/88 Finance Minister Jassim al-Khorafi said. This account 87.2 pct total estimate income start July 1 compare 86.6 pct original 1986/87 estimate Kuwait News Agency Kuna quote saying. Spending ministry institution forecast 3.4 pct high 3.16 billion dinar 1987/88 11 pct cut current fiscal year's budget. In addition government usual transfer sum equal 10 pct total expect revenue special saving reserve future generations. The minister mention deficit covered. He give actual outturn spending income 1986/87. REUTER 

Prime Minister Jacques Chirac attack budget proposal European Community's executive Commission say ignore effort cut spending add division issue hard resolve week's EC summit. The Commission propose radical change member country contribute budget suggest payment link economic output instead tax revenue. But richer northern nation Britain West Germany France insist stricter spending control agree reform. "The proposal Commission level compatible effort nation make reduce spending ... Therefore problem" Chirac radio interview. EC leader try resolve dispute reform agricultural spending largely blame expect 5.7 billion dlr shortfall EC budget year. Chirac West Germany pressure powerful farm lobby alone oppose reform common agricultural policy France share common position issue 10 EC states. Reuter 

French financial Metrologie International issue 73.8 mln franc worth stock option bond Banque Paribas lead manager. The eight-year issue par carry six pct payable August 3. Existing shareholder priority subscription 1000 franc nominal bond basis bond 14 share held. Each bond accompany warrant give subscribe 40 franc nominal share price 580 francs. REUTER 

Two supertanker attack Gulf Iranian gunboat Saturday anchor Bahrain damage inspection shipping source said. The 224607 tonne Norwegian ship Mia Margrethe Liberian-registered Stena Concordia 273616 tonne fire Saudi Arabian coastline. Agents tanker Bahrain told Reuters extent damage yet estimated. Both ship inspect Bahrain repair Arab Shipbuilding Repair Yard Co. The U.S. Frigate Stark damage month Iraqi air attack Gulf left Bahrain Sunday anchor mile shore. The vessel due return shortly U.S. far repairs. Reuter 

Allis-Chalmers Corp company domestic affiliate file voluntary petition reorganization Chapter 11 Federal Bankruptcy Code U.S. Bankruptcy Court Southern District New York. The company unit outside United States affected action. Allis-Chalmers rapid agreement essential restructuring plan announce March 4. However company "agreement work short frame available determine practical alternative obtain court protection." "This protection enables keep operating ordinary course afford obligation complete operational restructure strategy." Allis-Chalmers proposal announce March call complete restructuring obligation capital structure major structural change operations. The company fund generate U.S. operation currently inadequate meet U.S. obligation primarily due carryover discontinue drastically downsize businesses. It fund produce non-U.S. operation readily available meet obligation include health care retiree debt service carry large Allis-Chalmers earlier years. Allis-Chalmers U.S. cash flow exceed negative 24 mln dlrs 1986 negative mln dlrs quarter 1987. The company finance portion debt service obligation sale asset rely short-term waiver lender prevent default principal payments. Because Allis-Chalmers' financial position financing facility available outside Chapter 11 add substantially U.S. asset inventory pledge security debts. Reuter 

First Chicago Corp First National Bank Chicago subsidiary agree principle acquire 35 pct Wood Gundy Corp international investment banking firm headquarter Toronto. Under term agreement bank Canadian bank subsidiary First National Bank Chicago (Canada) invest 271 mln canadian dlrs combination newly issue common equity convertible debenture Wood Gundy said. First Chicago agree invest additional fund jointly Wood Gundy venture capital merchant banking businesses. Wood Gundy shareholder retain 65 pct ownership said. First Chicago investment Wood Gundy consistent recent legislation remove ownership restriction broaden access Canadian security industry. The propose agreement subject approval U.S. Canadian regulatory agency completion definitive agreement. The transaction expect complete September 30 1987 soon thereafter added. First Chicago investment Wood Gundy permit consolidate enhance position Canada internationally provide basis future growth. Reuter 

Period end March 31 Oper shr loss 1.07 dlrs v applicable Oper net loss 49098000 v n.a. Revs 240.5 mln Avg shrs 45810000 Year Oper shr loss 84 ct Oper net loss 36609000 Revs 766.2 mln Avg shrs 43428000 NOTE: Full name Lorimar Telepictures Corp Prior-year comparison applicable. Lorimar Telepictures merge February 1986 Earnings exclude loss discontinue operation 13562000 dlrs 30 ct share quarter 21992000 dlrs 51 ct share Reuter 

Pullman Co PCII Acquisition Co subsidiary complete previously announce tender Clevite Industries Inc. Pullman midnight June 26 5248712 share Clevite common 278965 share nonvoting common 1913194 warrant tendered. Including 989426 share nonvoting common stock Pullman option buy Prudential Insurance Co America total share warrant represent 99 pct common nonvoting common Clevite 96 pct outstanding warrants. Reuter 

Leaders European Community (EC) two-day summit reform group's creak finance head agenda official said. The 12 government leader join French President Mitterrand foreign ministers. The twice-yearly meeting examine issue especially Middle East diplomat group's cash crisis dominate talks. Reuter 

Allied-Signal Inc Schlumberger Ltd SLB> Schlumberger acquire Allied-Signal's Neptune International unit headquarter Atlanta Ga. undisclosed sum. Allied-Signal Neptune produce meter flow measurement equipment sale 80 mln dlrs. The company Schlumberger's activity include provide oil field service locate produce oil gas manufacture electricity gas meter utilities. Reuter 

Di Giorgio Corp dig> receive unsolicited letter Gabelli Co Inc> propose Di Giorgio recapitalization stockholder receive 20 dlrs share cash securitites include subordinate note prefer stock common stock. Di Giorgio letter estimate total value security eight dlrs share. It transaction subject completion due dilligance investigation obtain necessary financing. After Di Giorgio's board investment banker evaluate letter respond company said. Reuter 

Soviet Prime Minister Nikolai Ryzhkov described Soviet Union's economic management obsolete call Supreme Soviet nominal parliament adopt draft law major economic reform. In speech 1500 member body Ryzhkov excessive central control Moscow-based ministry wasteful resource lead situation 13 pct Soviet industrial enterprise make loss 1986. He face acute food housing problem "shadow economy" grow meet demand. He add USSR fail keep technology revolution. "The method past economic management obsolete" Ryzhkov declared. "The change evident urgent." Kremlin leader Mikhail Gorbachev tone week frank speech economy speech. The legislation outline Ryzhkov formally call draft law enterprise expect approve Supreme Soviet effect January 1. Under law enterprise financially self-supporting take charge income outlay wage tie profit increase worker incentive. Firms compete order due decline direct contract enterprise expand. Ryzhkov planning agency Gosplan restructure economic priority instead administer factory directly five plans. "We fundamentally approach yearly planning" add say annual central plan abandon 1991 enterprise charge develop plans. He scientific research integrate closely industry technology gap West enterprise market research meet consumer demand. Ryzhkov blame supply body Gossnab allow shortage occur. He Gossnab hoard 27 billion rouble worth raw material semi-finished product enterprises. He Gossnab expand wholesale trade. Ryzhkov improve economic management consumer good service require stem increase speculation growth black market economy. He call 10 fold increase cooperative field. He price need radical revision accurately reflect supply demand set price "products importance" change fully five plan begin 1991. The practice use credit cover loss stop. Outstanding debt reach 40 billion roubles. He proposal replace "cumbersome" banking six bank -- bank bank foreign economic relation agro-industry construction housing commercial service credit. Ryzhkov guarantee built law prevent "the distortion right enterprises." But non-profitable enterprise declare bankrupt effort self-supporting failed. Bemoaning "economic illiteracy" manager call retrain economic personnel. Ryzhkov immense amount lay ahead "doing go" difficult add "We stop ponder." He change "give image socialism." REUTER 

First Chicago Corp First National Bank Chicago subsidiary agree principle acquire 35 pct Wood Gundy Corp international investment banking firm headquarter Toronto. Under agreement bank Canadian bank subsidiary First National Bank Chicago (Canada) invest 271 mln canadian dlrs combination newly issue common equity convertible debenture Wood Gundy. First Chicago agree invest additional fund jointly Wood Gundy venture capital merchant banking businesses. Wood Gundy shareholder retain 65 pct ownership. Reuter 

The coupon 50 mln dlr seven equity warrant eurobond Nicherei Corp fix indicate 2-7/8 pct lead manager Yamaichi International (Europe) Ltd said. The exercise price 974 yen share represent premium 2.54 pct today's close Tokyo 950 yen. The foreign exchange rate 147.45 yen dollar. Nicherei launch 100 mln dlr five equity warrant deal Nikko Securities Co (Europe) Ltd. The coupon issue fix 1-3/8 pct earlier today. REUTER 

Chicago Mercantile Exchange floor trader commission representative guesstimate today's hog slaughter 260000 265000 versus 259000 week ago 262000 ago. Cattle slaughter guesstimate 127000 130000 range versus 125000 week ago 138000 ago. Reuter 

AMEV Holdings Inc New York-based operating arm NV AMEV AMEV.AS> The Netherlands parent company Security Mutual Finance Corp reach definitive agreement sell Security Mutual USA Financial Services Inc. Security Mutual base Decatur Ala. operates 33 loan office fourh Southeastern 90 mln dlrs receivables outstanding. USA Financial subsidiary Chicago-based United Savings America. Reuter 

PGI-Houtex private Houston company bought 80 pct common stock Seis Pros Inc 2.85 dlrs share found stockholders. It total price 3100100 share 8835285 dlrs. Completion merger transaction expect months. Reuter 

Shr 50 ct v 40 ct Net 20.8 mln v 16.4 mln Revs 531.7 mln v 418.7 mln NOTE: 1987 qtr net gain discontinue operation 47.1 mln 1.64 dlrs share. 1986 qtr end May 31. Reuter 

Munson Geothermal Inc plant project development Nevada completion value 70 mln dlrs. The company appraisal conduct Marshall Stevens Inc. Munson financial adviser Samuel Montagu Capital Markets call appraisal. Montagu assist Munson raise 20 mln dlrs additional financing complete exist installation Brady Hot Springs Nev. create geothermal generate facility Black Butte Nev. Munson partner invest 9.0 mln dlrs Brady project 9.7-megawatt facility appraise market value 28.5 mln dlrs completion base income approach. Munson partner 30-year sale contract Sierra Pacific Resources SRP>. Reuter 

Ciba-Geigy Corp> close June 25 approximate Spectra-Physics Inc SPY> share tender 116271. The company June 26 offer purchase outstanding share Spectra-Physics 36.50 dlrs share extend 5 p.m. New York City July one. Reuter 

Core-Mark International Inc agree sell asset fast food subsidiary Sandy's Fast 'N Fresh subsidiary Vista Group Ltd Los Angeles base investment banking firm. Core-Mark undisclosed proceeds sale 80 pct cash 20 pct note. Part proceeds pay exist bank line credit company said. Reuter 

Madagascar tender 10000-tonne cargo soft red winter wheat last-half July first-half August shipment PL480 financing U.S. exporter said. Reuter 

Moseley Securities Corp Howard Berg resign chairman chief executive officer. It Frederick S. Moseley III assume position chairman. In management change Omar Kassem name vice chairman chief executive officer James Wolitarsky executive vice president chief financial officer appoint president chief operating officer. The company name Management Committee consist Wolitarsky six executive vice presidents. Reuter 

West Germany's foreign trade current account surplus expect decline slightly 1987 record level economist said. Figures release Federal Statistics Office Wiesbaden show five month trade surplus grow 15.7 pct compare 1986 period 47.2 billion marks. The current account surplus rise 9.8 pct 33.7 billion marks. West Germany report 1986 current account surplus 77 billion mark trade surplus 113 billion marks. Economists expect rise mark year-ago level start biting strongly nominal surpluses. The real surplus already declining. The Statistics Office cheaper import price take consideration West Germany's import volume rise pct five months. Exports risen pct real terms. The government point strong real rise import export reject international pressure boost domestic consumption. The Statistics Office West Germany's trade surplus risen May 10.6 billion mark 8.9 billion April 8.1 billion May year. The current account surplus risen 7.5 billion mark May 6.1 billion April 6.3 billion mark earlier. Exports rise strongly year-ago month 6.6 pct 43.31 billion mark May import 32.76 billion mark risen 0.8 pct year. The Ifo economic research institute Munich study publish trade surplus probably fall 101 billion mark compare 113 billion mark 1986 record. It predict fall current account surplus 61 billion mark 77 billion. Ifo reduction "a step reduce imbalance economy." Peter Pietsch economist Commerzbank AG predict 1987 trade surplus 100 billion marks. He slightly high current account surplus Ifo possibly 65 billion marks. Helmut Henschel Westdeutsche Landesbank 1987 trade surplus 95 billion mark current account surplus 60 billion marks. He strong rise export May year-ago period surprising probably reflect calendar factors. REUTER 

Texaco Inc U.S. Securities Exchange Commission urge Texas Supreme Court accept Texaco Pennzoil Co PZL> review respect Commission Rule 10b-13 applies fact case. Texaco pleased encourage SEC's decision point "Pennzoil's counsel told trial court 'If Rule 10B-13 impediment contract void' far allege contract void "we case.'" In letter date June 26 SEC's counsel told attorney represent Texaco Pennzoil commission urge Texas Supreme Court review issue federal security law Texaco-Pennzoil Texaco said. "This inform commission determine file brief amicus curia (Texaco-Pennzoil) litigation. The brief focus Commission Rule 10b-13 applies fact urge Texas Supreme Court accept review respect issue" letter said. The SEC's counsel "we currently anticipate brief file week July 20." An issue concern SEC Rule 10b-13 Texaco's application Writ Error file Texas Supreme Court June 15 company said. "The SEC rule prohibits private agreement arrangement purchase target company's stock tender offer prospective purchaser pending" company's statement said. In application Texas Supreme Court Texaco point "on Pennzoil allege agreement purchase Getty Oil stock (Jan. 3 1984) (Pennzoil) outstanding tender offer Getty Oil stock." Reuter 

Sales single-family home fell 14.9 pct May April seasonally adjust annual rate 616000 unit Commerce Department said. The department revise April sale downward show 1.0 pct increase March 724000 unit instead previously report 7.6 pct gain. Last month's drop big January 1982 sale fell 19.5 pct brought level sale low December 1984 597000 unit sell department said. Home sale May 20.7 pct below May 1986 level 777000 department said. Before seasonal adjustment home actually sell May total 58000 71000 April 75000 May ago. The average price 129600 dlrs May 117500 dlrs April 114600 dlrs May 1986. The median price 106800 dlrs 97900 dlrs April 92100 dlrs May ago. Reuter 

Mauritian Finance Minister Seetanah Lutchmeenmaraidoo island's offshore bank January 1988. The minister announce creation committee eight economist look way encourage foreign investment especially offshore banking. The committee government's plan Mauritius international financial centre expect submit recommendation months. Lutchmeenmaraidoo circulate paper legislation stock exchange island. He exchange powerful instrument economic democratisation legislation include incentive encourage shareholding wide public. The government introduce bill protect investor vigilance committee power suspend company stock exchange halt trading share punitive measure illegal practices. The stock exchange probably fully operational five 10 added. REUTER 

CTS Corp director vote halve quarterly dividend 12-1/2 ct 25 ct payable August five record July seven. CTS action take increase cash available reinvestment company's business. Reduction quartelry dividend result sudden materially adverse change condition response action take bank creditor accord company statement. Reuter 

Pennwalt Corp make refrigerant available alternative chlorofluorocarbon (CFC) 12 product suspect deplete earth's ozone layer. The company product call isotron 142b/22 blend partially halogenated CFCs five pct ozone depletion potential CFC 12 fully halogenated. According company blend currently replace CFC 12 propellant aerosol container successfully test refrigerant. Pennwalt manufacture chemical pharmaceutical precision equipment. Reuter 

Congress's long-awaited agreement Friday urgent bill fund government operation expect clear Agriculture Department unlock coffer close May 1. House Senate negotiator break extend logjam fiscal 1987 funding agree appropriate 5.6 billion dlrs Commodity Credit Corp. The bill expect approve Houses week sign law soon president cover farm cost September 30 provide 1.0 billion dlrs cushion congressional source said. Elevator operator transportation company dairy processor especially hard hit freeze CCC payment enter ninth week USDA source said. Reuter 

French retail price rise confirm 0.2 pct May compare 0.5 pct rise April 0.2 pct May National Statistics Institute (INSEE) said. The rise year-on-year inflation rate 3.4 pct May 3.5 pct April brought cumulative inflation five month 2.0 pct compare 0.7 pct period 1986. REUTER 

BET Plc BETL.L> apply listing New York Toronto stock exchanges. BET file registration statement authority North America share issue clear shareholder extraordinary meeting March 19. The combine offering involve 25.8 mln BET share form American Depositary Receipts BET share ADR. The share value 77.3 mln stg Friday's London closing price 300p. Reuter 

British Airways Plc's BAB.L> May passenger cargo traffic figure provide evidence recovery year's setback trend reflect quarter result due August chairman Lord King told annual meeting. Earlier month newly-privatised airline report 29 pct rise passenger traffic figure May cargo traffic 22 pct. In March British Airways report drop pre-tax profit 162 mln stg 195 mln previously. However King result satisfactory consider difficulty pose Chernobyl disaster U.S. Raid Libya. He British Airways intend return tour travel operation profitability question shareholders. In 1986/87 division report operating loss nine mln stg fifth losses. However reconsider course action turnaround unlikely long-term. Reuter 

The New York Stock Exhcange review eligiblity continued listing common stock 5.875 dlrs cumulative convertible prefer stock series C Allis-Chalmers Corp view announcement file voluntary petition Chapter 11 Federal bankruptcy code. Reuter 

Lead manager Algemene Bank Nederland (ABN) complete formation syndicate Dutch chemical firm Akzo NV AKZO.AS>'s three-year 14 pct 50 mln Australian dlr bond price 101.5 pct. Co-lead manager Hambros Bank London ABN said. Co-managers Bankers Trust International Ltd Banque Bruxelles Lambert Bank Mees  Hope Banque Nationale de Paris Deutsche Bank Capital Markets Dresdner Bank EBC Amro Kredietbank NV Van Lanschot Bankiers Nederlandsche Middenstandsbank Pierson Heldring en Pierson Rabobank Vereins  Westbank S.G. Warburg Securities. REUTER 

Staley Continental Inc sell 50 Sociedad Iberica de Molturacion S.A. (Simsa) soybean sunflower seed processing company base Madrid Spain. Staley's investment Simsa longer fit overall coporate strategy agreement sell complete May said. Staley Simsa transaction material effect balance sheet. Reuter 

Lac Minerals Ltd file preliminary prospectus initial offering Canada flow-through common shares. Size pricing issue yet determine company said. Reuter 

Helene Curtis Industries Inc due increase expenditure budget promote Salon Sectives brand company likely produce loss quarter end August 31. In 1986 quarter earn 1947000 53 ct share. Earlier cosmetic company post first-quarter net 139000 ct share versus loss year-ago period 799000 22 ct share. Reuter 

Conquest Exploration Co extend exercise date publicly trade warrant July 15 current expiration date. Reuter 

Frontier Insurance Group Inc acquire malpractice book generate Medical Quadrangle Inc Medical Professional Liability Agency Ltd producer medical malpractice coverage. It acquisition enable Frontier's medical malpractice coverage service internally. Reuter 

Texas American Energy Corp release information soon follow halt stock NASDAQ exchange. Reuter 

Japan international agreement loan Poland need Tokyo extend fresh loan Warsaw Japanese car maker factory there. Prime Minister Yasuhiro Nakasone explain condition round talk visit Polish leader Wojciech Jaruzelski foreign ministry source said. They quote Jaruzelski say private Japanese plan export car production facility Poland "If project go serve engine future economic relation Poland Japan." Nakasone speak possibility resume extend official loan Poland "It necessary agreement establish international arena Paris Club creditor nations." He hop agreement achieve date firm commitment Japanese loan source said. Along western nation Japan witheld official credit Poland February 1982 follow 1981 declaration martial law Poland. The Japanese car maker Daihatsu Motor DMOT.T> trading house include Mitsui Co Ltd plan export production facility Poland's state-owned car maker FSO Charade minicar accord Mitsui officials. "We push plan premise official credit extend eventually" Mitsui spokesman said. Nakasone joint Japan-Poland economic committee discus propose conclusion investment protection agreement source said. REUTER 

Fidelcor Inc one-time 30 mln dlr special provision quarter loss loan develop countries. The corporation profitable quarter despite action reduce quarterly net income 23 mln dlrs 37 ct share fully dilute basis. For year-ago quarter Fidelcor report earnings 24.8 mln dlrs 95 ct share. (Corrects spell company name) Reuter 

Period May 31 Shr profit ct v loss 22 ct Net profit 139000 v loss 799000 Revs 101.9 mln v 86.8 mln Reuter 

Sterivet Laboratories Ltd U.S. Food Drug Administration grant expedite review status proprietary drug Navicon. The company future marketability Navicon U.S. greatly facilitate receive expedite review status company achieve wide penetration FDA approval drug received. Navicon drug design treat navicular disease affect foot one-third horse age five 15. Reuter 

The World Bank prepared play aggressive role promote Third World development bank president Barber Conable magazine interview. "Our plan include initiative debt front great emphasis debt-equity swap promotion private investment Third World country affiliate International Financial Corporation" Conable told Newsweek International. Conable complete World Bank bank's mission remains development Third World nations. "The bank primarily development institution debt-management agency. But debt manage effectively hamper development" told Newsweek. Conable bank step relieve debt crisis prompt U.S. commercial bank write portion Third World loans. Conable defend reorganization plan World Bank aim improve efficiency limit grow bureaucracy. And environmental consideration play large role evaluation propose projects. Reuter 

Period end May 31 Shr 41 ct v 35 ct Net 15.4 mln v 11.9 mln Revs 234.4 mln v 96.6 mln Avg shrs 38.0 mln v 34.4 mln Reuter 

D N Savings Bank aapplied Federal Home Loan Bank Board approval branch inside K mart Corp KM> store Michigan. It branch apply Grand Rapids Mich. bring five K mart location city D N Bank Marts. It application branch Flint K mart stores. Reuter 

Oper shr ct v ct Oper net 210000 v 67000 Revs 10252000 v 8929000 Avg shrs 7933000 v 8553000 Six mths Oper shr five ct v ct Oper net 420000 v 133000 Revs 20.3 mln v 17.1 mln Avg shrs 7952000 v 8551000 NOTE: 1987 earnings exclude gain utilization tax loss carryforwards 125000 dlrs ct share quarter 150000 dlrs ct share six month Reuter 

New Generation Products Inc> acquire 20 pct ownership Personal Protection Technolgies Inc>. New Generation Personal Protection develop personal care product effective kill variety virus bacteria contact U.S. export markets. Reuter 

Advanced NMR Systems Inc extend exercise period class A class B warrant year. The company class A warrant entitle purchase share Advanced Systems class B warrant dlrs unit execrisable unitl Aug 18 1988. The class B warrant entitle purchase share common stock six dlrs share exercisable unitl Aug 18 1989. Reuter 

Shr 15 ct v 12 ct Net 1240939 dlrs v 989714 dlrs Revs 32.9 mln dlrs v 21.1 mln dlrs Note: quarter end May 31. The company's full name Town Country Jewelry Manufacturing Corp Reuter 

Shr 19 ct v 16 ct Net 502000 dlrs v 401000 dlrs Revs 8.8 mln dlrs v 6.7 mln dlrs Six mths Shr 38 ct v 29 ct Net 989000 dlrs v 745000 dlrs Revs 16.3 mln dlrs v 12.5 mln dlrs Reuter 

Martin Processing Inc board approve agreement acquire Courtaulds Plc COU.L> 20 dlrs share. The company transaction value 99 mln dlrs base 4963620 share stock outstanding. It Courtaulds privately agree purchase majority Martin's common trust establish Julius Hermes 20 dlrs share. It Courtaulds intend conduct tender offer Martin stock begin soon necessary document prepared. Reuter 

Shr 15 ct Net 3.6 mln dlrs Revs 96.9 mln dlrs Note: company year-ago figure comparable due reverse merger Reuter 

Shr loss ct v loss ct Net loss 199010 dlrs v loss 398202 dlrs Revs 1284939 dlrs v 359440 dlrs Nine mths Shr loss 10 ct v loss 14 ct Net loss 973542 dlrs v loss 1298203 dlrs Revs 3.9 mln dlrs v 1269098 dlrs Note:the third quarter end April 30 Reuter 

Nigeria's military ruler transfer elect civilian government 1992 previously plan conclusion gradual handover start official source said. The Armed Forces Ruling Council approve main detail transition probably announce week President General Ibrahim Babangida. Among decision council chosen limit political party civilian rule source added. Reuter 

The European Community's annual inflation rate fell marginally 3.2 pct May 3.3 pct April EC's statistic office Eurostat said. Prices 12-nation bloc rise 0.2 pct May 0.6 pct April. But annual rate stayed below U.S. For month succession follow release figure show U.S. Inflation 3.8 pct April May. However Eurostat EC beaten Japan price provisionally 0.1 pct low May earlier. REUTER 

BSN Corp purchase MacGregor Sporting Goods' common stock recent market transactions. BSN position five pct ownership require specific disclosure. The company continually review position nelect increase decrease share own added. Reuter 

Shr 38 ct v 47 ct Net 968000 dlrs v 1053000 dlrs Revs 15.4 mln dlrs v 12.6 mln dlrs Note:the end March 31. Reuter 

Congress's long-awaited agreement Friday urgent bill fund government operation expect clear Agriculture Department unlock coffer close May 1. House Senate negotiator break extend logjam fiscal 1987 funding agree appropriate 5.6 billion dlrs Commodity Credit Corp. The bill expect approve Houses week sign law soon president cover farm cost September 30 provide 1.0 billion dlrs cushion congressional source said. Reuter 

Shr 27 ct v 14 ct Net 5664000 v 2812000 Revs 68.2 mln v 54.7 mln Avg shrs 21254054 v 20167714 Reuter 

Talks European Community (EC) United States fail settle trade dispute pasta EC Commission spokesman said. Diplomatic source dispute provoke trade friction unless settle soon. Washington insist EC comply regard unambiguous ruling trade body GATT cut export subsidy allow Italy increase share U.S. pasta market. The EC provide subsidy 16 cent pound pasta exports. The spokeswoman talk founder question subsidy cut. Reuter 

United Savings Bank file offering circular Federal Home Loan Bank Board cover 13 mln dlrs convertible subordinate debenture due 2012. It Johnston Lemon Co Inc act representative underwriters. Reuter 

President Reagan willing compromise Democrats Congress plan raise federal revenue plan reform budget process White House Budget Chief James Miller said. "If Democrats insist president whatever agree tax increase they'd forget he's that" Miller interview Reuters. "But lot revenue president propose (in January budget plan) I look seriously at" added. The Reagan budget widely criticize Democrats Republicans Congress envisages raise 22 billion dlrs revenue sale package government asset fee federal services. President Reagan repeatedly vowed veto tax increase vote Congress 1988 financial argue cut domestic spending reduce huge federal deficit. The deficit total 221 billion dlrs expect decline 175 billion dlrs fall 140 billion dlrs budget blueprint recently approve Congress. The trillion dlr congressional budget plan contains 19 billion dlr additional revenue tax government's budgetary begin October 1. The plan additional revenue raise leave House Ways Means Senate Finance committee fill detail year. Miller appear signal president consider sort tax increase despite frequently state rejection concept. However Miller decline revenue source acceptable president. "I counterproductive (set options) suggest mind" White House budget chief said. He caution Congress political repercussion move raise excise tax beer cigarette telephone service raise corporate personal income tax rates. "I Congress simple matter increase excise tax underestimate get themselves into" said. "What don't really realize political opposition feel excise tax lot hotter tahn political opposition user fee way asset sales" continued. "But lot revenue issue government probably ought addressed" said. Before agree revenue package president insist reform budget process Miller said. "The president sucker punch. He's sit try negotiate budget can't sure whatever president agrees delivered" emphasized. "We'd budget process give contract president agrees depend come through." After return United States economic summit Venice earlier month President Reagan revive earlier unsuccessful campaign budget reform call constitutional amendment require balance budget -- call "line-item veto" -- block individual item congressional spending bills. At Venice summit U.S. trading partner call Washington cut budget deficit reduce global trade imbalances. Miller told Italian journalist yesterday U.S. trading partner "have faith trust ability United tate deal problems." He deficit cut 40 45 billion dlrs "is optimal rate reduction deficit. I don't deficit overnight... I we've gradual reduction period years." Miller Beaver Creek attend sixth annual World Forum gathering current former government official representative discuss economic political issues. Reuter 

The exercise price warrant attach 100 mln dlr eurobond Finland's Nokia Oy NOKS.HE> fix lead manager Morgan Guaranty Ltd said. The five par-priced deal launch Thursday pay five pct. Each 5000 dlr bond 134 warrant attach exercisable Nokia free prefer share price 169.4 Finnish markka. This compare today's closing price 178 markka. REUTER 

The Bangladesh government drop propose budget tax increase provoke opposition party call strike tomorrow. Prime Minister Mizanur Rahman Choudhury told Parliament tax drop farmer poor opposition group strike on. Choudhury price soybean oil excise duty fabric lowered. He propose additional pct land development tax budget fiscal 1987/88 start July 1 dropped. Choudhury tax withdrawal cause revenue shortfall 130 mln taka. His announcement shortly 21 opposition party call six-hour nationwide strike tomorrow. Opposition party tax affect poor middle class leave wealthy untouched secretary-general opposition Bangladesh Nationalist Party K.M. Obaidur Rahman government's action avert tomorrow's strike. Reuter 

Utilicorp United Inc UtilCo Group subsidiary complete purchase 38 pct Westwood Energy Properties Limited Partnership 10 mln dlrs. The company partership building operate 30-megawatt electric generation facility Schuykill County Penn. schedule begin commercial operation July. It 38 pct sell Westwood Funding Corp wholly-owned subsidiary Combustion Engineering Inc CSP>. Westwood Funding retains partership serf partner said. Reuter 

Exxon Co U.S.A. extend marketing mid-grade unleaded gasoline Exxon Plus Houston Dallas/Fort Worth metropolitan area begin month. Exxon Corp's domestic subsidiary already marketing 89-octane unleaded gasoline East Coast. As introduces third unleaded grade Exxon note longer offer lead gasoline market except rural area lead gaosline available distributor substantial product serve customer whose equipment design lead fuel. Reuter 

John Labatt Ltd acquire Canadian brewing marketing right Carlsberg brand effective July 1 1988. Carlsberg product market Eastern Canada Carling O'Keefe Ltd wholly own Elders IXL Ltd ELXA.S>. Labatt agreement United Breweries International Ltd Copenhagen Denmark effective July 1 1988 provide Labatt right Carlsberg Carlsberg Light Carlsberg Bock Carlsberg Gold. Labatt disclose financial term marketing agreement. Reuter 

Coradian Corp lead privately held Sage Equities Group agree buy 7.6 pct Coradian. In connection agreement company sell 666667 share 75 ct share. It addition common stock Sage Equities receive 667667 warrant exercisable 1.50 dlrs share. Reuter 

Shr 24 ct v 18 ct Shr dilute 21 ct v 18 ct Net 2108805 v 1605278 Sales 28.9 mln v 24.2 mln NOTE: Share result reflect stock split paid July eight Reuter 

Danish crop week behind normal growth level due cold weather May June mean temperature centigrade below average State Plant Cultivation Bureau report. At season's crop test June 26 bureau rat crop overall 94 June 20 year. The figure 100 represent normal average growth condition crop damage. The test give rating express factor 100 follow - winter wheat 96 (last 91) winter rye 97 (98) winter barley 92 (90) spring barley 94 (98) oat 96 (98) fodder sugar beet 87 (96) winter rapeseed 98 (94) spring rapeseed 94 (98). Final harvest figure 1986 yet available. Reuter 

Pirelli unit Pirelli Cable Corp's communication division sign cable supply contract NYNEX Corp NYN> unit NYNEX Enterprises. The company Pirelli supply NYNEX fiber optic cable year. Terms contract disclosed. Reuter 

Unicorp American Corp sell property Boston aggregate proceeds 6300000 dlrs result pre-tax gain 3200000 dlrs. Income tax expense total 1700000 dlrs reduce gain 1500000 dlrs financial reporting purpose company said. The property include industrial building Westwood Mass. building contain retail store Lexington Mass. office building Bedford Mass. company added. Reuter 

The Reserve Bank India RBI announce rule allow exporter 25 product foreign exchange 10 pct firm's total annual export earnings export promotion abroad. The move design government improve India's trade deficit. Products eligible Blanket Exchange Permit Scheme include tea bag cigarette coffee leather various textile chemical pharmaceutical plastic engineering electronic good ready-made garment process food sport good fabricate mica consultancy services. The scheme replaces current rule allow amount foreign exchange firm attain minimum annual turnover prescribed product. RBI rule 16 product qualify discretionary basis overseas promotional spending pct freight-on-board value annual export earnings. These include oil cake cereal raw cotton raw semi-processed leather gem castor sandalwood oil psyllium husk seed opium various mineral ores. RBI exporter product cover either group eligible five pct freight-on-board value annual export earnings. Industry source entitlement considerably high previous limit flexible holder permit longer frequently apply RBI release foreign exchange export purposes. Reuter 

Textron Inc unit Bell Helicopter Textron Inc United Auto Workers union local agree three-year contract end week strike. It production maintenance Local 218 strike week clerical Local 317 strike week. A total 4000 strike. A company spokesman strike base disagreement method future pay rises. The spokesman company's original offer base lump sum payment six pct pct pct third. He management union agree combine pay increase lump sum payment contract. Reuter 

Shr ct v ct Net 335000 v 67000 Rev 10.1 mln v 8.7 mln Avg share 7933000 v 8553000 Six Months Shr seven ct v ct Net 570000 v 133000 Rev 19.9 mln v 16.8 mln Avg share 7952000 v 8551000 NOTE: Qtr include extraordinary gain 125000 dlrs ct share six months' net include gain 150000 ct share. Reuter 

Unisys Corp sector system division market ICON Series enhance microcomputer classroom. It computer Ontario base Meridian Technologies Inc> allows student teacher run multiple program simultaneously. It computer cost 1895 dlrs megabyte memory. It ICON Series enhance version instructional market Canada 1984. Unisys market ICON Series U.S. exclusive licensing agreement Meridian Technologies. Reuter 

Pennzoil Co advise Securities Exchange Commission commission file amicus curia brief Texas Supreme Court concern Pennzoil/Texaco Inc (TX) litigation aware whether brief adopt position litigants. Pennzoil brief expect file July 20. "We whether brief adopt position litigant simply inquiry request clarification reason previous decision matter favorable Pennzoil Pennzol spokesman said. Pennzoil regardless focus brief "Pennzoil appropritate response court due course." Earlier Texaco letter date June 26 SEC's counsel told attornys represent Texaco Pennzoil commission urge Texas Supreme Court review issue federal security law companies. The litigation stem Texaco's purchase Getty Oil Co 1984 Pennzoil offer Getty. Reuter 

Eastman Kodak Co marketing test kit AIDS antibody developed manufacture Cellular Products Inc. Kodak kit series diagnostic test retrovirus infectious disease various form cancer company distribute. A Kodak spokesman financial detail agreement Cellular Products. The spokesman AIDS test biotechnology product Kodak market. He test mainly suit blood bank blood product supply businesses. He told Reuters Kodak yet contract test business pending. Kodak AIDS test cost dlr 1.50 dlrs depend volume. A positive test mean contact AIDS virus mean person develop AIDS. Kodak market test developed Cellular detect virus cause adult T-cell leukemia. It test pending regulatory approval Food Drug Administration. Reuter 

DataCard Corp adopt dividend right plan response Deluxe Check Printers Inc DLX> have agree sell 38 pct DataCard National Computer Systems Inc NLCS.O>. DataCard declare dividend distribution prefer stock purchase outstanding share common stock. The dividend design deter National Computer potential suitor prevent DataCard evaluate alternative maximize shareholder value DataCard said. National Computer told Reuters June 22 bid DataCard. On June 25 DataCard file suit Hennepin County District Court Minnesota block sale 38 pct stake stock National Computer. In announce right plan DataCard "is design deter takeover consistent objective maximize stockholder value DataCard's stockholders." The right exercisable 10 day announcement person acquire beneficial ownership 44 pct DataCard's common stock. Once exercisable entitle holder buy 1/500th share DataCard Series A junior participation prefer Stock 35 dlrs. Holders acquirer entitle purchase six-months becomes exercisable share prefer stock market value equal twice exercise price rights. The right dividend distribution payable July 9 shareholder record July 9. Reuter 

Shr 12 ct v cent Net 546000 v 48000 Revs 22.3 mln v 16.0 mln Nine mths Shr 44 ct v seven ct Net 1857000 v 303000 Revs 65.5 mln v 46.0 mln NOTE: Per share figure adjust three-for-two stock split paid April 1987. Reuter 

Federal Resources Corp acquire capital stock related real estate asset New Generation Inc> regional consumer electronics specialty retailer. Terms acquisition disclosed. New Generation annual sale volume 30 mln dlrs Federal Resources said. Federal Resources search additional acquisition include limited specialty retailers. Reuter 

First Union Corp quarter (ending June 30) earnings 13 ct share 65 ct share quarter estimate 59 mln dlrs 53 ct share. The company result add 25 mln dlrs reserve Latin American loan exposure bring reserve 57 mln dlrs. It expect return equity return asset high major United States bank year. Reuter 

Enetertainment Marketing Inc president Elias Zinn demand list Crazy Eddie Inc shareholder company pursue merger Edison N.J. electronics retailer. In filing Securities Exchange Commission Zinn demand shareholder list June 26 desire communicate Crazy Eddie shareholder "regarding affairs" company. Zinn firm disclose hold 5.1 pct stake Crazy Eddie common stock acquire share negotiate merger tender offer. Entertainment Marketing inform June 25 Shearson Lehman Brothers Inc. act behalf Crazy Eddie provide "certain information" Crazy Eddie told SEC. Entertainment Marketing Houston-based firm involve electronics wholesale televise shopping sale propose eight dlr share merger acquisition Crazy Eddie May 29 modify proposal June 9 include participation Crazy Eddie management. Entertainment Marketing told SEC expect meet Crazy Eddie representative near future. Entertainment Marketing disclose retain Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc financial advisor investment banker. In June 17 announcement Crazy Eddie Chemical Bank longer fund 52 mln dlr credit facility company plus far decline price stock Entertainment Marketing Zinn "continuing evaluate alternative respect investment" Crazy Eddie stock. Depending evaluation company include action Crazy Eddie's board third party bid company Entertainment Marketing president hold stake company sell share purchase share market private purchase connection merger tender offer. According SEC filing Entertainment Marketing Zinn bought current holding 1560000 Crazy Eddie common share May 20 June 17 7.42 dlrs 7.93 dlrs share total 11.9 mln dlrs. Reuter 

U.S. move increase warship Mideast Gulf trigger attack unprotected merchant ship run little risk spark direct military clash Iran diplomat said. They American decision inevitably carry risk arm confrontation Iran -- despite blunt rhetoric -- avoid Washington. "As Iran know America bring Gulf serious damage" western diplomat. Diplomats great potential danger attack "soft targets" merchant shipping protect American western navy vessel patrol Gulf. The risk Iranian attack U.S. Warships Kuwaiti oil tanker carry U.S. Flag naval escort rat diplomat low. However "There threat Iranians see heavily protect U.S.-flag tanker softer targets" diplomat said. Tehran Radio quote Iran's top defence spokesman Ali Akbar Hashemi Rafsanjani say yesterday Washington "moving brink arm encounter us." The U.S. increase Gulf fleet seven 10 warship send refurbish battleship Missouri patrol outside Strait Hormuz. The build-up tie U.S. plan start escort Kuwaiti oil tanker month re-registered fly American flag naval protection. Shipping serve Kuwait repeat attack Iran angered emirate's backing Iraq. Concern region mount threat pose Chinese-made Silkworm missile U.S. say Iran prepare deploy near Strait Hormuz. The Missouri four-escort flotilla likely Iran twice use missile diplomat said. A military source Gulf Iran launch site Silkworms capture Iraqi soil Faw peninsula range Kuwait. "But anything direct attack Kuwaiti territory serious escalation" likely move opinion Iran remark one. Some diplomat believe Iran consider carry reprisal United States outside Gulf. Rafsanjani parliamentary leader predict Friday "a river blood" throughout event U.S. strike Iran. Western diplomat Iran Washington accuse behind state-sponsored terrorism demonstrable capacity carry attack U.S. itself. Diplomats potential target Lebanon Americans left wake kidnapping link pro-Iranian groups. But Europe Asia potential trouble-spots Kuwait obvious targets. Any backlash likely form sabotage action difficult blame Iran added. Reuter 

Chrysler Corp negotiate Chinese Government own First Autoworks project Dodge 600 mid-sized car add Chinese firm's lineup trade paper Automotive News said. It Chrysler discuss supply 2.2 liter four-cylinder engine tool 600 U.S. market 1982. Chrysler spokesman available comment today. But trade paper quote unnamed spokesman say Chrysler compete French-based Citroen unnamed Japanese maker supply First Autoworks. Reuter 

Conquest Exploration Co expiration date publicly trade warrant extend July 15. Reuter 

Hathaway Corp restructure debt financing provide 15 mln dlrs expansion operation company twice debt financing previously available company. As restructuring Hathaway obtain 10 mln dlrs long-term financing Household Commercial Financial Services Inc Ford Motor Credit Co. An additional 5.0 mln dlrs work capital financing commit Colorado National Bank Denver said. Hathaway financing repay 7.0 mln dlrs exist short-term debt balance expansion. It 10-year senior secure note execute June 15 payable 12 pct quarterly basis. Reuter 

Video Jukebox Network Inc extend July exclusive period provide May 29 letter intent option sell investor 3500000 share mln share company's common stock own founder president Steven A. Peters. Video currently 7525000 common share outstanding. The purchaser Louis Wolfson III vice president Venture W Inc> investment firm; Mark Blank president National Brands Inc>; J. Patrick Michaels Jr. president chief executive officer Communications Equity Associates Inc>; CEA Investors Partnerships II company Michaels form purchase Video said. Video agree extend period request prospective buyer provide respective counsel sufficient finalize draft agreement party negotiated. The company previously outright purchase value mln dlrs option purchase price 250000 dlrs excersizable May 28 1988. The exercise price 3750000 dlrs plus initial option purchase price 250000 dlrs company said. Video option expires unexercised Video grant additional six month option buyer enable purchase mln share 1750000 dlrs plus initial option purchase price 250000 dlrs. Reuter 

Cyclops Corp shareholder approve previously announce merger company subsidiary dixons Group PLC. It Dixons held 83 pct Cyclops stock follow tender offer purchase earlier year. With completion transaction Dixons proceed pay 95 dlrs share remain Cyclops shareholders. Reuter 

Leeco Diagnostics Inc sale team expand due initial success Preview pregnancy test kit. The company sale team sell test kit physician expect rise 150 100 45 days. It test kit sell U.S. drug store year. The Preview test take five minute detect pregnancy seven day conception record sale month market company said. Reuter 

Amax Zinc Co division Amax Inc increase price dyecast alloy No. Three No. Five cent lb effective immediately. Dyecast alloy No. Three 52.5 cent lb alloy No. Five 53.5 cent lb company said. Reuter 

The Federal Reserve enter government security market arrange two-day repurchase agreement account spokesman New York Fed said. Federal fund trading 6-3/4 pct direct injection temporary reserve line Friday's 6.72 pct average. Reuter 

Chrysler Corp negotiate Chinese Government own First Autoworks project Dodge 600 mid-sized car add Chinese firm's lineup trade paper Automotive News said. It Chrysler discuss supply 2.2 liter four-cylinder engine tool 600 U.S. market 1982. Chrysler spokesman available comment today. But trade paper quote unnamed spokesman say Chrysler compete French-based Citroen unnamed Japanese maker supply First Autoworks. Reuter 

Pharmacontrol Corp close offering 23000 units. The company unit consists 1000 dlrs principal amount subordinate convertible debenture due 2002 convert six dlrs share 167 share common stock. Also unit include 70 share common stock immediately detachable company said. Pharmacontrol add convert seven mln dlr credit facility institutional lender 12 mln dlr credit facility. Reuter 

Asea Group AB ASEAY> award 110 mln dlr contract Swedish State Power Board Finnish utility Imitran Oma Oy>. The company contract 500 megawatt 400 kv fenno skan voltage DC transmission built Sweden Finland. The company Asea companies; Asea Transmission Ludvika Sweden Strondberg Vaasa Finland receive related converter equipment. Reuter 

Vernitron Corp record date July 10 shareholder entitle vote propose merger Vernitron SB Holding Corp>. The original record date May 26. Vernitron currently expect special shareholder meeting concern merger held August. Following tender offer November 1986 SB Holding hold 55.2 pct Vernitron maker electromechanical component related product services. Reuter 

Centel Corp raise 60 mln dlrs via issue debenture due 1997 lead underwriter Smith Barney Harris Upham Co Inc. Smith Barney head syndicate won debenture competitive bidding. It bid issue 99.338 10 pct coupon reoffering price par yield 146 basis point Treasuries. The net charge 10.07 pct. Non-callable five debt rat A-2 Moody's A S P. Gross spread 6.62 dlrs sell concession 4.50 dlrs reallowance 2.50 dlrs. United Bank Switzerland Dillon Reed co-managered deal. Reuter 

Energas Co agree principle purchase Western Kentucky Gas Co Texas American Energy Corp 61.5 mln dlrs cash plus assumptrion liabilities. Western Kentucky gas distribution company serf 143000 customer 108 town community Kentucky. Reuter 

The Franklin Group Funds Franklin Pennsylvania Investors Equity Fund> pay initial semi-annual dividend seven ct July 14 holder record July one. Reuter 

TNT Skypak unit TNT Ltd Australia introduce worldwide express package delivery service start operation today. At press conference executive service TNT Expressair delivery package 220 lb location U.S. anywhere overseas location U.S. Initially TNT Expressair concentrate marketing U.S. Canada United Kingdom Europe Australia. TNT world's large transportation company annual revenue US 4 billion dlrs. TNT official decline project expect annual revenue service. They final price list prepared. As service TNT 20 25 office U.S. officlals said. It currently 27 office U.S. Reuter 

Gibraltar Financial Corp Gibraltar Savings unit agree principle buy First Federal Savings Loan Ridgecrest> 12.1 mln dlrs cash. The company actual price determine close base net book value May 31. It First Federal locate Kearn County northeast Los Angeles asset 130 mln dlrs. It transaction subject definitive agreement shareholder regulatory approval. Reuter 

Winley Home Builders Inc complete land purchase agreement M.D.C. Holdings Inc MDC> 1090000 dlrs note prefer stock. The company bought 33 lot Colorado Richmond Homes Ltd M.D.C. unit return 650000 dlrs promissory note 440000 dlrs prefer stock. The company M.D.C. option convert Winley prefer stock 20 pct Winley common year. Reuter 

Shr ct v ct Net 97224 v 58503 Rev 906368 v 714747 Avg shrs 3300000 v 3948719 Reuter 

The European Investment Bank raise 200 mln mark eight-year bullet eurobond carry 6-1/8 pct coupon price 99-1/2 pct yield 6.21 pct issue lead manager Westdeutsche Landesbank Girozentrale said. Payment date July 16 bond pay date annually matures date 1995. Fees total 1-3/4 pct 5/8 underwriting management 1-1/8 selling. Denominations 1000 10000 mark bond list Duesseldorf Frankfurt. REUTER 

Apollo Computer Inc introduce computer workstation improve performance cut price exist workstations. In addition company announce product allow personal computer communicate workstations. Apollo workstation Domain Series 4000 Personal Super Workstations include color workstation price 19000 dlrs process million instruction second. Apollo Domain Series 4000 feature 14000 dlr monochrome workstation 13000 dlr workstation server process million instruction second. Apollo Domain Series 4000 model double performance exist Domain Series 3000 workstation provide performace equivalent compete workstation half price. "We clearly tell user Apollo commit maintain price/performance leadership workstation marketplace" Thomas A. Vanderslice Apollo's chief executive officer. Apollo offer color monochrome model Domain Series 3000 entry-level workstation family. It cut price specify. Reuter 

Qtly dividend 23 ct v 21.6 ct prior qtr Payable July 14 Record July Dividend include short-term capital gain 20 ct v 16 ct short-term 2.2 ct long-term gain prior quarter Reuter 

DSC Communications Corp sign supply agreement United Telephone System Inc deliver DSC Signal Transfer Points value 3.0 mln dlrs. It agreement run 1990 product delivery expect start year. Reuter 

end March 31 Shr ct v 11 ct Net 384723 v 800137 Revs 5.1 mln v 3.5 mln Reuter 

Interstate Bakeries Corp Royal American Foods subsidiary agree buy asset Landshire Food Products Inc New-Mexico-based producer package Mexican food products. Terms propose transaction disclosed. Reuter 

Period end May 31. Shr loss eight ct v profit six ct Net loss 895000 v profit 662000 Sales 91.1 mln v 89.8 mln Reuter 

A firm lead Gabelli Group Inc told government regulator hold 28.5 pct stake Digiorgio Corp common stock partnership make seek control company. In filing Securities Exchange Comission firm hold 2430100 share Digiorgio common stock. Of total 2059400 share held GAMCO Investors Inc Gabelli Funds Inc. investment purpose said. Gabelli-Rosenthal Partners LP G R Partners hold remain 370700 Digiorgio common share told SEC "purpose ultimately obtain control Digiorgio contingent approval Digiorgio" accord SEC filing. As previously report Gabelli Co Inc act investment advisor include Gabelli-Rosenthal propose June 25 acquire Digiorgio common share share price 20 dlrs cash subordinate note value eight dlrs 14 pct redeemable prefer stock common share post-buyout company. The June 25 buyout proposal remains July 17 provide key Digiorgio management director invite remain firm participate acquire company. The proposal subject due diligence review execution merger agreement arrangement financing receipt government approval Gabelli Co complete 60 days. Between April 13 June 26 entire lead Gabelli Group Inc net purchase 403600 Digiorgio common share 22.20 dlrs 26.79 dlrs share. Reuter 

Henley Group Inc unit Wheelabrator Technologies Inc won 243 mln dlrs contract Mississippi Chemical Corp> unit Newsprint South Inc. The company contract construction 224000 ton-per-year newsprint production facility Grenada. Reuter 

Brazil's motor industry face bad crisis history sent thousand worker collective leave sharp drop demand. Company spokesman Autolatina Friday laid 4000 worker sent nearly 9000 56500 employee Brazil collective leave July 12. General Motors Brasil 10 days' leave 22000 workforce Wednesday. Fiat give 2000 worker month's holiday July 6. Jacy Mendonca industrial relation director Autolatina merger Volkswagen Ford Brazil Argentina week bad Brazil's auto industry. He forecast 1987 bad 1981 domestic sale drop 40 pct 580000 units. "This we'll lucky sell 550000 units" said. Since Friday positive development industry. The government announce scrap 15 pct surcharge car sales. The surcharge create July originally 30 pct curb car-buying boom theory refundable. Brazilian car distributor June 16 halt car purchase protest government tax respond government move resume purchases. But industry spokesman tax vehicle 108 pct sector face major problems. Reuter 

Finance Minister Gibson Chigaga Zambia's traditional financial backer apart Britain pledge continued backing country's go-it-alone economic announce month. Chigaga told Reuters interview true Western threaten withold financial aid follow Zambia's abandonement tough IMF-inspired include auction local kwacha. "It Britain openly withhold fund intend auction foreign exchange" Chigaga said. "All country relationship cannot affected abandonment live 18 month support 20 now" said. Chigaga Britain consider stand follow representation Zambian government. Chigaga told Reuters guideline function economic prgram release soon. REUTER 

Consolidated-Bathurst Inc Quebec newsprint mill shut strike weekend. The company 2000 worker Canadian Paperworkers Union independent union walk Wayagamack mill Trois-Rivieres Laurentide mill Grand-Mere Belgo mill Shawinigan. Their contract expire April 30. The Laurentide mill annual capacity 200000 tonne Belgo mill 350000 tonne Wayagamack mill 70000 tonnes. The strike Consolidated-Bathurst mill industry-wide walkout 1976 company spokeswoman Denise Dallaire said. "As management concerned negotiation now" Dallaire add elaborate. Union official immediately available comment. Company official annual meeting April expect labor problem year. reuter 

IBM Credit Corp file Securities Exchange Commission registration statement cover 500 mln dlr issue medium-term notes. Proceeds corporate purposes. The company name First Boston Salomon Brothers agent offering. Reuter 

Unicoa Corp agree merger wholly-owned subsidiary United Insurance Co America. Under agreement outstanding share Unicoa common stock convert share United common stock. The agreement subject shareholder regulatory approval. Teledyne Inc TDY> own 98.4 pct Unicoa's outstanding shares. A shareholder meeting expect held August. Reuter 

Epitope Inc developed independent control reagent laboratory perform AIDS testing. The control consists human blood serum free AIDS antibody serum sign antibody formation serum strong antibody components. The company control set design Food Drug Administration-licensed AIDS screen supplemental test market worldwide. Reuter 

Weekend rain Western Corn Belt brought far relief crop area dry earlier month develop weather pattern bring welcome moisture central eastern belt location week accord Dale Mohler senior meteorologist Accu-Weather Inc. "There rain days" said. "We're fairly wet pattern normal above normal moisture week." Mohler rainfall average 1/2 inch across southern Minnesota 3/4 inch southwest Iowa inch eastern Nebraska 1-1/2 inch south-central Nebraska. Illinois field virtually rain weekend receive scatter thundershower activity said. Rain pattern move across Indiana Ohio thudershower activity yield rain said. "Tomorrow eastern 1/4 inch pretty rain" Mohler said. Rain heavier expect weekend spark selloff soybean future Chicago Board Trade. Prices 14 20-1/2 cent November 19-1/2 cent 5.43-1/2 dlrs. Mohler cold front eastern belt expect move central Midwest move north week. That bring rain pattern across Corn Belt assure crop condition early-developed corn move crucial pollination stage July said. Reuter 

U.S. car production schedule drop 10.4 pct 1.47 mln third quarter year's 1.63 mln domestic automaker react drop sale year's record level trade paper Automotive News said. Automotive News General Motors Corp GM> slash plan car production 12.6 pct year's third quarter total Ford Motor Co F> schedule plant build 5.4 pct few car Chrysler Corp C> 18.4 pct. But paper quote analyst say production cut 200000 unit avoid excessive inventory build-up view relatively soft market cars. Through June 20 sale domestic-built car 11.9 pct year's levels. Only Ford Detroit Big Three enjoy sale gain. GM Ford work stockpile car despite market condition prospect strike September United Automobile Workers union analyst said. Reuter 

May 31 Shr 27 ct v 14 ct Net 5664000 v 2812000 Revs 68.2 mln v 54.7 mln Avg shrs 21254054 v 20167714 NOTE: First quarter report Reuter 

Apollo Computer Inc price cut announce earlier Domain Series 3000 computer workstation average 35 pct 50 pct. An Apollo spokesman cut bring price 5000 dlrs Series 3000 models. In addition reduce price company add monochrome color model Series 3000 line improve performance graphic capabilities. The company price cut introduction powerful workstation Domain Series 4000. Industry analyst expect Apollo reprice Series 3000 response aggressive price cut week ago Digital Equipment Corp DEC> compete workstations. But Apollo spokesman reduction plan time. "We haven't cut prices" add note company improve Series 3000 models. Analysts expect Sun Microsystems Inc SUNW.O> Apollo's big rival workstation market cut price introduce models. Sun schedule conference July eight. Reuter 

Qtly div 6.25 ct v 6.25 ct prior Pay Oct 2 Record Sept 1 (Corrects amount qtly div item ran Friday Jan 26) Reuter 

Health Rehabilitation Properties Trust reach understand purchase nursing facility Mass. Conn. 29 mln dlrs Greenery Rehabilitation Group Inc GRGI.O>. The building lease Greenery initial term seven subject renewal option additional 23 Health Rehabilitation Properties said. The transaction expect close August 31. Reuter 

U.S. car production schedule drop 10.4 pct 1.47 mln third quarter year's 1.63 mln domestic automaker react drop sale year's record level trade paper said. Automotive News General Motors Corp slash plan car output 12.6 pct year's third quarter total Ford Motor Co schedule plant build 5.4 pct few car Chrysler Corp 18.4 pct. However paper quote analyst say production cut 200000 unit avoid excessive inventory build-up amid weak demand cars. Analysts GM Ford work stockpile car despite market condition prospect strike September United Automobile Workers union. Through June 20 sale domestic-built car 11.9 pct year's levels. Only Ford Detroit Big Three enjoy sale gain. Reuter 

The U.S. Environmental Protection Agency deny request Wheeling-Pittsburgh Steel Corp allow continue operate Follansbee W. Va. sinter plant court-ordered pollution control equipment installed. The EPA original consent decree company sign 1979 company numerous opportunity reduce harmful emmissions plant. The agency company fail comply available extension compliance deadline agency ask court close plant. Reuter 

BSN Corp hold five pct MacGregor Sporting Goods. The company stock acquire recent market purchase stake require specific disclosure. Reuter 

Vernitron Corp record date shareholder entitle vote propose merger Vernitron Corp SB Holding Corp July 10. Vernitron manufacture electromechanical component related product service expect special meeting shareholder held August. Vernitron SB Holding hold 55.2 pct Vernitron result tender offer November 1986. Reuter 

The U.S. League Savings Institutions launch bolster liquidity saving loan institution reduce dependency rate deposits. A spokesman league 48 institution commit 340 mln dlrs estimate begin week. Reuter 

The Federal Reserve Board approve Citicorp's application purchase subsidiary Citicorp Savings Oakland Calif. asset assume liability Sears Savings Bank Glendale Calif. Citicorp Savings propose assume billion dlrs deposit liability purchase 1.9 billion dlrs asset 50 branch office Sears Savings. The proposal involve third asset liability Sears Savings own Sears Roebuck Co S>. The Fed generally determine potentially adverse effect allow affiliation bank saving loan association allow bank hold company acquire fail thrifts. It Citicorp's proposal "properly view permissible acquisition asset liability S L branch acquisition S L." Citicorp Savings successor fail Fidelity Savings Loan Association asset 4.9 billion dlrs operates 86 branch California mainly north. Sears Savings 6.6 billion asset 91 branch predominantly southern California. The application approve unanimously eliminate Sears Savings competitor Fed said. Reuter 

Loral Corp Loral Defense Systems won 29.4-mln-dlr contract U.S. Air Force build 17 advanced transportation handle sytems. The system company extend effectiveness Minuteman Intercontinental Ballistic Missile. The system schedule delivery August 1988 May 1989. They service 1000 Minuteman missiles. Reuter 

National Patent Development Corp Bar-Ilan University Israel joint venture corporation Scientific Testing Inc begin clinical trial U.S. immuno-augmenting compound AS101 treatment Acquired Immune Deficiency Syndrome (AIDS). The study conduct Institute Immunological Disorders (MD Anderson Hospital Houston Tex) direction Dr Peter Mensell pursuant investigational drug application file Food Drug Administration company said. The study expect begin six week design test effect AS101 30 AIDS patient National Patent said. It add AS101 proprietary synthetic compound invent Bar-Ilan University doctor show immuno-augmenting anti-viral anti-tumor activity preclinical animal test immuno-augmenting activity limited AIDS patient phase foreign clinical tests. Reuter 

ICN Pharmaceuticals Inc purchase remain 225000 share Viratek Inc VIRA.O> own Eastman Kodak Co own previously announce program. The company paid Kodak 10.50 dlrs share 2.4 mln dlrs. As previously announce ICN authorize additional purchase 1.5 mln share Viratek common. To date ICN bought total 1.2 mln share Viratek include share purchase Kodak. The company own 56 pct Viratek result transactions. Reuter 

The World Bank approve loan Mexico total 205 mln dlrs provide financial assistance industrial company finance project deal agricultural extension services. Mexico's Nacional Financiera (NF) recipient loan receive 185 mln dlrs provide long-term credit equity fund medium-sized industrial enterprise bank said. It 20 mln dlr loan finance project design test strategy improve quality cost effectiveness agricultural extension services. The industrial enterprise project estimate cost 350.3 mln dlrs aim support company threaten inflation adversely affected increase competition brought bank-supported trade liberalization measures. The bank 73.8 mln dlr extension service project examine strategy 20 Mexico's 192 rural development district finance training personnel farmer office construction purchasing equipment. Both loan 15 include grace variable rate currently 7.92 cent link bank's cost borrowing funds. Reuter 

Intel Corp sign letter intent privately-held Silicon Compiler Systems Corp Intel value-added silicon vendor integrate circuit design Silicon Compiler's GENESIL silicon compilation system. Under propose pact Intel provide initial silicon foundry service GENESIL-based designs. GENESIL user able compile application-specific design use Intel's 1.5-micron complementary metal-oxide semiconductor process. Reuter 

The World Bank loan Turkey 325 mln dlrs support energy sector reform program. The loan-supported hope reduce extensive sector involvement country's energy production supply bank said. The loan 17 include grace variable rate currently 7.92 pct bank said. Reuter 

The Reagan Administration discuss deal Cairo Egypt build U.S. M-1A1 battle tank high-speed weapon packed laser technology Pentagon official said. But deny Washington Post report Administration already approve production license entail transfer sensitive technology Egypt. "We talk Egyptian official produce tank decision made" Pentagon official identify told Reuters. Reuter 

Oper shr 50 ct v 40 ct Oper net 20.8 mln v 16.4 mln Revs 531.7 mln v 418.7 mln NOTE: 1987 1st quarter net excludes gain 47.1 mln dlrs 1.14 dlrs share discontinue operations. Reuter 

Telequest Inc Henry Marcheschi chairman president resign health reasons. Executive vice president Robert Lee elect president chief executive succeed Marcheschi company said. Reuter 

Maxtor Corp bought privately-held Storage Dimensions Inc undisclosed sum. The company Storage Dimensions incorporates Maxtor's high-capacity 5-1/4-inch Winchester optical disk drive data storage subsystem IBM PCs XTs ATs compatibles. Storage Dimensions creator SpeedStor software utility integrates high-capacity disk drive PCs. Maxtor purchase reflect desire compete high-capacity segment PC market. Reuter 

Shr 19 ct v seven ct Net 936000 v 351000 Revs 153.3 mln v 145 mln Reuter 

The board director entirely private Uruguayan bank La Caja Obrera approve merger state-owned bank due severe financial crisis bank statement said. It Caja Obrera merge Banco Pan de Azucar. The move decide board Banco de la Republica bank 1985 control Banco Pan de Azucar. La Caja Obrera move aim "at assure normal stable operation full guarantee hold deposit client employees." La Caja Obrera entirely private Uruguayan bank. The Banco Pan de Azucar take Banco de la Republic 1985 carry similar merger operation Banco de Italia. Reuter 

Baxter Travenol Laboratories Inc General Electric Co unit GE Information Services Premier Hospital Alliance> developed computer purchasing health care industry. They know ASAP Express remove computer vendor streamline hospital purchasing system reduce paperwork simplify billing. The combine Baxter's ASAP (Analytic Systems Automated Purchasing) clearinghouse GE EDI (electronic data interchange) Express system. GE Information Services operates commercially available teleprocessing network. Illinois base Premier Hospital Alliance voluntary 37 hospital 30 U.S. cities. Baxter Travenol 1987 expect 100 hospital ASAP Express majority 5600 current ASAP user participate ASAP Express five years. Reuter 

General Motors Corp's German subsidiary Adam Opel AG half profit loss trade paper Automotive News said. The paper quote Opel chairman Horst Herke say unit earn 100 mln mark 1987 lose 141.5 mln mark 1986. "In six month clearly black numbers" Herke said. "As conclude full profit said. The paper Opel likely sell Senator Omega model U.S. go ahead export plan. Reuter 

Pre-Paid Legal Services Inc management know development account unusually heavy trading company's stock. The company respond inquiry regard recent activity common American Stock Exchange. In afternoon trading stock 1-7/8 5-1/8 turnover 160400 shares. Reuter 

A company control Brookehill Partners Inc told government authority support buyout Cardis Corp maximize value company's stock. In filing Securities Exchange Commission disclose currently hold 5.5 pct stake Cardis common stock "would likely support" acquisition company part party term move "the likely mean company's shareholder maximize value investment." Although characterize Cardis stock holding principally investment intend contact third party interested acquisition Cardis Los Angeles-based auto part distributor. The add already "some contacts" concern company understanding reached. "The (Cardis) common share continue offer opportunity price appreciation basis company's asset value earnings momentum" Brookehill told SEC. The currently hold 318900 Cardis common share consists New York-based Brookehill Partners subsidiary Brookehill Equities Inc brokerage Moore Grossman deRose Inc investment advisor. Walter Grossmman S. Edward Moore Robert deRose New York one-third interest Brookehill Partners. Since April 27 Brookehill net purchase 6000 Cardis common share approximately 4 dlrs share. The told SEC continue purchase additional Cardis stock reserve sell share company. Reuter 

Bank New York Co Inc expect quarter loss 35 mln dlrs. The company partly due addition 135 mln dlrs loan loss allowance. The 135 mln dlr addition loan loss allowance expect 400 mln dlrs June 30 recognition recent international debt developments. It loss projection 35 mln dlrs quarter end June 30 take account 49 mln dlr gain sale RMJ Holdings compare year's quarter income 37.8 mln dlrs. The six month show income 12 mln dlrs bank income exceed 100 mln dlrs full year. Last year's income reach 155 mln dlrs. Reuter 

Moody's Investors Service Inc downgrade 1.3 billion dlrs debt Public Service Company New Hampshire. Under review B-1 mortgage bond B-2 refund mortgage bond B-3 third mortgage secure pollution control revenue bond Caa debenture prefer stock. Moody's cite uncertain ability meet fixed-income obligation due Nuclear Regulatory Commission's refusal grant low-power operating license inadequate evacuation plans. The firm depends credit market fund obligation due negative internal cash flow said. Reuter 

The World Bank approve loan Mexico total 205 mln dlrs provide financial assistance industrial company finance project deal agricultural extension services. Mexico's Nacional Financiera (NF) recipient loan receive 185 mln dlrs provide long-term credit equity fund medium-sized industrial enterprise bank said. It 20 mln dlr loan finance project design test strategy improve quality cost effectiveness agricultural extension services. Reuter 

U.S. House Speaker Jim Wright question President Reagan tomorrow plan protect Kuwaiti oil tanker U.S. warship attack Iran Gulf. House Senate Democrats control Congress critical Reagan's plan decide try pas legislation prohibit it. Wright Texas Democrat told reporter Administration go ahead plan reflag Kuwaiti tanker U.S. ship ask Congressional leader advice. Reuter 

GenRad Inc introduce HITEST test generation system. The company HITEST take modular approach test generation use interactive software tool automate part test generation process. HITEST run Digital Equipment Corp DEC> VAX MicroVax computer price 64000 dlrs software license GenRad said. It add delivery immediate. Reuter 

Caremark Inc Baxter Travenol Laboratories Inc jointly announce Caremark shareholder vote July 31 approve previously announce merger Baxter. The company Caremark shareholder record June 26 entitle vote meeting held Newport Beach Calif 1000 PDT. On May 11 Baxter Carmark announce definitive agreement Baxter acquire Carmark stock transaction value 528 mln dlrs. Reuter 

State merchant bank Mediobanca Spa MDBI.MI> Italian banking consortium arrange 100 mln dlrs financing Banque Exterieure d'Algerie. Mediobanca statement financing accord reach March Italy Algeria agree 300 mln dlrs financing Italian export Algeria. Mediobanca 12 Italian bank participate consortium give far detail financing. Among bank Banca Nazionale del Lavoro (BANI.MI> Banco di Sicilia Efibanca Spa. REUTER 

The Securities Exchange Commission charge Allied Stores Corp fail promptly disclose key step take September thwart takeover attempt Campeau Corp. In administrative complaint SEC Allied legal adviser fail promptly inform shareholder agency begin talk Youngstown Ohio shopping center developer Edward DeBartolo response Campeau's takeover offer. Campeau acquire Allied estimate 4.2 billion dlrs Jan 1 follow battle DeBartolo. On Sept 25 Allied disclose board urge rejection Campeau's Sept 12 tender offer 58 dlrs share Allied negotiate sale six shopping center DeBartolo SEC said. Allied legal advisor director George Kern head merger acquisition New York law firm Sullivan Cromwell decide amend Allied's SEC filing disclose talk result sale price 405 mln dlrs shopping center said. Securities law require takeover target company promptly disclose sale major assets. The Campeau increase tender offer 80 pct Allied's stock 55 pct raise bid 66 dlrs share 58 dlrs Sept 29 Allied partnership head DeBartolo negotiate takeover deal aim thwart Campeau SEC said. Kern decide disclose talk amend SEC filing agency charged. Allied's disclosure DeBartolo takeover Oct 8 board approve merger Oct 3 merger agreement execute Oct 7 complaint said. DeBartolo Campeau engage bitter battle control Allied Campeau win October bought block 25.8 mln share Allied stock 48 pct total controversial move minute drop hostile tender offer. The acquisition additional 48 pct federal judge allow complete give Campeau majority stake Allied. Campeau bought rest 69 dlrs share. The SEC plan file court brief join Allied charge Campeau engage illegal tender offer. But SEC brief file drop follow agreement Campeau DeBartolo. In administrative proceed Allied Kern SEC ask administrative comply reporting provision security law future. Although Allied longer publicly trade become subsidiary Campeau file annual quarterly report SEC outstanding debt. Reuter 

Shr 31 ct v n/a Net 671000 dlrs v 1256000 dlrs Year Shr 1.85 dlrs v n/a Net mln dlrs v 2.8 mln dlrs Assets 426.4 mln dlrs v 334.1 mln dlrs Deposits 323.1 mln dlrs v 277.2 mln dlrs Loans 335.9 mln dlrs v 254.9 mln dlrs Note:the company 1986 share earnings convert mutual saving bank stock saving bank January 1986 Reuter 

Allied-Signal Inc complete sale seven business electronics instrumentation sector 1.8 billion dlrs cash debt assume purchasers. The company December sell unit mid 1987. It identify buyers. The company proceeds reduce debt continue company's share buyback increase strategic investment core business corporate purposes. It unit sell Ampex Corp Amphenol Prodcuts Linotype Group Neptune International MPB Corp Revere Corp Sigma Instruments Inc. Reuter 

Cycare Systems Inc information processing system company purchase asset Control Data Corp's MedTec unit undisclosed terms. MedTec provider patient accounting schedule system scale medical practices. Reuter 

U.S. Minerals Exploration Co Pegasus Gold Inc PGUL.O> Spokane Wash officially commission gold zinc lead produce mine. U.S. Minerals Montana Tunnels Mine near Helena Mont expect reach full production August 1987. U.S. Minerals mine design operate average 12500 ton ore project produce 95000 ounce gold 1988 plus significant quantity silver lead zinc. U.S. Minerals 50 pct net profit royalty mine payback development costs. Reuter 

Mitsubishi Motor Sales America Inc raise car price average 1.8 pct 227 dlrs truck price 1.6 pct 150 dlrs continued strength Japanese yen U.S. dollar. The company price Montero sport/utility vehicle increase 1.5 pct 150 dlr. The change effective immediately Mitsubishi said. Reuter 

Becor Western Inc transact shareholder meeting schedule 1000 CDT tomorrow meeting permanently adjourned. If definitive agreement transaction result offer pending company's stock Becor date shareholder meeting established. Reuter 

Universal Communication Systems Inc tentatively agree sell substantially asset 79 mln dlrs cash note plus limited profit participation. The company term sale approve board Prime Motor Inns Inc PDQ> owner 84 pct Universal's outstanding stock. It described purchaser subsidiary company communication field 100 large U.S. corporations. The company transaction involves payment 20 mln dlrs cash non-interest bearing payment 11.3 mln dlrs equal instalment promissory note guaranteed affiliate purchaser. It 31.5 mln dlr 14 pct note payable equal instalment years. It 16.3 mln dlr 8.5 pct note due Dec 31 1992 include participation 1992 profit acquire company. Universdal profit element terminate payment purchaser either five mln dlrs 1988 six mln dlrs 1989 seven mln dlrs 1990 eight mln dlrs 1991. Reuter 

Union Enterprises Ltd agreement sell Canbra Foods Ltd Macluan Capital Corp terminated. Union Macluan fail offer Union's 72 pct Canbra June 22 deadline. Union longer bound agreement continue seek buyer interest. Reuter 

PepsiCo Inc's Pepsi-Cola USA name privately own Lockhart Pettus Inc New York handle advertising promotion Black consumers. Pepsi-Cola USA major account Lochart Pettus weeks. Earlier month Chrysler Motors Corp name agency handle minority marketing. Reuter 

Unicorp American Corp UAC.A> after-tax gain quarter 1.5 mln dlrs sale property Boston area. It property sell aggregate proceeds 6.3 mln dlrs. Reuter 

Molex Inc sign distribution share-purchase agreement Dubilier PLC Abingdon Oxon England. Under agreement Molex sell Dubilier's product worldwide receive 2.1 mln ordinary share Dubilier price British pound 3.22 U.S. dlrs share. The share represent 6.39 pct exist issue share capital Dubilier issue U.K. subscription agreement restricts Molex dispose share increase hold above 9.9 pct years. Reuter 

SSMC Inc execute letter understand acquire Parts Catalog Division Cutters Exchange Inc> undisclosed amount. SSMC spun Singer Co SMF> ago Parts Catalog Division wholesale part needle industrial sew trade U.S. Under agreement key manager employee Parts Catalog Division Nashville Tenn relocate SSMC facility Murfreesboro SSMC said. Reuter 

SunRiver Corp> Jackson Miss.-based computer product company introduce line computer workstation design connect powerful personal computer fiber-optic cable. The privately held company 16 Cygna 386 workstation attach PC base Intel Corp's INTC.O> 80386 microprocessor include model sell Compaq Computer Corp CPQ> International Business Machines Corp IBM>. SunRiver Cygna workstation allow user access file share printer equipment control 80386-based PC. In addition workstation offer full graphic capability multiuser-multitasking environment Sunriver said. The company Cygna line available October price start 1599 dlrs. Reuter 

The Treasury Department notify Netherlands terminate 1948 income tax treaty applies Netherlands Antilles Aruba. The termination effective January 1 1988 Treasury two-sentence announcement. The Treasury decide treaty negotiation United States Netherlands past eight fail reach accord Treasury spokesman said. The decision mean sale U.S. parent company Eurobonds Netherlands Antilles subsidiary longer free 30 pct U.S. withholding tax spokesman said. Terminating tax treaty Netherlands Antilles cause bond issuer call bond early. Most maturity 10 issue 1984 spokesman said. He Treasury expect action adverse effect U.S. issuer bond decline rate mean able refinance low rates. However holder bond presumably face low yields. Reuter 

Westinghouse Electric Corp operation facility U.S. Department Energy's Hanford Nuclear Reservation near Richland Wash DOE said. It Westinghouse replaces Rockwell International UNC Nuclear Inc criticize Washington federal government environmentalist fail correct safety problem Hanford. Westinghouse sign billion dlr contract week ago operate Hanford five DOE said. The contract provide company annual profit 1.4 mln 14.6 mln dlrs depend quality performance DOE said. "Our objective safe" soid William Jacobi Westinghouse manager Hanford add "If (safety) priority production need." Westinghouse's chief mission Hanford produce plutonium supervise research Strategic Defense Inititive SDI cleanup military nuclear waste store tank site 1940's company DOE official said. Reuter 

Eldon Industries Inc expect record July 12 quarter Chairman Robert Silverstein told New York Society Security Analysts. The company's previous quarter period end July 12 1986 Eldon earnings 1353000 dlrs 31 ct share sale 20.7 mln dlrs. Silverstein "If positive trend continue look forward favorable quarterly comparison balance result record sale income." Reuter 

Westland Group Plc> sign 40 mln stg five-year unsecured syndicate bond guarantee facility. In prepared statement facility support future sale particularly helicopter extendable annually evergreen basis. The facility guarantee payment advance customer provide performance bonds. The facility provide equally seven international bank Europe Japan Britain's Export Credits Guarantee Department. REUTER 

Moody's Investors Service affirm Greyhound Corp's Baa-2 subordinate debt rating Prime-2 commercial paper rating. Some 160 mln dlrs long-term debt affected. Moody's Greyhound's debt review downgrade May agree acquire in-flight catering airport terminal concession business Carson Pirie Scott Co 390 mln dlrs. Moody's expect Greyhound experience generally improve result due recent strategic acquisitions. It reduce debt via asset sales. Reuter 

Carolco Pictures Inc sign letter intent exchange 2.2 mln share Orbis Communications Inc stock 60 days. It Carolco share exchange value 7.00 dlrs share total value 15.4 mln dlrs adjust base price Carolco share closing date. It Orbis management remain years. Reuter 

The Paris-based Intergovernmental Council Copper Exporting Countries (CIPEC) closely study current backwardation copper market price envisage take corrective action CIPEC source said. The organisation's executive marketing committee review current market situation series meeting late week major decisions. The source note backwardation - premium nearby supply forward delivery - date week long record. "It's unusual" official add CIPEC immediate recipe remedy situation. The meeting feature gathering 10 director CIPEC's regional copper development promotion centre base Europe Japan India Brazil. Their main aim prepare ground annual ministerial meeting CIPEC schedule Zaire late September. The ministerial meeting held Paris keep costs. Reuter 

Premdor Inc wooden manufacturer employee Ellesmere Road plant Toronto reject tentative contract agreement reach Saturday morning strike. It employee narrowly reject agreement reach United Brotherhood Carpenters Joiners America. The company give far details. Reuter 

Health Rehabilitation Properties Trust reach understand purchase skilled nursing facility Massachusetts Connecticut 29 mln dlrs lease Greenery Rehabilitation Group Inc GRGI.O> Cambridge Mass. Health Rehabilitation Properties The facility Beverly Nursing Home 160 bed facility Beverly Mass Liberty Pavillion Nursing Home 160-bed facility Danvers Mass New Lakeview Convalescent Home 210-bed facility Chesire Conn. Health Rehabilitation Services facility provide skilled nursing care medically demand geriatric patients. Health Rehabilitation Services building lease Greenery initial term seven subject renewal option additional 23 years. The transaction expect close August 31. Health Rehabilitation facility operate Greenery Rehabilitation own 9.9 pct Health Rehabilitation's outstanding shares. Reuter 

Shr loss 26 ct Net loss 1277737 Revs 3.7 mln Note: full name Canadian Home Shopping Network Ltd. Period end April 30 company's quarter operations. Reuter 

Finance Minister Michael Wilson announce amendment Canada's revolve standby credit facility Canadian bank provide favorable term include reduce commitment fee lower-cost borrowing options. The size facility reduce billion dlrs U.S. 3.5 billion dlrs U.S. The maturity debate agreement June 19 1992. The move follow similar amendment November Canada's revolve standby credit facility international banks. The amendment provide total seven billion dlrs U.S. standby credit. Reuter 

Finland's state-owned mining company Outokumpu Oy statement enter Spanish market shareholder Iberica del Cobre S.A. manufacturer copper products. Outokumpu acquire 21 pct share Spanish company company agent Outokumpu Spain. The deal awaits approval Spanish government. Iberica del Cobre make tube rod roll drawn copper alloy product sale 87000 tonne output 1986 amount 22 billion pesetas. Outokumpu's turnover 1986 7.58 billion markka. Reuter 

Period end May 31 Oper shr 31 ct v 29 ct Oper net 552035 v 525729 Sales 36.7 mln v 29.1 mln Nine mths Oper shr 1.08 dlrs v 1.04 dlrs Oper net 1931488 v 1864075 Sales 104.9 mln v 87.6 mln NOTE: 1986 period end June One NOTE: Earnings exclude gain disposal discontinue operation 162000 dlrs nine ct share v loss 585175 dlrs 33 ct share quarter gain 432000 dlrs 24 ct share v loss 585175 dlrs 33 ct share nine month 1986 earnings exclude loss discontinue operation 111024 dlrs six ct share quarter 237773 dlrs 13 ct share nine month Reuter 

Period end May 31 Shr 1.81 dlrs v 1.45 dlrs Net 113752000 v 90902000 Revs 1.12 billion v 1.20 billion NOTE: Full name General Public Utilities Corp Reuter 

VMX Inc introduce voice message capability call Host Data Link Auto Scheduler User Changeable Voice Codes. The company Host Data Link Auto Scheduler streamline automate reporting function User Changeable let individual user create update code voice mailbox. Reuter 

Year end March 31 Shr loss ct v profit 10 ct Net loss 58285 v profit 182039 Sales 3857122 v 3188555 Avg shrs 2108080 v 1891250 Reuter 

Mthly div 3.6 ct v 3.6 ct month Payable July 14 Record July 1 Reuter 

Mthly div 5.8 ct v six ct month Payable July 14 Record July 1 Reuter 

Mthly div 4.5 ct v 4.5 ct month Payable July 14 Record July 1 Reuter 

Mthly div 7.3 ct v 7.3 ct month Payable July 14 Record July 1 Reuter 

Qtly div 20 ct v 20 ct prior Pay July 24 Record July 10 Reuter 

Seton Co board director unanimously approve agreement plan merger provide merger Seton unit S Acquisition Corp New Jersey company. Seton board director unanimously approve merger meeting held today. Seton agreement plan merger provide share Seton Co common stock held S Acquisition Corp unit convert merger receive 15.88 dlrs share cash. Reuter 

Anglo American Corp South Africa Ltd. ANGL.J> attack key apartheid law bar black living residential area "racially discriminatory" "economically wasteful." The Group Areas Act "misuse resource South African economy longer sustain" director annual report release today. These late remark South Africa's big company follow past criticism firm apartheid economically inefficient. The company country's prospect economic growth improve past month deep recession caution economic outlook heavily dependent solution South Africa's political turmoil. The director resumption sustain economic growth dependent stable domestic condition restoration normal international relationships. The South African government target pct real growth gross domestic product increase pct year. "A moderate rate growth ahead rise strain balance payment provide substantial deterioration export earnings acceleration capital outflows" Anglo American said. Anglo American month report 25.8 pct advance net attributable profit 1.5 billion rand March 31. REUTER 

The central own Bank Greece consortium Japanese bank lend 20 billion yen sector. The Bank statement loan 10 five grace period. The five loan fix rate slightly above term prime rate Japanese money market adjustment five accordance prevail market rates. Banks consortium Bank Tokyo International Ltd Industrial Bank Japan Ltd The Long Term Credit Bank Japan Dai-Ichi Mutual Life Insurance Co Sumitomo Bank Ltd Mitsubishi Bank Ltd Sanwa Bank Yashouda Bank Trust Corp Bank Greece said. REUTER 

Di Giorgio Corp plan respond unsolicited recapitalization plan propose Gabelli Co Inc company board investment banker evaluate proposal. Earlier Gabelli filing Securities Exchange Commission hold 28.5 pct stake DiGiorgio together Gamco Investors Inc seek control company. In addition June 25 Gabelli propose acquire Di Giorgio's common share combination 20 dlrs share cash subordinate note value eight dlrs common share post-buyout company. The June 25 buyout proposal remains July 17. Reuter 

Nec Electronics Inc U.S. Ninth District Circuit Court Appeals agree hear company's petition seek disqualification judge preside lawsuit Intel Corp INTC.O>. In grant hearing court direct Intel respond NEC petition July 16 NEC said. The petition stem suit file NEC Intel 1984. In complaint NEC seek judgement state microcode copyrightable subject matter microcode NEC us V-Series microprocessor infringe valid Intel corprights. During May judge preside William Ingram submit financial disclosure report U.S. Judicial Conference show own Intel stock investment club throughout proceeding NEC said. Reuter 

International Banknote Co Inc accepted exchange 3484000 dlrs principal amount 10-1/4 pct subordinate debenture due Aug 1 1998. It exchange offer expire June 26. Reuter 

Gunnar Gold Inc Mill City Gold Inc sign option joint venture agreement Tyranex Gold Inc Tyranite gold property Ontario. Gunnar Mill City earn 50 pct Tyranex's option buy Tyranite gold mine spending five mln dlrs exploration development feasibility study 1990. It company form joint venture partnership bring mine full commercial production. Reuter 

Shr 19 ct v 16 ct Net 502000 v 401000 Revs 8791000 v 6650000 Six mths Shr 38 ct v 29 ct Net 989000 v 745000 Revs 16.3 mln v 12.5 mln Reuter 

Control Data Corp Aeronautical Systems Division U.S. Air Force award 13.7 mln dlr contract provide Central Datacomm System. It act central interface numerous user organization division's Information Systems Technology Center Wright-Patterson Air Force Base Ohio. Terms five-year two-phase contract call Control Data supply equipment software maintenance training support services. Reuter 

TeleQuest Inc Henry Marcheschi president chairman ceo company resign health reasons. The board director elect Robert Lee co-founder company former executive vice president manufacturing engineering president chief executive officer company said. Marcheschi continue company consultant Telequest added. Reuter 

The American Hospital Association prevent spread AIDS hospital worker worker wear protective clothing routine test hospital patient disease. The non-profit advocacy organization represent hospital patient recommend hospital worker wear protective gear whenever chance expose blood bodily fluid regardless whether fluid know infect AIDS. The "reliance negative AIDS test result determine specific precaution lead false security health care workers." So nine case record hospital worker contract AIDS hospital patients. Despite low risk contract "Hospital worker understandly concerned vulnerability (to AIDS)." There 3.6 mln worker nation's hospital nurse housekeeper likely contact blood body fluid daily basis said. Among Americal Hospital Association's recommendation health care worker expose body fluid wear glove case gown mask eye coverings. Reuter 

Consumer country intervene distribution coffee export quota Brazilian Coffee Institute president Jorio Dauster said. "Distribution export quota hand producer traditional" Dauster delegate recent coffee symposium told journalists. "When consumer involve talk difficult." The main consumer country United States main producer Brazil fail reach agreement quota distribution International Coffee Organisation (ICO) met February. Dauster Brazil's role ICO meet London September support coffee pact defend market share argue distribution quota hand producer countries. "We sacrifice deal already" said. "this crop 35 mln bag economic problem position favours." Reuter 

Gunnar Gold Inc Mill City Gold Inc sign option joint venture agreement Tyranex Gold Inc Tyranite gold property Ontario. Gunnar Mill City earn 50 pct Tyranex's option buy Tyranite gold mine spending five mln dlrs exploration development feasibility study 1990. It company form joint venture partnership bring mine full commercial production. Reuter 

Crown Crafts Inc expect report record sale earnings June 28 quarter. The company prior record sale quarter quarter fiscal 1987 sale 15097000 dlrs. Its prior record net earnings primary earnings share 877000 dlrs 1.15 dlrs share achieve third quarter fiscal 1987. Crown backlog stand 17.0 mln dlrs double backlog ago. Reuter 

British Petroleum Company PlC BP.L> complete merger Standard Oil Co U.S. SRD> raise hold 100 pct 55 pct BP statement. The acquisition BP's wholly-owned subsidiary BP America Inc>. BP 25 pct stake Standard 1970 raise stake 53 pct 1978 55 pct 1984. BP chairman Sir Peter Walters chairman BP America Robert Horton vice-chairman chief executive officer Frank Mosier president. BP far detail release July 21. Reuter 

Getty Resources Ltd complete previously announce sale 9.8 mln dlrs worth subordinate note convertible 930000 common share company 10.50 dlrs each. Getty plan file prospectus Ontario Securities Commission able force conversion note common shares. Getty plan money Canadian mineral project currently exploring. Reuter 

Shr loss ct v loss seven ct Net loss 267000 v loss 445000 Revs 6407000 v 7428000 NOTE: Full name Thor Energy Resources Inc Reuter 

American Century Corp Commerce Savings subsidiary receive 42.8 mln dlrs foreclosure property Aspen Colo. It sum represent amount Commerce bid property April foreclosure sale plus interest. The property include hotel condominium development site 60-acre Aspen Meadows development residence. Reuter 

Jaguar Plc JAGR.L> spend billion stg six expand production automation improve efficiency Jaguar chairman Sir John Egan said. He told reporter company plan raise production 80000 car 1992 47000 productivity expect rise 5.5 car worker 1990 compare car now. Egan XJ6 model introduce October saloon car family. Jaguar plan bring sport car 1990s probably call "F." Reuter 

Oper shr loss 13 ct v profit ct Oper net loss 644000 v profit 184000 Revs 24.9 mln v 22.1 mln Year Oper shr loss nine ct v profit 21 ct Oper net loss 429000 v profit 1123000 Revs 90.8 mln v 86.5 mln NOTE: Revenues exclude medical publishing retail operation company decide dispose fourth quarter fiscal revenue 17.3 mln dlrs v 14.4 mln dlrs. Operating result exclude discontinue operation loss 364000 dlrs v profit 313000 dlrs. Reuter 

National Broadcasting Co unit General Electric Co GE> program affected strike midnight June 28. "Right run smoothly" NBC spokeswoman McClaine Ramsey. The strike National Association Broadcast Employees represent 2800 NBC's 8000 worker network impose contract union unacceptable. The union main objection contract permit NBC employ additional part-time workers. Ramsey manager train replace role producer news writer editor technician walk job. She reduction program summer re-run schedule expected. NABET executive board member Bill Freeh brought foreign news bureau cross picket line NBC television station bureaus. Reuter 

Qtly div eight ct v eight ct prior Pay Sept 1 Record Aug 15 Reuter 

Standard Poor's Corp downgrade 95.9 mln dlrs debt Allis-Chalmers Corp. Cut D B-minus 6.1 pct sinking fund debenture due 1990 D C cumulative convertible prefer stock. S P cite company's filing reorganization Chapter 11 federal bankruptcy code. The issue remove review place March nine due firm's fail recapitalization plan. Reuter 

Yugoslavia United Arab Emirates (UAE) agree initiate effort Iraq- Iran UAE Minister State Foreign Affairs Rashid Abdulla al-Nuaimi return Belgrade. "We agree talk initiate effort Iraq-Iran call international peace conference Middle East revive support Non-Aligned states" Emirates news agency WAM quote saying. He senior UAE official visit Yugoslavia country establish diplomatic relation November. Reuter 

The American Stock Exchange 4250000 share Uno Restaurant Corp hold company chain 37 pizza restaurant trading symbol "UNO." The West Roxbury Mass.-based company previously trade NASDAQ National System symbol "UNOS." Reuter 

1631.4 Previous - 1614.2 Four week ago - 1628.9 Year ago - 1453.8 Reuter 

RTE Corp complete purchase U.S. aluminum electrolytic capacitor related asset Emhart Corp undisclosed terms. Reuter 

The World Bank approve 100 mln dlr loan Brazil finance rehabilitation railway Sao Paulo State establish institutional reform base future commercial operation. The 285 mln dlr project design financially rehabilitate railway -- primarily state-owned Ferrovia Paulista S.A. -- improve transportation line lead city Sao Paulo port Santos. The loan 14-years include one-half grace carry variable rate currently 7.92 pct link bank's cost borrowing. Reuter 

stock market deregulation -- heard Tuesday Canadian security industry set fireworks. Some company quickly take advantage deregulation significant move likely road analyst say. They foreign firm focus bond trading debt financing underwriting area experience rule allow provide government debt financing advisory services. "When learn Canada retail" Carney Merrill Lynch Canada. "Then eventually start buy little guys. If big boys' price come they'll take one too." Under rule barrier kept bank brokerage house insurance company trust firm others' business swept favor wide-open competition. The deregulation sometimes nickname "Little Bang" allow Canadian bank domestic financial institution security unit acquire exist brokerages. Foreign company able form security division Ontario buy 50 pct Canadian firm. A raise stake 100 pct. Foreign firm enter Canada 1971 currently 10 pct Canadian brokerage. Deregulation expect generate major shakeout June 30 involve merger exist firm buyout foreign domestic financial giants. So deal reality despite swirl rumor merger talks. In heat deregulation fever Canadian investment dealer demand time book value scar prospective suitor analyst said. "I (the brokerages) low ask prices" financial service analyst Jeff Carney Merrill Lynch Canada Inc. recently terminate talk acquire prominent Canadian brokerage Burns Fry Ltd. "I (a ask price) scar Merrill Lynch Burns Fry" add Carney. "It lot money. When asset walk difficult pay amount cash." Carney factor slow pace buyout uncertainty final deregulation rule issue approve mid-June. Most major foreign Canadian financial player focus deregulation strategy planning Canadian security unit buying seat Toronto Stock Exchange Canada's large equity market. Japan's Nomura Securities Co. Ltd. Yamaichi Securities Co. Ltd. Daiwa Securities Co. Ltd. Nikko Securities Co. Ltd. recently bought seat Toronto's exchange United States investment bank Salomon Inc. Goldman Sachs Co. plan Canadian subsidiaries. The propose foreign investment Ontario firm include agreement New York's Shearson Lehman Brothers Inc. raise stake McLeod Young Weir Ltd. 30 pct 10 pct British firm James Capel Co. acquire minority Brown Baldwin Nisker Ltd. Several industry watcher predict flood foreign acquisition likely newcomer familiar Canada. Canadian firm international alliance compete increasingly global security market industry official said. "That hope regulator change throw Canadian global firms" Toronto Stock Exchange president Pearce Bunting told Reuters recently. Canada's six major bank expect proceed cautiously security field. Analysts broker expensive bank cop Brazilian loan problems. Banks tough merge cautious bureaucratic culture leaner free-wheeling security dealer said. While bank approach security firm seek merger partner yet bought brokerage choose build security unit within. Last week Royal Bank Canada country's big bank end merger talk Canadian broker Wood Gundy Inc. month negotiations. But analyst Thompson forecast bank finally acquires exist firm "all bank jump in. "They don't perceive miss something" Prudential-Bache Securities Canada Ltd. analyst Albert Thompson believe brokerage expensive risk banks. Reuter 

Rochester Telephone Corp complete acquisition Canton Telephone Co operating company. Terms acquisition disclosed. Canton Telephone serf 2900 access line northwestern Pennsylvania 1986 operating revenue 1300000 dlrs Rochester Telephone said. Reuter 

Prime Computer Inc receive Philadelphia board education 8.0 mln dlrs advanced computer equipment software automate administrative student accounting systems. The system design manufacture Prime introduce April. Reuter 

Corporate merger acquisition San Francisco past seven modest effect metropolitan area's economy lead business-backed organization said. The Bay Area Council 300 firm study corporate restructuring nine-county found San Francisco suffer ill effect corporate shake-up surround community not. Seventeen 32 Fortune 500 company left due corporate restructuring 1979 1986 21 firm add list. Ten depart company base San Francisco. During period six locate city achieve Fortune 500 status. Ted Hall council director local manage director McKinsey Co. conduct survey study grow concern merger acquisition seriously hurt economic climate northern California. However Hall 36000 job lose region 600000 job create period. At region experienced great rise caput income low unemployment rest United States California. Council President George Keller chairman chief executive officer Chevron Corp. told news conference region difficulty persuade company locate fragment local political system. But amenity living San Francisco envy chief executive metropolitan area. "It's run business" add "but it's hell government." The study conclude Chevron mergered Gulf Oil 1984 benefit run restructuring activity. Among corporate headquarters lose period Crown Zellerbach Memorex Southern Pacific Castle  Cooke Rolm. Companies grow period Fortune 500 list include Apple Computer Pacific Telesis McKesson Tandem Computer U.S. Leasing Amfac. The study management consult firm partly due corporate restructuring rate job growth San Francisco slow 1980. In addition loss corporate leadership adversely affected Bay Area's civic charitable activities. Reuter 

Standard Poor's Corp downgrade American Healthcare Management Inc's subordinate note D B affect 80 mln dlrs securities. S P for-profit operator 34 actue-care hospital miss semi-annual payment debt. The rating agency failure renegotiate term bank obligation key default. That payment note prohibit default term senior obligation remedied. Reuter 

Pittston Co WTC International N.V. shareholder approve acquisition company Pittston. Terms transaction call Pittston exchange 0.523 common share outstanding WTC share Pittston said. WTC engage domestic international air freight ocean surface freight forward consolidation distribution services. Reuter 

Home Federal Bank Florida F.S.B. HFBF.O> schedule special shareholder meetng July 26 approve propose change bank's charter merge Barnett Bank Inc's Barnett Bank Pinellas County N.A. Home Federal meeting approve definitive agreement sign May 26 call share Home Federal's common stock exchange 40 dlrs market value Barnett common stock. The exchange base conversion Home Federal share 1.935 1.200 share Barnett stocks. At 40 dlrs share Home Federal total market value transaction 175 mln dlrs. Home Federal notice meeting related proxy material file previously Securities Exchange Commission Federal Home Loan Bank board mail June 26 holder record June 15. Reuter 

A North Sea oil announce Chevron Corp's CHV> Chevron Exploration North Sea Ltd indicate field recoverable crude oil reserve 300 mln barrel industry analyst said. Chevron sidetrack block 16/26 U.K. Continental shelf test 9000 barrel (bpd) 20 API crude oil tertiary "Alba" sand three-inch surface choke. "The estimate amount oil Alba field 320 mln barrels" Paul Spedding stockbroker Kleinwort Grieveson Co told Reuters. He industry estimate total reserve field billion barrel low gravity oil recovery rate expect 20-25 pct. Analysts result encourage potential difficulty operating recover oil field show plug sidetrack drilled. "The field seem shallow widespread require multi-platform development recovery push cost up" Christopher Osborne stockbroker Hoare Govett said. Most analyst low gravity oil found require additional cost recovery test show flow well. "Although gravity oil field seem low seem flow quite 300 mln barrel recovered" Carol Bell Phillips Drew told Reuters. However Chevron official decline comment analysts' reserve estimates. They far research drilling summer disclose reserve figures. Analysts field declare commercial developed ready local market heavy crude produced. "Most refinery upgraded refine heavy oil price differential heavy crude lot narrower today" Osborne said. Chevron operates block behalf 16 company include British Petroleum Development Ltd DSM Hydrocarbons (UK) Ltd Enterprise Oil (TNS) Ltd Marathon Int. Pet. (GB) Ltd Phillips Petroleum Co U.K. Ltd. Reuter 

Arden Group Inc file registration statement Securities Exchange Commission cover issuer tender offers. It offer direct class A common stock holder holder 8-1/4 pct debenture due March 1 1989. The plan offer common stock holder call company exchange either 30 dlrs cash 35 dlrs principal amount 13 pct subordinate debenture due September 1 1997 share class B common stock class A share held Arden Group said. It cash payment subject proration. In addition company plan offer exchange dlr principal amount 13 pct debenture due September 1 1997 outstanding dlr principal amount 8-1/4 pct debentures. Reuter 

The World Bank approve 100 mln dlr loan Brazil finance rehabilitation railway Sao Paulo establish institutional reform base future commercial operation. The 285 mln dlr project design financially rehabilitate railway -- primarily state-owned Ferrovia Paulista S.A. -- improve transport line lead city Sao Paulo port Santos. The loan 14 include 3-1/2 grace carry variable rate currently 7.92 pct link bank's cost borrowing. Reuter 

The Pakistani government allow private sector export cotton rice trade policy announce cover years. Commerce Planning Minister Mahbubul Haq televise speech decide allow duty-free import cotton yarn. Cotton rice Pakistan's main export handle exclusively corporation 1970s. Haq private sector export cotton rice corporations. He duty-free import cotton yarn allow quality yarn available local ancillary industry enable compete effectively market. This overcome domestic shortage yarn said. Reuter 

The Palo Verde Unit 1 nuclear plant remove service Sunday due leak pipe circulate accord plant's operator Arizona Nuclear Power Project. It pipe non-nuclear steam-generating plant delivers plant's condenser. This condense steam drive turbine generator Power Project said. The cause leak investigate estimate unit return service add Unit 2 operating full power. The Arizona Nuclear Power Project consortium southwest U.S. utility include AZP Group's AZP> Arizona Public Service El Paso Electric ELPA> Public Service New Mexico PNM> Southern California Edison SCE>. Reuter 

Lomas Nettleton Financial Corp shareholder approve special meeting company's acquisition Equitable Life Leasing Corp 263.3 mln dlrs. Equitable Life Leasing Corp subsidiary Equitable Investment Corp own Equitable Life Assurance Co U.S. Lomas acquistion price consist mln cash 1.5 mln share company's common stock 71000 share series C prefer stock 8.944 mln dlrs principal amount nine pct senior note due 1994. The company add acquisition close June 30. Reuter 

Biscayne Holdings Inc stockholder approve one-for-three reverse stock split portion amendment approve certificate incorporation. The company holder reduce authorize class A common share 50 mln 100 mln reclassify outstanding share share. About 6036800 share outstanding split. Biscayne Holdings shareholder approve annual election director eliminate provision related classify board. Reuter 

ALMI Group L.P.> co-chairmen Michael Landes Albert Schwartz vice chairman Michael Spiegler acquire 50 pct equity Clearview Baking Corp> undisclosed terms. A. Dale Mayo Clearview's president chief executive officer retain 50 pct company ALMI Group said. Reuter 

Symbolics Inc won 500000 dlr contract NASA Ames Research Center preliminary design spaceborne symbolic processor. The company symbolic processing technology faciliate artificial intelligence application advanced compute techniques. It processor execute symbolic numeric application future space shuttle space station deep space missions. Reuter 

National City Corp project income eight mln dlrs quarter end June 30 due 55 mln dlr charge loan loss provisions. This compare earnings quarter 36.3 mln dlrs. National City expect share income quarter 20 cts. The company expect full earnings comparable year's record 135 mln dlrs. The bank 55 mln dlr special loan loss provision related loan exposure developed country international portfolio. Reuter 

Arcturus Inc introduce MegaBeam product three-tube resolution data display projector. The company screen projector twice bright compete models. It projector show image 14-inch computer terminal groupd six-foot wall screen. It MegaBeam price 11995 dlrs unit. Reuter 

Shr 25 ct v 25 ct prior qtr Pay August 10 Record July 10 Reuter 

Ecuador produce crude oil excess 221000-bpd OPEC quota half Energy Minister Fernando Santos Alvite told news conference. Ecuador plan produce 280000 bpd August rise 320000 bpd January minister said. "We produce quota pay crude product lent Venezuela Nigeria Kuwait compensate crude unable produce past months" said. Earthquake damage pipeline sharply cut Ecuadorean production March May year. Santos move explain fellow OPEC week's meeting Vienna increase Ecuador's quota 221000 bpd 210000 approved. "They understood position believe remain spirit (quota) agreement" said. Immediately March quake Ecuadorean production 250000-260000 bpd 144000 bpd exported. While production Venezuela Nigeria Kuwait loan Ecuador total 12 mln barrel crude mln barrel product Santos said. Reuter 

The World Bank extend loan total 241 mln dlrs Niger Zaire support economic reform structural adjustment programs. The loan International Development Association (IDA) bank's concessionary lending arm African Facility three-year IDA-administered fund support economic policy reform sub-Saharan Africa bank said. Zaire's structural adjustment support 67 mln dlr IDA loan 94 mln dlr African Facility loan hope lay basis sustain economic growth bank said. Included program's goal strengthen private sector incentive aid macroeconomic management unspecified change transportion agricultural policy bank said. Niger's structural adjustment support 60 mln dlr IDA loan 20 mln dlr African Facility loan hope aid spending control support pricing reform encourage private sector competition bank said. Reuter 

Standard Poor's Corp affirm 100 mln dlrs B-minus subordinate debt Intelogic Trace Inc. S P cite attempt takeover Burlington Industries Inc Asher Edelman-led Intelogic financing vehicle. About 78 pct Burlington's common share tender Morgan Stanley Group Inc added. S P Intelogic's problem expand computer maintenence activity lead drop revenue financial resource remain supportive. Reuter 

Moody's Investors Service downgrade 95 mln dlrs outstanding Allis-Chalmers Corp issues. It lower sinking fund debenture Ca B-3 Series C prefer stock Ca Caa. Moody's cite justification company's filing court protection Chapter 11 Federal Bankruptcy Code. Also agency note company's inability restructure debt obligations. Allis-Chalmers Corp manufacturer air quality control fluid handle solid material processing equipment. Reuter 

U.S. firm expect enjoy advantage superior experience Japanese competitor promising bring asset rich Japanese investor U.S. financial future markets. Japan allow local financial institution month start use overseas future currency bond stock manage bulge foreign portfolios. "U.S. investment bank advantage. We've decade Japanese not" Eugene Atkinson president Goldman Sachs Japan Corp. Japanese investor assume eager market participation slow Japanese security bank source New York said. Koichi Kane Executive Vice President Nomura Securities International "They're start period." "They're test water" Atkinson added. But start Japanese likely player opening lucrative opportunity said. U.S. investment banking source slow start understandable U.S. institutional investor fairly market. Futures market history U.S. risk involve American pension fund mutual fund allow market relatively recently U.S. investment bank future analyst said. In addition Japan's inexperience financial future insufficient broker Japan blame slow start Japanese source said. Japan liberalize financial market domestic financial institution allow act broker Japan overseas future markets. This change banker speculate security house permit enter line business. While Japanese Americans move First Boston Corp Salomon Brothers Inc Goldman Sachs Co Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc PainWebber Inc lead charge said. In U.S. Nikko Securities Co International Inc prepare clearing member Chicago Boad Trade (CBT)in anticipation grow Japanese demand future product Akira Tokutomi Nikko said. Nomura Japan's large security yet decide whether expand future brokerage U.S. establish closer link Japanese investor U.S. future market Kane said. The even session CBT inaugurate recently coincide Tokyo hour increase Japanese participation extent brokerage issue hurdle Japanese source said. High liquidity big attraction future market Japanese naturally join daytime trading session Chicago said. The Japanese process select broker establish channel pay fee margin harmonize clerical procedure bridging gap Tokyo Chicago prove burden source said. Some Japanese bank largely bar security industry Japan contemplate buying U.S. brokerage Japanese source said. One motif do save commission spur U.S. commercial bank brokerage said. "The simplest brokerage tie-up" Hiroyuki Kondo Yasuda Trust Banking Co Ltd New York. One trust bank source total fee amount mln dlrs bank future market fully hedge huge pension fund assets. Japanese bank able penetrate aggressively foreign financial market mobilize mammoth capital asset future brokerage story Japanese banking source said. They cite stiff fee-cutting competition addition difficulty recruiting influential Chicago brokers. In anticipation sizeable order future U.S. broker take order Japanese 13 dlrs contract below break-even level said. Some Chicago broker brokerage house try approach Japanese financial institution tie-up future indusry source Chicago said. But Japanese bank source New York capital base brokerage make Japanese nervous capital link. Japanese bank unlikely ignore brokerage financial future trading Japanese start grow fast prof profitable said. But question add whether Japanese government bank engage risky business. reuter 

Court document file U.S. bankruptcy court attorney Allis-Chalmers Corp AH> list Equitable Life Assurance Co large creditors. According court paper Equitable owe total 468859 dlrs. Other creditor include Connecticut General Life Insurance Co owe 192520 dlrs New York Life Insurance Co owe 146553 dlrs. The list unsecured creditor head KHIC America Corp Rutheford New Jersey owe 663950 dlrs. Second list unsecured creditor pave contractor owe 600000 dlrs. Manville Corp MAN> third 471157 dlrs owed. Allis-Chalmers Dec 31 unfunded pension liability total 44 mln dlrs. It intend carry reorganization dispose business contribute adequately cash flow. The company plan eliminate unprofitable product line emphasize profitable product lines. Allis-Chalmers intend obtain workforce reduction seek monetary concession salaried hourly employees. It eliminate operation facility marginal performers. The company plan discontinue burdensome contract lease collective bargaining agreements. The company believe creditor realize reorganization liquidation. The document Allis-Chalmers suffer substantial loss 1981 due sale decline cause fierce competition sluggish global economy. It restructuring plan already institute adversely affected cash flow cost include product liability retiree medical pension cost continued despite reduction size business. Reuter 

Shr 20 ct v 12 ct Net 34088000 v 18727000 Revs 340.4 mln v 200.3 mln Nine mths Shr 53 ct v 31 ct Net 88661000 v 49059000 Revs 926.5 mln v 560.1 mln Avg shrs 151.1 mln v 137.0 mln Reuter 

Gateway Communications Inc expect quarter earnings low year's income seven ct share revenue period increase 20 pct 2.7 mln dlrs report ago. The decline quarter earnings attributable high operating cost result increase sale development expansion Gateway said. Reuter 

The Environmental Protection Agency (EPA) announce plan disapprove clean-air plan 14 metropolitan area call ban area construction potentially pollute facilties. EPA Administrator Lee Thomas statement area show meet agency ozone carbon-monoxide air-quality standard 1987 soon after. He propose ban construction cover industry electric utility iron steel production plant industrial boiler petroleum refineries. The area affected Chicago; Indiana portion Chicago area; East St. Louis Ill.; Indiana portion Louisville Ky. area; Cleveland Ohio; Atlanta Ga.; Dallas-Ft. Worth Tex.; Denver Colo.; California south coast include Los Angeles; Fresno Sacramenta Ventura Kern county Calif. Washoe County (Reno) Nev. Thomas propose major change exist source pollution areas. They effective final assessment area's pollution expect late next. For Cleveland EPA propose restriction federal highway funding clean-air grant Ohio provide adequate test curb car pollution require Clean AirAct. Thomas said: "It clear implementation plan area achieve federal ozone carbon-monoxide standard deadline mandate Congress. In circumstance Clean Air Act leaf discretion. I propose sanctions." The EPA estimate 20 metropolitan area fail meet agency's ozone standard year. About 70 meeting ozone standards. It add 80 area meeting EPA carbon-monoxide standard long-term problem meeting standards. The EPA propose car-makers order install canister car begin 1979 capture pollute gasoline vapor escape gas pumped fill station car's gas tank. reuter 

Oper shr 38 ct v 32 ct Qtly div 12 ct v 12 ct Oper net 5430000 v 4707000 Revs 169.1 mln v 139.4 mln Year Oper shr 1.50 dlrs v 1.32 dlrs Oper net 21.5 mln v 19.1 mln Revs 602.5 mln v 524.4 mln NOTE: 1986 operating net period excludes loss 8.2 mln dlrs 56 ct share discontinue operation Reuter 

Geothermal Resources International Inc complete additional geothermal well steam field The Geysers northern California. The field developed supply steam 130-megawatt Coldwater Creek Geothermal Power Plant schedule commercial operation late 1987 1988 company add complete 15 geothermal well field 1981. The Coldwater Creek plant built consortium local utility Geothermal said. Reuter 

Wal-Mart Stores Inc complete acquisition Super Saver Warehouse Inc> Super Saver wholly own unit Wal-Mart. Reuter 

Piedmont Aviation Inc accept reservation nonstop service Nassau Bahamas Charlotte N.C. begin November 15. The service connect 30 city Piedmont Nassau company said. Reuter 

Micro General Corp complete 1.5-mln-dlr equity offering 1.2 mln unit consist share common stock common stock purchase warrant. The offering underwritten Paulson Investment Co Inc. Net proceeds 1.3 mln dlrs expand company's parcel shipping system postal scale manufacturing marketing product development and/or acquisition. Reuter 

Owens-Corning Fiberglass Corp agree Taiwan Glass Industries Corp manufacture distribution fiberglass reinforcement product license. The company firm construct manufacturing plant product outside Taipei disclose term deal. It agreement enhance ability serve grow Asian market fiberglass reinforcement yarns. Reuter 

Kraft Inc complete acquisition Frostex Foods Inc undisclosed terms. Kraft month sign letter intent acquire Austin Texas-based foodservice distributor. Reuter 

Phoenix Technologies Ltd> sign marketing agreement Apollo Computer Inc. Phoenix agreement allows Apollo market Phoenix's software name "Domain/PC Emulator." The company software available Apollo's Domain Series 4000 personal workstation Apollo's current generation machine year's third quarter. Phoenix software allows manufacturer offer customer MS-DOS base 100 pct PC-compatible operating mode solely software emulation. Apollo license software Phoenix sell directly customers. Reuter 

Qtr end April 30 Shr profit ct v loss ct Net profit 146000 v loss 203000 Revs 2001000 v 1493000 Year Shr profit ct v loss 13 ct Net profit 445000 v loss 827000 Revs 7135000 v 5237000 NOTE: Full name Precision Target Marketing Inc. Latest quarter include extraordinary gain 214000 dlrs ct share 85000 dlrs ct share. Reuter 

Moody's Investors Service Inc upgraded Scott Paper Co's long-term debt rating A-3 Baa-1. The company's Prime-2 commercial paper rating remains unchanged. Approximately billion dlrs long-term debt affected. Moody's upgrade reflect Scott's continue improvement operating result Moody's expectation substantial fund flow company asset sale. Reuter 

RTE Corp complete purchase Emhart Corp's United States aluminum electrolytic capacitor undisclosed sum. The company capacitor Emhart's electrical electronic market Mallory brand name. The company product line acquire sale 25 mln dlrs year. Reuter 

Periods end April 30 Shr 83 ct v 94 ct net 5583000 v 8403000 Revs 28.8 mln v 29.4 mln Avg shrs 6754000 v 6802000 Reuter 

United Medical Corp sell Trotter Treadmills Inc unit. The company sale line strategy refocus health care service business. It receive party agreement yet reached. Trotter Treadmills make motorize treadmill exercise enthusiast fitness club market. It sale project 10 mln dlrs. Reuter 

A specially convene Franco-German meeting sideline summit EC leader fail progress 1987-88 farm price package deeply split former EC ally diplomat The meeting attend farm minister foreign minister country French President Francois Mitterand Prime Minister Jacques Chirac Chancellor Helmut Kohl West Germany. The stalemate farm price see key provide solution long-term settlement Community's worst-ever budget crisis. "The Germans clearly budge" aide Chirac told reporters. He add French Prime Minister visibly angered hour-long meeting. Bonn Paris diametrically oppose proposal Brussels Executive Commission overhaul radically EC's complex "green" currrency design translate common EC farm price currencies. Paris support move oil fat tax West Germany Britain Denmark Netherlands. EC farm minster due resume negotiation package agree April 1 deadline tomorrow. Diplomats hop summit inject fresh impetus talks. The Commission propose package save billion dollar EC's ever-rising farm budget. The summit dominate lengthy talk move alter entire financing 12-nation plug 5.7 billion dollar budget shortfall 1987. Reuter 

Toll Brothers Inc open Washington D.C.-Baltimore Metro divisional office Greenbelt Md. Reuter 

Venezuela's cabinet approve exchange rate oil mining export earnings set 14.50 bolivar dollar 7.50 bolivar previously Minister Manuel Azpur UA said. Azpur told reporter cabinet meeting measure "fundamental conserve economic financial strength petroleum industry." He exchange rate go central bank final approval tommorrow allow oil company Petroleos De Venezuela S.A.(PDVSA) solve work capital implement investment plan estimate 20 billion bolivar 1987. He measure effective. Venezuela's oil industry previously sell dollar earnings government 7.50 dollar bought foreign exchange import 14.50 bolivars. The exchange rate promote purchase domestic good service industry Azpur said. He add PDVSA position purchase government debt bonds. PDVSA available liquid asset 20 billion bolivar start nine billion trust fund Central Bank Venezuela (BCV) place government bonds. According contract PDVSA central bank BCV provide cash oil industry requries repurchase bonds. PDVSA's contribution treasury 44.480 billion bolivars. It foreign earnings oil petrochemcial sale 8.023 billion dlrs. Reuter 

CyCare Systems Inc bought Control Data Corp's CDA> MedTec unit undisclosed sum. The company MedTec's client base significant impact long-term revenue expect minimal positive impact earnings six months. It asset purchase include processing agreement software maintenance contract support software. Reuter 

Canadian Tire Corp Ltd hope special board committee solve voting right dispute class A common stock shareholders. "Although proposal yet developed director hope result achieved" chairman Hugh Macaulay annual meeting. The committee form fall try determine voting right class A non-voting share control company change hands. The Ontario Securities Commission block 270 mln dlr takeover bid January 49 pct company's common shares. The OSC bid Canadian Tire store owner abuse shareholder right circumvent share provision convert non-voting stock voting share 50 pct stock change ownership. Since Billes agree tender 60 pct hold Canadian Tire's common share pro rata offer commenced legal proceeding amongst themselves. Macaulay comment far situation "while matter remain unsettled state". At meeting president Dean Groussman high profit trend evident quarter end April 4 continuing. First quarter net rise 10 pct 21.1 mln dlrs 19.2 mln dlrs earlier. Groussman company plan sharply high capital spending 103 mln dlrs compare 43 mln dlrs likely maintain level capital investment 1988 1989. Reuter 

First Pennsylvania Bank N.A. major subsidiary First Pennsylvania Corp add variable-rate VISA> card consumer credit product line. The bank card carry 14 pct annual rate guaranteed Sept 30 rate increase decrease change prime rate reflect Wall Street Journal. There grace period purchase card First Pennsylvania already offer MasterCard> product 25-day grace period bank added. Reuter 

McChip Resources Inc agree exchange Oklahoma oil gas property operate Reserve Exploration Co REXC.O> 638435 restrict Reserve common shares. The company 44 pct stake Reserve's outstanding share result exchange. Reuter 

Sales single-family home tumble 14.9 pct May April level high mortgage rate analyst said. "There month weak sale rate stabilize sale home stable mid-summer" economist Lawrence Chimerine Wharton Econometrics Inc. The drop May seasonally adjust annual rate 616000 unit large January 1982 Commerce Department said. Interest rate conventional mortgage bottom 9.08 pct March rise 10.7 pct April accord Stephen Roach economist Morgan Stanley. The effect freeze potential homebuyers market said. "The rate move suddenly certainly unexpected homebuyers" Cynthia Latta economist Data Resources. "They startle want hold happen." The drop sale single-family sale sharper expect economist said. "We fully expect decline extent anticipated" James Christian chief economist U.S. League Savings Institutions. Christian sharp rise May sale exist home generally expensive homes. Latta Data Resources strong sale condominium Northeast West Coast reflect sale exist homes. Christian U.S. League Savings Institutions "Underlying housing demand remains strong. I market stabilize half." Others optimistic however. "We clearly won't boom (in sales) I don't start collapse single-family housing" Chimerine Wharton. Eugene Sherman chief economist Federal Home Loan Bank New York "The low sale level maintain awhile change rates. There won't specific improvement come months." Reuter 

First American Financial Corp repurchase 997756 share 18 pct common stock American Century Corp ACT> 29.50 dlrs share cash real estate property California. Concurrent closing deal First American Title Insurance Co unit enter long-term lease arrangement property First American said. It stock repurchase retire re-issued. Reuter 

Brazil's land reform trumpet government absolute priority mire bureaucracy achieve aims. Officials acknowledge progress minimal. Land right activist progress actually worsening. Over economic pressure force producer sell land-owners. Land reform country's hotly-debated political issue particularly fore Constituent Assembly Brasilia draw constitution. Land right campaigner charter fresh hope country's 4.5 mln landless family wave wave land occupations. "We secret tactics" leader land reform movement Joao Pedro. "The solution occupy -- rural workers. There single land reform occupy land." The land issue spawn violence Amazonia Mato Grosso. Some 278 die land dispute accord Pastoral Commission Land link Roman Catholic Church. The land reform announce 1985 soon civilian government President Jose Sarney aim resettle 14 mln family 1989 gradually splitting country's vast undeveloped estates. The government National Plan Agrarian Reform described "one absolute priorities." In practice few 20000 family help government admits anywhere near original target. Political analyst pace land reform slow Sarney military government General Joao Figueiredo (1979-85). The slow progress issue fuel deep frustration. Land right demonstration common sight Sao Paulo part country. Activists condition countryside improve significantly deteriorated. Pedro leader Movement Landless Rural Workers 12 month 100000 producer force land Brazil's five southernmost states. He exodus cause government's anti-inflation Cruzado Plan froze price hit income farmers. When Cruzado Plan collapse late price rate soar farmer unable pay debt take price freeze. Pedro 100000 family left countryside south previously land-owners minority tenant farmers. Most move Brazil's swollen cities. One activist landless labourer call "boias-frias" (literally "cold meals") whom cut sugar cane increase 400000 Sao Paulo 300000 five ago. In attempt improve lot rural poor land reform movement drawn radical proposal send Constituent Assembly. The proposal severely limit size maximum permissible hold land right movement expect vote constitution. Pedro 70 pct 559-member assembly compose land-owners. He add assembly probably vote proposal October rejection signal large-scale land invasions. Reuter 

Standard Poor's Corp upgraded Phelps Dodge Corp's senior debt BB-plus BB preference stock BB-minus B-plus. About 400 mln dlrs debt preference stock outstanding. Continuing cost cut copper operation significantly enhance firm's competitive position S P said. It add acquisition Columbian Chemical Co broaden Phelps Dodge's earnings base. Reuter 

A subsidiary (Kyowa Hakko Kogyo Co Ltd) privately-held (Murex Corp) jointly announce sign agreement give Kyowa exclusive right Japan market Murex product detect AIDS. The company estimate Japanese clinician perform minimum 28 mln AIDS test year. The Murex product approve Japanese authority sell Japan. Reuter 

An investor lead Robert Bass Fort Worth Texas own 786800 share Bell Howell Co common stock equal 8.9 pct company's common stock outstanding. In filing Securities Exchange Commission purchase 511500 Bell Howell common share April 29 June 26 44.25 dlrs 56.02 dlrs share. The stock acquire investment purpose add purchase sell additional share future. Reuter 

American Century Corp Commerce Savings unit sell 997756 common share First American Financial Corp FAMR.O> represent 18 pct First American. The company share repurchase First American 29.4 mln dlrs real estate asset California. It Commerce Savings acquire share 1982 1983. Reuter 

The United States respond apparent escalation Iranian rhetoric continued assurance expand military force Gulf play purely deterrent role. "I emphasize role deterrent we're assure safety American shipping shipping related itself" State Department spokesman Charles Redman told reporters. He Iranian claim United States move towards brink arm conflict Iran. Tehran Radio quote defence spokesman Ali Akbar Hashemi Rafsanjani tell visit Nicaraguan delegation yesterday "At moment United States move towards brink arm encounter us. "We concerned believe U.S. Presence nation serious. We determine stand firm certainly win." The United States disclose week beef Gulf fleet seven 10 warship send refurbish battleship Missouri patrol outside strategic Strait Hormuz entrance Gulf. The buildup tie U.S. Plans escort Kuwaiti oil tanker re-registered fly American flag gain naval protection Iranian attacks. Asked Iranian rhetoric White House spokesman Marlin Fitzwater "We won't comment response Iranian statements. Our position clear status event Gulf. We winner loser activity statement tend prolong increase hostility helpful welcome." Redman independently confirm report Iran offer halt attack Gulf shipping. Reuter 

Belden Blake Energy Co master limited partnership enter agreement sell 400000 unit mln dlrs cash. The company Great Pacific Capital S.A.> Geneva Switzerland act lead manager private placement unit international investors. Under agreement option grant buy 800000 additional unit five dlrs unit July 13. Reuter 

Texas Instruments Inc (TXN) award 556.1 mln dlr contract build 2575 high-speed anti-radiation missile (HARM) Navy said. The company won 5.9 mln dlr contract upgrade M-48 tank Turkey Army said. REUTER 

Life Technologies Inc submit Food Drug Administration test proven effective detect sexually transmit virus play role development cervical cancer. Life Technologies test call "ViraPap" identifies presence human papillomavirus (HPV) detect virus' DNA makeup. Life Technologies test us radioactive probe detect virus. Reuter 

Security Federal Savings Loan Association initial offering hold company Security Financial Group Inc completed. The company offering Security Financial consist 766251 issue conversion Security Federal stock ownership mutual ownership. It net proceeds offering corporate purposes. Trident Securities Inc Dain Bosworth Inc underwriter offering. Security Financial begin trading NASDAQ June 29 company said. Reuter 

Shr 40 ct v 11 ct Net 8265000 v 2255000 Sales 248.3 mln v 245.4 mln Six mths Shr 94 ct v 51 ct Net 19.4 mln v 10.6 mln Sales 531 mln v 535.8 mln Reuter 

Standard Poor's Corp affirm rating 500 mln dlrs Bank New York Co debt bank special LDC loan loss reserve. Affirmed A-plus senior debt rating A subordinate debt A-1-plus commercial paper respective A-plus A1-plus rating certificate deposit Bank New York Bank New York (Delaware). S P bank's 135 mln dlr addition loan loss reserve conservatively address LDC exposure. S P result quarter loss expect substantially diminish fundamental earnings strength. Reuter 

Qtly div 35 ct v 35 ct Pay Sept 11 Record Aug 10 Reuter 

CXR Telcom Corp Torotel Inc agree principle settle pending litigation regard sale Torotel's former Halcyon Communications Inc unit CXR March 1986 company joint statement. The agreement call CXR pay Torotel 1350000 dlrs exchange return 2.5 mln dlr note five mln CXR common share value 17754000 mln dlrs company said. In June 1986 CXR file suit San Francisco federal court charge 10.3 mln dlr price paid Halycon excessive Torotel said. It suit CXR seven mln dlrs damage unspecified punitive award. Reuter 

Matthews Wright Group Inc cite opinion bond counsel bond issue underwrote validly issue continue receive tax-exempt status. The company issue statement stock fell 2-1/8 4-5/8 American Stock Exchange. Matthews Wright response press story governmental agency preliminary inquiry seek information. Reuter 

Cablevision Systems Corp bought cable television system six Dutchess County N.Y. community Dutchess County Cablevision Associates Ltd. The company acquisition system add presence New York. It add 4400 subsribers 568000 subscriber base. Reuter 

Ashford Financial Group create master limited partnership third quarter. The company move allow investor participate early-stage financing client companies. The company investor liquidity traditional limited partnership investments. Ashford Financial specializes provide financial backing company potential earnings growth years. Reuter 

Austec International Ltd North American unit Austec Inc complete purchase privately-held Ryan-McFarland Corp undisclosed sum. The company unit combine expect net revenue 25 mln dlrs 1987. Ryan-McFarlnad develops COBOL FORTRAN language compiler micro mini mainframe computer markets. Austec International base Melbourne Australia. Ryan-McFarland locate Rolling Hills Estates Calif. Reuter 

Pepsi-Cola USA receive exclusive five-year contract supply soft drink Harcourt Brace Jovanovich Inc's HBJ> Sea World theme park United States effective Jan 1 1988. Pepsi Sea World account Coca-Cola past 16 years. Pepsi Sea World operates five major theme park Orlando San Diego Cleveland Winter Haven Fla. Baseball City Fla. Pepsi agreement call major promotional partnership companies. Reuter 

The Securities Exchange Commission's entry battle Texaco Inc Pennzoil Co PZL> affect outcome 10.3 billion dlr legal saga analyst said. Texaco SEC file "friend court" brief tender offer rule pertains case. Some analyst construe positive Texaco allege Texaco Pennzoil violate rule issue thoroughly address low Texas courts. Texaco's stock rise 1-1/2 39-3/8 Pennzoil fell 78-7/8. A Pennzoil attorney comment. He SEC rule 10b-13 Texaco's argument request Texas Supreme Court matter previously address court. Pennzoil SEC brief whether brief support view litigant inquiry request clarification reason low court decisions. Texaco SEC urge Texas Supreme Court accept review respect issue. Texaco allege Pennzoil violate rule tender offer Getty Oil Co outstanding allege agreement January 3 1984 buy Getty shares. Analysts SEC tender offer rule prevents make offer enter contract target company's stock. Frederick Leuffer C.J. Lawrence believe SEC intervention meaningful acknowledge affect. "If friend court brief potent clearly pro-Texaco take account Texas Supreme Court chance entire judgment reverse Pennzoil get nothing" Leuffer said. Texaco Pennzoil lock bitter legal battle Texaco's acquisition Getty Oil. A Texas court award Pennzoil record 10.53 billion dlrs damage reduce billion dlrs. With award total 10.3 billion dlrs. Texaco file protection chapter 11 federal bankruptcy law earlier year. Its action design avoid have Texas appeal court post security bond entire amount Pennzoil judgement. Texaco earlier SEC file brief week July 20. In comment Leuffer reflect view analyst believe convince SEC play significant role. "The argument court ignore (the SEC brief) friend court briefs" said. Kidder Peabody Co analyst Marc Cohen expect SEC's brief change direction case. "Everyday you're this" Cohen said. Texaco lawyer Jim Sales logical believe SEC sought intervene believe 10b-13 rule involved. "I market sense reminder Pennzoil reach star fall face" Sales said. "They (Pennzoil) won Texas" Joel Fischer Drexel Burnham Lambert. But Fischer analyst SEC involvement raise question federal law Texaco U.S. Supreme Court Texas court reverse low opinion refuse hear case. Analysts low court weight 10b-13 issue. Sales argue court "acknowledged really ignore legal affect regulation require hope correct misimpression". Wall Street analyst arbitrager speculate outcomes. One arbitrager concern Texaco Pennzoil settle low sum demand Pennzoil. "The SEC step issue amicus curia (friend court) lot arbitrager little bit disturbed" Cohen. "What you're see continual chess game. Every slight move road multiply effect" said. Reuter 

Negotiations resume 14-day-old strike Canada's letter carrier picket line violence subside federal government change appoint mediator. The talk 20000-member Letter Carriers Union Canada government-owned Canada Post Labor Minister Pierre Cadieux announce appointment mediator yesterday. There little progress party week side request mediator time. Cadieux originally side apart warrant independent third party. Although postal union maintain strategy select rotate strike across country Montreal affected service normal elsewhere Canada. Canada Post stuck promise halt replacement worker seven day mediator appoint report picket line violence. Canada Post government order eliminate $160 million (U.S.) deficit take tough stand talk side remain apart wage work conditions. Reuter 

Boeing Co award 43.4 mln dlr contract management production B-52G upgrade Air Force said. REUTER 

Campeau Corp> involve Securities Exchange Commission's administrative proceed Allied Stores Corp Campeau acquire year. In statement company "The SEC action involves event occur prior Campeau's acquisition Allied relate allege failure Allied disclosures. Consequently Campeau subject procedings." Reuter 

Henley Group Inc's M.W. Kellogg Co subsidiary consortium Inelectra> receive contract Corpoven S.A. Venezuelan-owned domestic oil company revamp expand El Palito Refinery. Kellogg instal cost perform estimate 130 mln dlrs. Inelectra Kellogg major Venezuelan engineering firm. Kellog project enable refinery produce BTX product -- benzene toluene orthoxylene -- processing naphtha feed expand reformer-hydrotreater. Kellogg refinery's reformer-hydrotreater upgraded 9500 barrel capacity 7500. It BTX process unit include aromatic extraction xylene fractionation xylene isomerization thermal hydrodealkylation. Kellogg point Venezuela import BTX aromatics. Reuter 

Equitble Real Estate Shopping Centers L.P. execute ground lease Federated Department Stores Inc FDS> site Brookdale Shopping Center Brooklyn Center Minn. Equitable Federated build 67000 squre foot department store operate MainStreet division. The store expect complete half 1988. Reuter 

The Hong Kong Shanghai Banking Corp name John Bond chief executive officer Americas succeed Angus Petrie retiring. Bond responsibility bank's operation United States Canada Latin America company said. Reuter 

Fortune Systems Corp shareholder approve sale computer hardware SCI Technologies Inc. The transaction expect close week. At annual meeting Fortune shareholder vote change Fortune's name Tigera Inc. Its principal subsidiary Tigeral Corp. Reuter 

International Broadcasting Corp plan secondary offering 700000 800000 share common stock. The offering underwriter mid-August. International Broadcasting identify underwriters. The company plan file registration statement offering Securities Exchange Commission. Reuter 

Warrantech Corp agree Providence Washington Insurance Group insure Warrantech's obligation Extended Service line business. The company write 1.9 mln dlrs extend service plan represent 20 mln dlrs' worth electronic products. The company agreement enhance future opportunity aspect flexibility credibility aggressiveness insurance company. Reuter 

Middle South Utilities Inc Federal Energy Regulatory Commission request 30-day stay U.S. Court Appeals ruling order commission reconsider allocation cost Grand Gulf One nuclear plant. More ago FERC allocation af Grand Gulf capacity cost Middle South operating companies. These allocation turn basis contest rate filing operating utility regulator service areas. In ruling date June 24 distribute June 26 U.S. Court Appeals Washington reverse January 1987 decision order FERC explain criterion determine undue discrimination FERC's allocation currently effect unduly discriminatory definition Middle South said. The company ruling three-judge appeal court panel "was totally unexpected especially timetable full 11-member court April announce judge rehear panel's January decision panel upheld FERC. In essence Middle South "the three-member panel adopt dissent opinion majority opinion full court accepted decision." The company support FERC's motion stay. The commission need determine appropriate course court decision. "Given complexity clarification FERC significance late determine" Middle South statement. Reuter 

Qtly div 35 ct v 41 ct prior Pay July 31 Record July 15 Reuter 

TecSyn International Inc terminate takeover discussion U.S.-based investor unable establish access fund complete propose transaction contrary previous assurances. TecSyn previously control shareholder accepted principle proposal offer nine dlrs share 70 pct TecSyn's outstanding shares. The investor plan invest 22.5 mln dlrs private placement mln non-voting TecSyn common share company said. Reuter 

Goodyear sell 50 pct Toyobo Petcord Ltd Japan partner venture Toyobo Co. Reuter 

Infinite Graphics Inc sign letter intent create joint venture Computer Design Equipment Co> expand sale computer-aided design equipment Midwest. Infinite Graphics manage hold control venture National CADD-Pro Upper Midwest. Computer Design headquarters Syracuse Ind. Reuter 

Shr 16 ct v ct Net 391000 v 57000 Sales 7917000 v 7255000 Six mths Shr 47 ct v 17 ct Net 1164000 v 422000 Sales 27.9 mln v 24.3 mln NOTE: Full company name Washington Scientific Industries Inc. Second quarter end June seven. Reuter 

Western Union sign agreement Electronic Data Systems Corp>. Under agreement EDS provide Western Union's easylink electronic mail service 35000 EDS diamond communication user General Motors Corp GM> internal electronic mail network. Diamond interface link eight incompatible electronic mail system GM's various divisions. Diamond user communication path 160000 easylink user 1.5 mln telex user worldwide Western Union said. Reuter 

Warwick Insurance Managers Inc hold company Warwick Insurance Co subsidiary purchase 55000 share common stock. The company establish employee stock ownership plan share purchase available plan adopted. Reuter 

Israel's export U.S. double five mideast nation's goal economic independence achieve Gad Yaacobi Israeli minister Economy Communication. Speaking American-Israel Chamber Commerce seminar Yaacobi 1986 Israeli export U.S. 2.3 billion dlrs one-third Israel's total export import U.S. 1.8 billion dlrs roughly one-sixth total. "I be convince Israel export U.S. reach five billion dlrs five learn function American marketplace great emphasis product quality" Yaacobi said. While weaken dollar vis-a-vis European currency "bottleneck increase export U.S." Yaacobi expect Israel extend recent trend high U.S. exports. In ten Israeli export U.S. rise fivefold 417 mln dlrs 2.3 billion 1986 import rise 888 mln dlrs 1.8 billion year. Yaacobi export growth increase ten eleven pct annually rate achieve 1973 Yom Kippur War. He U.S./Israel Free Trade agreement pass eliminate duty commercial restriction nation 1994 continue facilitate desire export growth. Dual agreement include FTA allow Israel act economic bridge U.S. Europe enable U.S. firm export Europe low cost percentage export produce Israel vice-versa. Yaacobi tension nation middle east main reason Israel yet able achieve economic potential. Since 1973 U.S. Israel 25 billion dlrs aid defense expenditure financing military conflict "which impose Israel" said. Short achieve Israel's full growth potential Yaccobi achieve economic independence 1993 1994 base assumption export double 1986 level period. Reuter 

Revco D.S. Inc expect loss 14 mln dlrs fourth quarter end May 30. The company expect sale 703 mln dlrs operating profit 52 mln dlrs. The company expect sale full fiscal end May 30 2.7 billion dlrs operating profit 159 mln dlrs earnings nine mln dlrs. The company figure comparable Revco acquire leveraged buyout December. Reuter 

The House Representatives pass bill require financial institution disclose term condition rate offer saving accounts. Institutions require disclose advertisments announcement minimum balance requirement fee condition saving account certificate deposit interest-bearing check accounts. The purpose bill customer decide bank saving association offer rate accord House Banking Committee chairman Fernand St Germain Rhode Island Democrat. The bill pass voice vote sent Senate. Reuter 

Moody's Investors Service Inc downgrade Potomac Electric Power Co's prefer stock AA-1 AAA continue review utility's AAA bond rating downgrade. Some 1.3 billion dlrs affected. The prime-1 commercial paper rating review. Moody's expect Potomac Electric's credit quality undergo degree erosion recent rate reduction District Columbia Maryland. Reuter 

Bally Manufacturing Corp call optional redemption outstanding Series E increase dividend prefer stock August 1 50 dlrs share. The redemption price payable August 1. The regular quarterly dividend 1.50 dlrs share paid August 1 record July 15. Reuter 

Shr 12-1/2 ct v 12-1/2 prior qtr Pay July 15 Record July 8 Reuter 

Contel Corp expect report quarter earnings low year's 74 ct share 1987 earnings continue operation 15 pct low year's 3.04 dlrs share. Donald Weber president chief executive officer Contel low expect revenue high anticipate cost complete contract one-time expense behind low earnings projections. As Weber Contel begin evaluate strategy budget operating direction company's division "with renew emphasis maximize shareholder value." Weber add Contel hold discussion Comsat> agreement terminate previosuly propose merger companies. Weber add result evaluation part company reflect combination one-time gain loss anticipate low earnings. Webber encourage continued strength Contel's telephone business strong show company's non-regulated sectors. But add result part company unsatisfactory. Reuter 

Venezuela's government tomorrow present 1988 budget proposal 183.432 billion bolivar base oil price 16.35 dlrs barrel finance minister Manuel Azpurua said. Azpurua told reporter cabinet meeting budget project ordinary income 149.925 billion bolivar extraordinary income 34.186 billion. Oil revenue expect produce 92.014 billion 61 pct total. The finance minister oil revenue projection base average price 16.35 dlrs barrel 1988. Venezuelan oil half 1987 average 16. 20 dlrs barrel accord oil company Petroleos de Venezuela S.A. Reuter 

Hartmarx Corp "excellent financial condition" expect record earnings half fiscal 1987 Chairman John Meinert statement. The company report earnings quarter end May 31 8265000 dlrs 40 ct share sale 248.3 mln dlrs compare earnings 2255000 dlrs 11 ct sale 245.4 mln dlrs 1986 quarter. First-half earnings increase 19.4 mln dlrs 94 ct 10.6 mln dlrs 51 ct 1986. Reuter 

Moody's Investors Service downgrade American Healthcare Management's outstanding 80 mln dlrs 15 pct subordinate note Caa B-1. Moody's noteholders option accelerate payment issue July 15 1987. The rating review April. The agency note company earn mln dlrs quarter taxes. However Moody's firm violate covenant bank credit agreement result substantial asset writedowns operating earnings decline announce April. Reuter 

Gencorp Inc Continental AG Hanover West Germany jointy announce sign agreement Continental buy Gencorp's General Tire Inc subsidiary 650 mln dlrs cash. Under agreement company Continental acquire General Tire include related domestic foreign operation Gencorp retain liability medical benefit retire General Tire employee retire November 30 1984. The sale expect complete November subject meeting conditions. Continental Europe's large tire producer. Last company sale 2.6 billion dlrs 1.9 billion dlrs generate tire operations. Last General Tire operating profit 79 mln dlrs sale 1.1 billion dlrs Gencorp operating profit 130 mln dlrs sale 3.1 billion dlrs. GenCorp spokesman Rip Tilden company retain 100 mln dlrs liability former General Tire employee agreement. Tilden Gencorp proceeds sale reduce 1.5 billion dlr debt. In April GenCorp sucessfully thwart takeover partnership form AFG Industries Inc AFG> Wagner Brown restructuring include purchase 54 pct 12.5 mln share common 130 dlrs share total 1.6 billion dlrs As restructuring GenCorp plan sell tire bottle operation RKO General Inc subsidiary RKO's remain broadcast property focus company's aerospace automotive component businesses. Tilden Gencorp expect realize 850 mln dlrs tax proceeds 1987 result sale piece nonbroadcast asset company include tire. "The price paid General tire cause reevaluate estimate" Tilden. General Tire employ 10000 worldwide tire manufacturing plant U.S. Canada. In statemnet A. William Reynolds GenCorp chairman sale General Tire "represents critical accomplishment plan restructure GenCorp." Reynolds GenCorp's previously announce sale business "proceeding satisfactorily." Among piece Gencorp's empire remain sell RKO bottle operations. GenCorp agree sell RKO's KHJ-TV station Walt Disney Co DIS> 217 mln dlrs. That deal awaits approval Federal Communications Commission. GenCorp receive 257 dlrs tax sale RKO's WOR-TV. Reuter 

The U.S. Department Housing Urban Development (HUD) back eventual sever link government Federal National Mortgage Association -- know Fannie Mae. But department long-awaited report request Congress 1984 shy set timetable giant housing finance institution government ties. Instead specific recommendation report issue jointly Fannie Mae HUD Oct. 1. "The basic policy directive underlie FNMA's history consistent -- gradual movement fully private status. There appear change policy" HUD report said. Any change Fannie Mae's status Congress. The HUD report option Congress range do full immediate privatization. "Whatever option select combination favorable economic environment FNMA's recent move financial health current strength housing market evolution FNMA's role mortgage market contributor competitor indicate ripe positive move privatization" report concluded. Fannie Mae operate federal government create 1938 1968 rechartered Congress private ownership government backing. However "it intend FNMA eventually fully private" HUD report said. Fannie Mae's critic include Reagan administration official espouse free-market philosophy government sponsorship agency allows compete unfairly private lender investors. But backer claim mortgage rate push high agency cost eventually pass buyers. Fannie Mae create Congress capital available housing buying mortgage lender packaging security sell investors. Reuter 

The House Representatives pass resolution urge President Reagan negotiate world-wide treaty reduce chlorofluorocarbon deplete earth's ozone layer. Chlorofluorocarbons chemical aerosol spray refrigeration air conditioning foam insultation fire extinguisher cleaning solvents. They ban United States Canada 1978 widely Europe Japan. The ozone layer atmosphere protects earth ultraviolet radiation Sun. Scientists warn chlorofluocarbons continue deplete ozone layer additional ultraviolent radiation strike earth cause high rate skin cancer. The non-binding resolution pass voice vote. Reuter 

Shr loss 79 ct v profit 30 ct Net loss 2.1 mln dlrs v profit 675935 dlrs Revs 5.5 mln dlrs v 9.1 mln dlrs Note:the end March 31. The company's full name Advanced Institutional Management Software Inc Reuter 

Moody's Investors Service Inc affirm National City Corp's long-term debt rating major subsidiary National City Bank BancOhio National Bank. Some 200 mln dlrs issue affected. Moody's action follow announcement National City Corp add special provision 55 mln dlrs loan loss reserve primarily reflect develop country loan exposure. Affirmed A-1 rating National City's senior note AA-2 rating National City Bank long-term deposit A-1 BankOhio long-term deposit rank. Reuter 

Kellwood Co sign definitive agreement acquire Robert Scott Ltd Inc David Brooks Ltd Inc Andrew Harvey Ltd Dedham Mass. Terms disclosed. Combined sale company 1986 50 mln dlrs said. The deal expect complete July 31 Kellwood said. Reuter 

Moody's Investors Service Inc affirm 1.2 billion dlrs debt The Bank New York Co Inc units. Affirmed parent's A-1 senior note prefer stock A-2 subordinate capital note prime-1 commercial paper. Also affirm The Bank New York's Aa-2 long-term deposit prime-1 short-term obligations. Moody's cite firm's announce 135 mln dlr addition loan loss reserve reflection exposure borrower less-developed countries. The addition adjusts firm's financial statement reflect economic reality said. Reuter 

Bell Canada own Bell Canada Enterprises Inc reduce distance rate Canada average eight pct line ruling Canadian regulators. The company expect change net revenues. The company cut rate call Ontario Quebec part Northwest Territories average pct average eight pct part Canada effective Wednesday. The change decrease charge longer distance increase shorter distance rate Bell Canada said. The Canadian Radio-television Telecommunications Commission order Bell Canada reduce phone rate company monopoly area make allowable rate return. Reuter 

Two lead Senate Republicans urge White House name Commodity Futures Trading Commission (CFTC) Commissioner Kalo Hineman replace outgo Chairman Susan Phillips congressional source said. Senate Republican leader Robert Dole (R-Kan.) Sen. Richard Lugar (R-Ind.) rank minority member Senate Agriculture Committee endorse Hineman top CFTC post source said. In addition Lugar urge White House Chief Staff Howard Baker recommend Mark Sullivan White House associate personnel director CFTC commissioner said. Phillips's departure July 24 create vacancy five-person commission require White House appoint chairman. Earlier month Sullivan emerge lead candidate replace Phillips accord industry congressional sources. But Sullivan's lack experience commodity market cite liability industry representatives. Hineman Kansas farmer drawn support Dole congressional Agriculture Committees eager farm interest represent CFTC. Reuter 

Standard Poor's Corp upgraded Heritage Communications Inc's senior debt BB-minus B-plus subordinate debt B B-minus. About 400 mln dlrs debt affected. S P Tele-Communications Inc's preliminary BB-minus rating 250 mln dlr shelf registration debt B rating 505 mln dlrs subordinate debt affirmed. The rating agency action reflect acquisition Heritage Tele-Communications subject June 30 vote Heritage shareholders. Reuter 

Mitsubishi Semiconductor America Inc subsdiary Mitsubishi Electric Corp> plan invest 36 mln dlrs expand Durham N.C. semiconductor operation. The company build building adjacent company's memory chip assembly plant test center N.C. The expansion allow subsidiary fabricate silicon wafer produce Application Specific Integrated Circuits (ASIC) chip company said. Construction expect begin July operation plan start 1988 company added. Reuter 

Digital Communications Associates Inc agree Fox Technology Inc FOXT.O> buy Fox Research Inc unit cash payment assumption liability 10 mln dlrs. The company agreement include payment additional 6.5 mln dlrs base performance unit follow closing. The company deal expect close mid-August. Fox Research develops make market local network personal computers. Reuter 

Tennessee Senator Albert Gore seek young president U.S. history enter 1988 presidential race pledge return respect law common White House. Gore four-term member House Representatives Senator 1985 become sixth official entrant race Democratic nomination. Public opinion poll show run near bottom declare candidates. Reuter 

Standard Poor's Corp place Reichhold Chemicals Inc's BBB-minus rat subordinate debt Creditwatch develop implication follow Dainippon Inc Chemicals Inc's unsolicited bid Reichhold. About 60 mln dlrs debt affected. S P Dainippon successful likely discontinue surveillance Reichhold's debt sufficient credit information probably available. A similar approach exists respect Polychrome Corp acquire Dainippon ago. Reuter 

A.H. Robins Co board conclude merger proposal submit Rorer Group Inc ROR> merit far consideration. At request board Rorer agree extend 1800 EDT July 2 deadline response A.H. Robins. After Rorer announce bid company Thursday analyst forecast Robins hold control company vigourously oppose merger. But analyst add Robins desire emerge independent bankruptcy proceeding thwart Robins' shareholder perceive merger expedient deal company's Dalkon Shield related liabilities. After fail attempt earlier Rorer's late merger plan call share swap worth 720 mln dlrs. Rorer trust cover estimate 1.75 billion dlrs liability deal 320000 claim woman suffer malady Dalkon Shield interuterine device. Reuter 

Pakistani government allow freer cotton rice export three-year trade policy aim narrow country's yawn trade gap. Commerce Planning Minister Mahbubul Haq televise speech government decide allow duty-free import cotton yarn textile industry competitive link bulk tea import export Pakistani products. Cotton rice Pakistan's main export handle exclusively corporation 1970s. But Haq private sector export cotton rice corporation meet long-standing demand local traders. The duty-free import cotton yarn allow bring price local ancillary industry compete effectively market said. Haq policy effective fiscal 1987/88 begin July 1 review year. It departure previous practice announce trade policy single fiscal Haq enable businessmen plan market strategy longer period. He export credit 250 mln dlrs provide export engineering good select third country soft credit terms. Pakistan's 1986/87 export 3.6 billion dlrs 18.2 cent previous import 5.23 billion dlrs compare 5.63 billion dlrs 1985/86. He government policy rationalise streamline import controls. "It observe due restriction import specially raw material intermediate good local industry suffer necessary inputs" said. "Prices increase quality good produce low. This restrictive policy give rise smuggle hamper exports." He correct situation 136 item freed import restrictions. Previously Pakistan met trade gap largely remittance national work abroad mainly Gulf. However remittance begin fall drop oil price recent lead spectre balance payment crisis Pakistan. Reuter 

First RepublicBank Corp add 325 mln dlrs loan loss reserve quarter. The company move cover loan developed country result loss 313 mln dlrs quarter end June 30. First RepublicBank Corp increase loan loss reserve lead loss full year. Figures unavailable bank form June merger Dallas-based bank RepublicBank Corp InterFirst Corp. The company 325 mln dlrs provision increase reserve 1.1 billion dlrs allocate 275 mln dlrs cover loan 18 develop countries. The company action recent action take major banking organization develop country loans. Reuter 

A U.S. decision end forty-year tax treaty cover Netherlands Antilles unlikely major impact Eurobond market tax expert said. Most U.S. firm stop use financial subsidiary incorporate Netherlands Antilles sell Eurobond market July 1984 expert said. But decision affect Eurobonds issue July 1984 involve principal worth estimate 30 billion dlrs probably mean bond call maturity date said. Since bond currently trading premium call mean loss market value bondholder accord Treasury official identified. The official Treasury Department currently unsure impact move Eurobond market. "We monitoring situation receive report investor issuers" official said. Earlier Treasury notify Netherlands termination treaty effective January 1 1988. For U.S. firm seek avoid 30 pct withholding tax financial subsidiary incorporate Netherlands Antilles sell Eurobonds bond issue abroad overseas financial subsidiary. But company take advantage 1984 change law know exemption portfolio allows sell directly Eurobond market avoid withholding tax. The 1984 tax change sharply reduce U.S. company use Netherlands Antilles sell Eurobonds Steven Hannes accounting firm Touche Ross Co. Ending tax treaty mean foreigner invest U.S. Netherlands Antilles lose tax benefit probably change portfolio Hannes said. He decision mainly affect foreign investor sought tax advantage reside country tax treaty United States. These investor typically reside country Middle East Central South America said. Some withdraw U.S. investment seek tax relief Netherlands Switzerland choice limited Hannes said. "It conceivable investment stay here. They bear tax borne past" Hannes said. U.S. domestic bond affected change. U.S. company Eurobonds issue Netherlands Antilles expect call avoid tax liability Treasury Department spokesman said. But refinance low rate decline rate Department expect U.S. firm hurt decision spokesman said. Negotiations United States Netherlands continued success late 1970's. The difference center U.S. concern resident third country avoid U.S. tax use treaty Netherlands Antilles. Reuter 

Citicorp extend reach California market Citicorp Savings' acquisition 50 Sears Roebuck's S> Sears Savings Bank branch bring presence 143 branch 101 community CitiCorp Savings said. Thrift industry analyst move approve Federal Reserve board plus Citicorp show serious intent penetrate California market. The acquisition mostly extends Citicorp's reach Southern California 34 50 branch located. Citicorp Savings predominantly Northern California. "This mark major expansion California particularly south" Citicorp Savings President Edward Valencia statement. Thrift industry source major near-term impact Southern California thrift market expect Citicorp aggressive competitor Sears market. "We believe competitor Sears" James Stutz Executive Vice President Home Federal Savings Loan Association HFD> base San Diego. Banking industry source move view groundwork establish Citicorp throughout California market 1991 law change allow operate bank state. They Citicorp likely convert branch bank time. In near-term analyst seven billion dlrs asset Citicorp Savings major force thrift market California thrift Home Federal Great Western Financial Corp GWF> H F Ahmanson Co AHM> Golden West Financial GWD> Great American First Savings Bank GTA>. Reuter 

The International Monetary Fund approve 48 mln dlr loan assist Ecuador meeting foreign exchange need follow earthquake struck March. The loan IMF provide country special circumstance equal 25 pct Ecuador's quota economic stand Fund. The IMF accord recent estimate earthquake hurt country's balance payment loss oil revenue due destruction oil pipeline. REUTER 

BCI Holdings Corp holder majority debt security approve amendment consent distribution asset company clearing BCI's plan reorganization. Under previously approve reorganization BCI divide company include newly-formed publicly held non-food company E-II Holdings Inc. BCI Holdings acquire Beatrice Cos Inc April 1986 remain privately-held primarily food company. Consent debt security holder necessary distribtute share E-II common stock plus 57.4 ct share BCI shareholder warrant holder BCI said. Shares distribute registration statement Securities Exchange Commission becomes effective. Holders 11 pct Ten Year Senior Notes consent amendment receive 12.50 dlrs cash 1000 dlrs principal amount debt securities. Consenting holder issue debt security receive 10 dlrs cash 1000 dlrs principal amount BCI said. Total principal amount outstanding 2.5 billion dlrs. Reuter 

Star Technologies Inc settlement 1985 shareholder lawsuit produce 1.3 mln dlr charge company record fourth quarter earnings. The company pay settlement company stock subject court approval. To reflect settlement therefore company revise fiscal fourth quarter end March 31 earnings 1.3 mln dlrs nine ct share primary basis. As company record net loss 580000 dlrs ct share versus net income 740000 dlrs previously reported. For date end March 31 net income reduce 1.4 mln dlrs 2.7 mln dlrs previously report May 28. The class action suit file federal district court charge company various violation federal security law regard company's initial offering December 1984 subsequent filings. Reuter 

Indiana National Corp expect loss mln dlrs quarter end June 30 profit eight mln dlrs ago period. The company result addition 23 mln dlrs foreign loan reserve tandem banking industry action. It expect loss six month eight mln dlrs. This compare profit 17.3 mln dlrs six month year. Reuter 

Contel Corp's telecommunication equipment unit likely candidate sale Atlanta-based telecommunication company Wall Street analyst said. "Executone top list" analyst refer Contel's loss-riden telecommunication equipment unit. "The question it?" added. The company forecasting 15 pct drop 1987 operating earnings late review operation effort aim "maximizing long-term stockholder value." Analysts Contel's federal system division hit executive defection block. Contel official decline comment possibility sell operations. However company indicate statement closely evaluate telecommunication federal system units. Reuter 

Belmoral Mines Ltd agree principle 26 mln dlr sale mln unit price 6.50 dlrs investment dealer McLeod Young Weir Ltd subject board regulatory approvals. Holders allow exchange unit September 15 1987 common share common share purchase warrant Belmoral company said. Each warrant holder purchase Belmoral common share 8.50 dlrs January 15 1990. McLeod Young Weir plan resell unit institutional private investor mainly Europe Belmoral said. Reuter 

Shr profit ct v loss ct Net profit 123000 v loss 104000 Revs 12.5 mln v nil Note: 1987 period include 112000 dlr extraordinary gain. Reuter 

Scott Paper Co leader tissue coat paper expect 1987 earnings 5.75 dlrs 6.25 dlrs share range proscribed Wall Street analysts. "We together five six pretty respectable growth consecutive record earnings I reason growth pattern interrupted" Scott's chairman chief executive officer Philip Lippincott told Reuters interview. Last company report earnings 4.96 dlrs share reflect impact strike Mobile Alabama plant. Earlier Lippincott outline bullish growth scenario analyst emphasize company deal grow capacity industry develop product modernize plants. He capacity increase industry particularly tissue paper stymie price hike Scott boost sale provide distinctive product meet need consumers. "Scott Paper show tremendous growth five I improvement largely unappreciated market" analyst Sherman Chao Salomon Brothers note stock sell relatively low price/earnings ratio. "They strive return equity 14 17 pct talk high objective. They raise financial objectives" Chao said. Sales consumer product increase pct show growth five pct pace quarter eclipse overall industry wide sale pace pct Lippincott said. "The favorable I Sommerset Maine plant make coat paper sell September. That mean coat paper look particularly good" Lawrence Ross PaineWebber Group Inc. Analyst George Adler Smith Barney equally optimistic. "They don't anything fire I be loss anything negative either" Adler said. He Scott Paper continue gain market share emphasize strategy develop distinctive products. Lippincott note company stand gain depressed level dollar. "The bottom line impact low dollar 15 ct share 1986 similar impact year" said. Reuter 

Canada Development Corp CDC.TO> agree sell 25.2 pct CDC Life Sciences Inc Caisse de depot et placement du Quebec provincial pension fund manager Institut Merieux French biological laboratory company 169.2 mln dlrs. It caisse Institut Merieux buy 2.75 mln common share company 30.76 dlrs share. It follow transaction caisse hold 19.3 pct CDC Life Sciences. Canada Development purchaser plan acquire remain publicly-held shares. Reuter 

A U.S. judge deny Bristol Meyers Inc's request halt Abbott Laboratories' ABT> plan supply AIDS test Red Cross spokeswoman Abbott said. Judge Joyce Hens Green U.S. District Court Washington D.C. reject Bristol Meyers' request temporary restrain Abbott's contract begin July supply AIDS test test hepatitis blood donate Red Cross spokeswoman said. She immediately provide Green's reason ruling. A Bristol Meyers spokesman immediately available comment. Reuter 

APL Corp sell 1250000 share Porex Technologies Corp own 40.6 mln dlrs pending federal approval proceeds buy 1.5 mln share note Fischbach Corp FIS> APL's Pennsylvania Engineering Corp affiliate owns. Victor Posner chairman APL Pennsylvania Engineering. After buying Fischbach share API 54.3 pct Fischbach's voting security assume conversion convertible debenture held APL. APL plan buy Fischbach share Pennsylvania Engineering market value proceeds secure demand loan Pennsylvania Engineering. APL plan purchase 470000 dlrs principal amount Fischbach's 8-1/2 convertible subordinate debenture 4.5 mln dlr 4-3/4 pct convertible subordinate debentures. APL Pennsylvania Engineering holder Pennsylvania Engineering's senior note senior secure note amount 56 mln dlrs agree proceeds receive sale Fischbach note stock fully satisify oligations notes. Reuter 

Dixons Group Plc shareholder special meeting Cyclops Corp approve previously announce merger Cyclops Dixons. Under term merger Dixons remain Cyclops shareholder receive 95 dlrs share. Dixons previously announce sale Cyclops steel nonresidential construction business former Alleghany Corp Y> subsidiary expect complete June 30. After sale Cyclops retain specialty retailing change name Silo Inc Dixons. Reuter 

Ste-Genevieve Resources Ltd increase cash takeover bid Sullivan Mines Inc share 7.25 dlrs share. It original bid. The offer minimum five mln common share maximum six mln share company said. It give far details. Reuter 

Prospects appear slim summer meeting U.S. Soviet official country enter final bilateral grain agreement Agriculture Department official said. The side usually try meet agreeement approach meeting delayed February. However delay endanger fifth grain agreement extends September 1988 USDA official said. "It difficult pull together meeting July" aide USDA undersecretary Daniel Amstutz said. Since meeting month ago talk "couple months" said. There grain industry speculation USDA offer Moscow wheat subsidy marketing year. But USDA official consultation held soon subsidy offer probably made. "I doubt subsidy offer summer agreement begins" USDA source said. Citing limited subsidy fund uncertainty year's crop "There variable now. It uncharacteristic offer now." Under nonbinding pact Moscow agree purchase minimum nine mln tonne U.S. grain year. Soviet U.S. official normally meet summer start agreement discus grain quality shipping logistics production outlooks. Reuter 

Shr five ct v ct Net 299869 v 54775 Revs 5.7 mln v 5.2 mln Note: period end April 30. Reuter 

ALZA Corp notify State California Regional Water Quality Control Board plan remedy groundwater soil contamination detect site Stanford Research Park. A preliminary sample show apparently contaminate ago industrial solvent chloroform. The company contamination affect drinking operation site. The plan expect cost maximum 750000 dlrs company said. Reuter 

The Justice Department government proceed cautiously plan allow nation's large intercity bus company merge operation move firm derail deal. Justice's opposition quick federal approval bid Greyhound Lines Inc immediate control Trailways Corp prompt Greyhound threaten -- brief file Interstate Commerce Commission (ICC) -- drop merger plan. Greyhound official told Reuters late company hop ICC action merger tomorrow. "Greyhound Lines forward transaction permit assume immediate unconditional control Trailways' operation integrate operations" Greyhound filing ICC federal regulatory agency final merger interstate bus companies. But Justice earlier filing ICC want agency move slowly plan turn Greyhound's request begin operating Trailways immediately. "The department begin receive relevant information Trailways' financial condition process assess correctness company's allegations" act Assistant Attorney General Charles Rule comment submit ICC. Greyhound announce June 19 want ICC begin operating Trailways immediately continue evaluate merger antitrust problems. Greyhound pay 80 mln dlrs Trailways' terminal bus garages. The company paper file ICC Trailways "could collapse matter days." They Trailways owe supplier six mln dlrs six mln dlrs due June 30. The supplier force Trailways bankruptcy "at time." Trailways owes consortium bank 76 mln dlrs consortium threaten call loan Trailways fails pay due June 30 said. Reuter 

Lockheed Corp NASA select develop design software Space Station contract potential value 200 mln dlrs. Lockheed contract continue 1993 assembly station 200-mile earth orbit schedule begin. Reuter 

The Federal Reserve Board approve Sovran Financial Corp's application retain share Sovran Insurance Corp Bethesda Md. Sovran control bank Maryland Virginia District Columbia acquire Suburban Bancorp control insurance subsidiary. Insurance industry trade group object Sovran's application Fed rule Sovran entitle retain indirect control Sovran Insurance special grandfather exemption prohibition bank engage insurance Garn-St Germain bank law. Reuter 

Elsinore Corp deposit 5795833 dlrs Manufacturers Hanover Trust Co trustee Elsinore Finance Corp unit's 15-1/2 pct senior mortgage bond due 1999. The deposit represent balance accrue unpaid bond thorugh June 30 1986. Elsinore Corp guaranteed payment bonds. Payment amount 50.40 dlrs 1000 dlrs principal July 14 shareholder record July 13. Reuter 

Qtly div 24 ct v 24 ct Pay August 14 Record July 24 Reuter 

Harcourt Brace Jovanovich Inc sell 4805432 share common 10.25 dlrs share employee stock ownership plan previously announce recapitalization plan. Harcourt share sell entitle special dividend previously declare plan. It share entitle vote special meeting shareholder schedule July 23. Reuter 

More lead U.S. manufacturer plan increase proportion U.S.-based production vis-a-vis overseas output accord Boston University School Management survey. The Manufacturing Roundtable 1987 study show 32 pct manufacturer plan shift output domestic plant overseas one simply increase production U.S. plants. That 19 pct expect shift 1986 12 pct 1984. The Boston University survey canvass 207 firms. The large survey 44 pct plan change U.S./overseas operation 23.7 pct boost ratio overseas output poll said. Jeffrey Miller professor School Management director Roundtable Survey exchange rate favor plan increase domestic production. But add increase competitiveness seem behind move towards great production United States. "What's peculiar it's successful term profitability decrease cost increase quality" told Reuters interview. Those company increase offshore production opposite spectrum meeting production goal themselves. He caution survey skewed towards unusually profitable business represent diversity industry regions. The typical respondent manufacturing division sale 200 mln dlrs. Reuter 

Allied-Signal Inc Schlumberger Ltd jointly announce Schlumberger acquire Allied-Signal's Neptune International unit. Terms weren't disclosed. Atlanta Ga.-based Neptune make meter flow measurement equipment sale 80 mln dlrs. Reuter 

The Federal Home Loan Bank Board close insolvent United Federal Savings Loan Association Durant Okla insured deposit asset liability newly create federally charter thrift. It fail thrift's office reopen tomorrow Bank Board management. United asset 9.31 mln dlrs close substantially dissipate asset earnings due federal law violation unsafe unsound practice thrift regulatory agency said. The Bank Board fault fail thrift holding substandard loan 1984-85 due "imprudent underwriting policy control loan construction purpose throughout United States." It charge thrift violate federal rule govern conflict loan single borrower change control. The thrift 27th federally insured saving loan close bank board year. Reuter 

American Century Corp Commerce Savings subsidiary receive 42.8 mln dlrs complete redemption property Aspen Colo Commerce foreclose April. American amount represent amount Commerce bid property April foreclosure sale plus date foreclosure. The property consist 12-acre hotel condominium development site base Aspen mountain sites. They sell former chairman American Century John Roberts Jr January 1985 53 mln dlrs. Reuter 

Shr 64 ct v 40 ct Net 5597000 v 3426000 Revs 83.5 mln v 47.4 mln Six mths Shr 1.15 dlrs v 60 ct Net 10 mln v 5201000 Revs 147.6 mln v 91.5 mln Reuter 

The U.S. Defense Department preliminary approval Egypt produce M-1A tank main battle tank United States. The State Defense Departments talk country deal Egypt's ability build tank protect technology secrets. The U.S. Army sign contract week ago pay General Dynamics Corp GD> 3.5 billion dlrs build 3299 tanks. Pentagon official identify told Reuters Congress probably officially notify final plan October 1. Congress 30 day veto Egypt foreign co-producer M-1A. U.S. defense official Congress approve plan Egypt Arab country sign peace treaty Israel. But issue technology transfer loss U.S. job raise problem plan Israel expect lobby production agreement. Reuter 

Finance minister 13-member Caribbean Community (Caricom) approve draft agreement export credit facility effort stem steady decline interregional trade. The Caribbean Export Credit Bank schedule begin operation January 1 1988 headquarter Barbados. Its initial capital 17 mln dlrs Caricom member government private sector donor Caribbean Development Bank. Capitalisation project 60 mln dlrs foreign aid include soft loan international institutions. Caricom leader attend annual meeting agenda stop decline inter-regional trade drop third year. Reuter 

Digital Communications Associates Inc DCAI.O> enter agreement acquire substantially asset Fox Technology Inc's Fox Research Inc subsidiary. The company assume 10 mln dlrs Fox liability provision far 6.5 mln dlrs base future financial performance Fox period follow closing deal. It acquisition subject approval Fox shareholder expect close mid August. Reuter 

Pakistan announce tea import policy say 70 pct import future Trading Corporation Pakistan (TCP). Commerce Minister Mahbubul Haq television broadcast one-third remain 30 pct allocate private sector permit country. The policy announce month government suspend import licence order inquiry tea purchase policy. Traders move design pressure Kenya provide 48 pct Pakistan's 75-80 mln kilo annual tea import buy Pakistani manufacture good exchange. Liptons Brooke Bond unit Britain's Unilever Plc control 95 pct Pakistan's hard-pack tea market trader said. Haq Planning Minister outline three-year trade policy start financial 1987/88 July 1. Reuter 

General Electric Co's GE Credit Corp agree buy capital stock Kraft Inc's wholly own subsidiary D K Financial Corp. Terms acquisition disclosed. D K asset billion dlrs lead U.S. company involve lease fleet car accord GE Credit. Jim Ahtes spokesman GE Credit's outside relation firm Manning Selvage Lee Inc emphasize term acquisition yet approved. Reuter 

Industrial Equity (Pacific) Ltd> (IEP) Hong Kong-listed unit Brierley Investments Ltd BRYA.WE> lift stake British oil company Ultramar Plc UMAR.L> U.S. Firm Ogelbay Norton Co>. IEP told Stock Exchange hold 36.03 mln Ultramar share represent 13.07 pct issue capital. It hold 388600 share Ogelbay represent 11.68 pct Delaware-based company. No detail available. REUTER 

Japan's seasonally adjust unemployment rate rise record 3.2 pct May bad level government start compile unemployment statistic 1953 government's Management Coodination Agency said. The May rate surpass previous record 3.0 pct marked January April year. It sharply 2.7 pct earlier. Unadjusted May unemployment total 1.91 mln 1.90 mln April 1.62 mln earlier. An agency official blame industrial restructuring strong yen rise unemployment. The seasonally adjust male unemployment rate May rise record 3.2 pct surpass previous record 3.0 pct July 1986. This compare 2.9 pct April 2.7 pct earlie. Unadjusted male unemployment total 1.12 mln 180000 earlier. The female unemployment rate May unchanged April record 3.1 pct. A ago rate 2.8 pct. Unadjusted female unemployment rise 100000 790000. The yen's appreciation continued affect employment manufacturing industry total employ May fell 210000 1.5 pct earlier 14.10 mln. REUTER 

Japanese Finance Minister Kiichi Miyazawa Group Seven (G-7) nation support Louvre Accord stabilise currencies. He told news conference follow cabinet meeting Group Five (G-5) G-7 plan meet talks. The Finance Minister far overseas stock market plunge lead freefall Tokyo stock market. "There special worry stock market Tokyo" added. Miyazawa Tokyo stock market gravely affected downturn market New York London clear sign economic recovery Japan stability exchange rates. Asked U.S. Had contact Japan stock market plunge New York Miyazawa contact. REUTER 

Japan's Finance Minister Kiichi Miyazawa remark U.S. Treasury Secretary James Baker Sunday nation abide spirit Louvre Accord aim reaffirm agreement. The agreement cooperate stabilise currency reach Paris February year. The finance minister remark news conference follow morning cabinet meeting. REUTER 

An explosive device blew Philippine Congress building Tuesday congressional security official said. He no-one injured blast damage telephone booth floor 0825 local (0025 GMT). Captain Rosalo Ylagan congressional security device home-made bomb firecracker. The explosion investigate added. No congressman building time. REUTER 

Japan understood U.S. Attacked Iranian oil platform Monday. "Japan deeply concerned increase threat ship navigate Gulf understands circumstance lead United States government measures" Foreign Ministry statement. The statement add threat free safe navigation increase missile attack U.S.-flagged tanker Kuwaiti territorial water Friday. REUTER 

World oil price remain stable despite U.S. Attack Iranian oil platform grow tension Gulf Venezuelan Energy Minister Arturo Hernandez Grisanti Monday. He described situation "extremely tense" Gulf military activity significantly affect price supply demand roughly equal. Demand OPEC crude final quarter 1987 18.5 mln barrel (bpd) group's pump above 18 mln bpd told news conference. Hernandez Grisanti supply/demand balance precarious price danger fall current average 18 dlrs barrel overproduction continued. Three 13-nation Organisation Petroleum Exporting Countries "overproducing exaggerated manner" above assign quota said. OPEC's overall ceiling 16.6 mln bpd. REUTER 

Canon Inc CANN.T> stop make Japanese language word processor retail price below 50000 yen consign production instead Kyushu Matsushita Electronic Co Ltd> 51.75-pct own unit Matsushita Electric Industrial Co Ltd MC.T>. A Canon spokesman move reflect intense price competition Canon Casio Computer Co Ltd CACT.T> compete grow market low-end processors. Canon focus production expensive sophisticated model generous profit margin said. REUTER 